THE
RED ROVER,
A TALE. VOL. II.
CHAPTER I.
Sit still, and hear the last of our sea sorrow.
Shakspeare
.
The
weight of the tempest had been felt at that
hapless moment when Earing and his unfortunate
companions were precipitated from their giddy
elevation
into the sea. Though the wind continued to
blow long after this fatal event, it was with a
constantly
diminishing power. As the gale decreased,
the sea began to rise, and the vessel to labour in
proportion. Then followed two hours of anxious
watchfulness on the part of Wilder, during which
the whole of his professional knowledge was
needed
,
in order to keep the despoiled hull of the Bristol
trader from becoming a prey to the greedy waters.
His consummate skill, however, proved equal to the
task that was required at his hands; and, just as the
symptoms of day were becoming visible along the
east, both wind and waves were rapidly subsiding
together. During the whole of this doubtful period,
our adventurer did not receive the smallest assistance
from any of the crew, with the exception of two
experienced seamen whom he had previously
stationed
at the wheel. But to this neglect he was
indifferent
;
since little more was required than his own
judgment, seconded, as it faithfully was, by the
exertions
of the mariners more immediately under his
eye.
The day dawned on a scene entirely different from
that which had marked the tempestuous deformity
of the night. The whole fury of the winds
appeared
to have been expended in their precocious effort.
From the moderate gale, to which they had fallen
by the end of the middle watch, they further altered
to a vacillating breeze; and, ere the sun had risen,
the changeful air had subsided into a flat calm. The
sea went down as suddenly as the power which had
raised it vanished; and, by the time the broad
golden
light of the sun was shed fairly and fully upon
the unstable element, it lay unruffled and polished,
though still gently heaving in swells so long and heavy
as to resemble the placid respiration of a sleeping
infant.
The hour was still early, and the serene
appearance
of the sky and the ocean gave every promise
of a day which might be passed in devising the
expedients
necessary to bring the ship again, in some
measure, under the command of her people.
Sound the pumps, said Wilder, observing that
the crew were appearing from the different places
in which they had bestowed their cares and their
persons together, during the later hours of the night.
Do you hear me, sir? he added sternly,
observing
that no one moved to obey his order. Let the
pumps be sounded, and the ship cleared of every
inch of water.
Nighthead, to whom Wilder had now addressed
himself, regarded his Commander with an oblique
and sullen eye, and then exchanged singularly
intelligent
glances with his comrades, before he saw fit
to make the smallest motion towards compliance.
But there was that, in the authoritative mien of his
superior, which finally induced him to comply. The
dilatory manner in which the seamen performed the
duty was quickened, however, as the rod ascended,
and the well-known signs of a formidable leak met
their eyes. The experiment was repeated with
greater activity, and with far more precision.
A 2
If witchcraft can clear the hold of a ship that
is already half full of water, said Nighthead,
casting
another sullen glance towards the attentive
Wilder
,
the sooner it is done the better; for the whole
cunning of something more than a bungler in the
same will be needed, in order to make the pumps of
the `Royal Caroline' suck!
Does the ship leak? demanded his superior,
with a quickness of utterance which sufficiently
proclaimed how important he deemed the
intelligence
.
Yesterday, I would have boldly put my name to
the articles of any craft that floats the ocean; and,
had the Captain asked me if I understood her nature
and character, as certain as that my name is Francis
Nighthead, I should have told him, yes. But I find
that the oldest seaman may still learn something of
the water; though it should be got in crossing a ferry
in a flat.
What mean you, sir? demanded Wilder, who,
for the first time, began to note the mutinous looks
assumed by his mate, no less than the threatening
manner in which he was seconded by the crew.
Have the pumps rigged without delay, and clear
the ship of the water.
Nighthead slowly complied with the former part
of this order; and, in a few moments, every thing
was arranged to commence the necessary, and, as it
would seem, urgent duty of pumping. But no man
lifted his hand to the laborious employment. The
quick eye of Wilder, who had now taken the alarm,
was not slow in detecting this reluctance; and he
repeated the order more sternly, calling to two of
the seamen, by name, to set the example of
obedience
.
The men hesitated, giving an opportunity to
the mate to confirm them, by his voice, in their
mutinous intentions.
What need of hands to work a pump in a vessel
like this? he said, with a coarse laugh, but in which
secret terror struggled strangely with open malice.
After what we have all seen this night, none here
will be amazed, should the vessel begin to spout out
the brine like a breathing whale.
What am I to understand by this hesitation, and
by this language? said Wilder, approaching
Nighthead
with a firm step, and an eye too proud to quail
before the plainest symptoms of insubordination.
Is it you, sir, who should be foremost in exertion
at a moment like this, who dare to set an example
of disobedience?
The mate recoiled a pace, and his lips moved;
still he uttered no audible reply. Wilder once more
bade him, in a calm and authoritative tone, lay his
own hands to the brake. Nighthead then found his
voice, in time to make a flat refusal; and, at the next
moment, he was felled to the feet of his indignant
Commander, by a blow he had neither the address
nor the power to resist. This act of decision was
succeeded by one single moment of breathless,
wavering
silence among the crew; and then the common
cry, and the general rush of every man upon our
defenceless
and solitary adventurer, were the signals
that open hostility had commenced. A shriek from
the quarter-deck arrested their efforts, just as a
dozen
hands were laid violently upon the person of
Wilder, and, for the moment, occasioned a truce. It
was the fearful cry of Gertrude, which possessed
even the influence to still the savage intentions of a
set of beings so rude and so unnurtured as those
whose passions had just been awakened into fierce
activity. Wilder was released; and all eyes turned,
by a common impulse, in the direction of the sound.
During the more momentous hours of the past
night, the very existence of the passengers below
had been forgotten by most of those whose duty
kept them to the deck. If they had been recalled
at all to the recollection of any, it was at those
fleeting
moments when the mind of the young mariner,
who directed the movements of the ship, found
leisure
to catch stolen glimpses of softer scenes than
the wild warring of the elements that was so
actively
raging before his eyes. Nighthead had named
them, as he would have made allusion to a part of
the cargo, but their fate had little influence on his
hardened nature. Mrs Wyllys and her charge had
therefore remained below during the whole period,
perfectly unapprised of the disasters of the
intervening
time. Buried in the recesses of their births,
they had heard the roaring of the winds, and the
incessant
washing of the waters; but these usual
accompaniments
of a storm had served to conceal
the crashing of masts, and the hoarse cries of the
mariners. For the moments of terrible suspense,
while the Bristol trader lay on her side, the better
informed governess had, indeed, some fearful
glimmerings
of the truth; but, conscious of her
uselessness
,
and unwilling to alarm her less instructed
companion
,
she had sufficient self-command to be mute.
The subsequent silence, and comparative calm,
induced
her to believe that she had been mistaken in
her apprehensions; and, long ere morning dawned,
both she and Gertrude had sunk into sweet and
refreshing
slumbers. They had risen and mounted to
the deck together, and were still in the first burst of
their wonder at the desolation which met their gaze,
when the long-meditated attack on Wilder was made.
What means this awful change? demanded Mrs
Wyllys, with a lip that quivered, and a cheek which,
notwithstanding the extraordinary power she
possessed
over her feelings, was blanched to the colour
of death.
The eye of Wilder was glowing, and his brow
was dark as those heavens from which they had just
so happily escaped, as he answered, menacing his
assailants with an arm,
It means mutiny, Madam; rascally, cowardly
mutiny!
Could mutiny strip a vessel of her masts, and
leave her a helpless log upon the sea?
Hark ye, Madam! roughly interrupted the mate;
to you I will speak freely; for it is well known
who you are, and that you came on board the `
Caroline'
a paying passenger. This night have I seen
the heavens and the ocean behave as I have never
seen them behave before. Ships have been running
afore the wind, light and buoyant as corks, with all
their spars stepped and steady, when other ships
have been shaved of every mast as close as the razor
sweeps the chin. Cruisers have been fallen in with,
sailing without living hands to work them; and, all
together, no man here has ever before passed a
middle
watch like the one gone by.
And what has this to do with the violence I have
just witnessed? Is the vessel fated to endure every
evil!Can
you
explain this, Mr Wilder?
You cannot say, at least, you had no warning of
danger, returned Wilder, smiling bitterly.
Ay, the devil is obliged to be honest on
compulsion
,
resumed the mate. Each of his imps sails
with his orders; and, thank Heaven! however he
may be minded to overlook the same, he has neither
courage nor power to do it. Otherwise, a peaceful
voyage would be such a rarity, in these unsettled
times, that few men would be found hardy enough
to venture on the water for a livelihood.A
warning
!
Ay, we will own you gave us open and frequent
warning. It was a notice, that the consignee should
not have overlooked, when Nicholas Nichols met
with the hurt, as the anchor was leaving the bottom.
I never knew an accident happen at such a time,
and no evil come of it. Then, had we a warning
with the old man in the boat; besides the
never-failing
ill luck of sending the pilot violently out of
the ship. As if all this wasn't enough, instead of
taking a hint, and lying peaceably at our anchors,
we got the ship under way, and left a safe and
friendly
harbour of a Friday, of all the days in a week!
*
*
The superstition, that Friday is an evil day, was not
peculiar
to Nighthead; it prevails, more or less, among seamen,
to this hour. An intelligent merchant of Connecticut had a
desire to do his part in eradicating an impression that is
sometimes
inconvenient. He caused the keel of a vessel to be laid
on a Friday; she was launched on a Friday; named the
Friday; and sailed on her first voyage on a Friday.
Unfortunately
for the success of this well-intentioned experiment,
neither vessel nor crew were ever again heard of!
So far from being surprised at what has happened, I
only wonder at finding myself still a living man; the
reason of which is simply this, that I have given my
faith where faith only is due, and not to unknown
mariners and strange Commanders. Had Edward
Earing done the same, he might still have had a
plank between him and the bottom; but, though half
inclined to believe in the truth, he had, after all, too
much leaning to superstition and credulity.
This laboured and characteristic profession of
faith in the mate, though sufficiently intelligible to
Wilder, was still a perfect enigma to his female
listeners
.
But Nighthead had not formed his
resolution
by halves, neither had he gone thus far, with
any intention to stop short of the completion of his
whole design. In a very few summary words, he
explained to Mrs Wyllys the desolate condition of
the ship, and the utter improbability that she could
continue to float many hours; since actual
observation
had told him that her lower hold was already
half full of water.
And what is then to be done? demanded the
governess, casting a glance of bitter distress towards
the pallid and attentive Gertrude. Is there no sail
in sight, to take us from the wreck? or must we
perish in our helplessness!
God protect us from any more strange sails!
exclaimed the surly Nighthead. There we have
the pinnace hanging at the stern, and here must be
land at some forty leagues to the north-west. Water
and food are plenty, and twelve stout hands can soon
pull a boat to the continent of America; that is, always
provided, America is left where it was seen no later
than at the sun-set of yesterday.
You then propose to abandon the vessel?
I do. The interest of the owners is dear to all
good seamen, but life is sweeter than gold.
The will of heaven be done! But surely you
meditate no violence against this gentleman, who, I
am quite certain, has governed the vessel, in very
critical circumstances, with a discretion far beyond
his years!
Nighthead muttered his intentions, whatever they
might be, to himself; and then he walked apart,
apparently
to confer with the men, who already
seemed
but too well disposed to second any of his views,
however mistaken or lawless. During the few
moments
of suspense that succeeded, Wilder stood
silent
and composed, a smile of something like scorn
struggling about his lip, and maintaining the air rather
of one who had power to decide on the fortunes of
others, than of a man whose own fate was most
probably at that very moment in discussion. When
the dull minds of the seamen had arrived at their
conclusion, the mate advanced to proclaim the result,
Indeed, words were unnecessary, in order to make
known a very material part of their decision; for
a party of the men proceeded instantly to lower the
stern-boat into the water, while others set about
supplying it with the necessary means of subsistence.
There is room for all the Christians in the ship
to stow themselves in this pinnace, resumed
Nighthead
;
and as for those that place their dependance
on any particular persons, why, let them call for aid
where they have been used to receive it.
From all which I am to infer that it is your
intention
,
said Wilder, calmly, to abandon the wreck,
and your duty?
The half-awed but still resentful mate returned a
look in which fear and triumph struggled for the
mastery, as he answered,
You, who know how to sail a ship without a
crew, can never want a boat! Besides, you shall
never say to your friends, whoever they may be, that
we leave you without the means of reaching the land,
if you are indeed a land-bird at all. There is the
launch.
There is the launch! but well do you know, that,
without masts, all your united strengths could not
lift it from the deck; else would it not be left.
They that took the masts out of the `Caroline'
can put them in again, rejoined a grinning seaman;
it will not be an hour after we leave you, before a
sheer-hulk will come alongside, to step the spars
again, and then you may go cruise in company.
Wilder appeared to be superior to any reply. He
began to pace the deck, thoughtful, it is true, but still
composed, and entirely self-possessed. In the mean
time, as a common desire to quit the wreck as soon
as possible actuated all the men, their preparations
advanced with incredible activity. The wondering
and alarmed females had hardly time to think
clearly
on the extraordinary situation in which they found
themselves, before they saw the form of the helpless
Master borne past them to the boat; and, in another
minute, they were summoned to take their places at
his side.
Thus imperiously called upon to act, they began
to feel the necessity of decision. Remonstrances,
they feared, would be useless; for the fierce and
malignant looks which were cast, from time to time,
at Wilder, as the labour proceeded, proclaimed the
danger of awakening such obstinate and ignorant
minds into renewed acts of violence. The
governess
bethought her of an appeal to the wounded man;
but the look of wild care which he had cast about
him, on being lifted to the deck, and the expression
of bodily and mental pain that gleamed across his
rugged features, as he buried them in the blankets by
which he was enveloped, but too plainly announced
that little assistance was, in his present condition, to
be expected from him.
What remains for us to do? she at length
demanded
of the seemingly insensible object of her
concern.
I would I knew! he answered quickly, casting
a keen but hurried glance around the whole horizon.
It is not improbable that they should reach the
shore. Four-and-twenty hours of calm will assure
it.
And if otherwise?
A blow at north-west, or from any quarter off
the land, will prove their ruin.
But the ship?
If deserted, she must sink.
Then will I speak in your favour to these hearts
of flint! I know not why I feel such interest in
your welfare, inexplicable young man, but much
would I suffer rather than believe that you incurred
this peril.
Stop, dearest Madam, said Wilder, respectfully
arresting her movement with his hand. I cannot
leave the vessel.
We know not yet. The most stubborn natures
may be subdued; even ignorance can be made to
open its ears at the voice of entreaty. I may
prevail
.
There is one temper to be quelledone reason
Vol. II. B
to convinceone prejudice to conquer, over which
you have no power.
Whose is that?
My own.
What mean you, sir? Surely you are not weak
enough to suffer resentment against such beings to
goad you to an act of madness?
Do I seem mad? demanded Wilder. The
feeling by which I am governed may be false, but,
such as it is, it is grafted on my habits, my opinions;
I will say, my principles. Honour forbids me to
quit a ship that I command, while a plank of her is
afloat.
Of what use can a single arm prove at such a
crisis?
None, he answered, with a melancholy smile.
I must die, in order that others, who may be
serviceable
hereafter, should do their duty.
Both Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude stood regarding
his kindling eye, but otherwise placid countenance,
with looks whose concern amounted to horror. The
former read, in the very composure of his mien, the
unalterable character of his resolution; and the
latter
,
shuddering as the prospect of the cruel fate
which awaited him crowded on her mind, felt a
glow about her own youthful heart that almost
tempted her to believe his self-devotion
commendable
.
But the governess saw new reasons for
apprehension
in the determination of Wilder. If she had
hitherto felt reluctance to trust herself and her ward
with a band such as that which now possessed the
sole authority, it was more than doubly increased by
the rude and noisy summons she received to hasten
and take her place among them.
Would to Heaven I knew in what manner to
choose! she exclaimed. Speak to us, young man,
as you would counsel mother and sister.
Were I so fortunate as to possess relatives so
near and dear, returned the other, with emphasis,
nothing should separate us at a time like this.
Is there hope for those who remain on the
wreck?
But little.
And in the boat?
It was near a minute before Wilder made any
answer
.
He again turned his look around the bright
and broad horizon, and he appeared to study the
heavens, in the direction of the distant Continent,
with infinite care. No omen that could indicate the
probable character of the weather escaped his
vigilance
,
while his countenance reflected all the
various
emotions by which he was governed, as he gazed.
As I am a man, Madam, he answered with
fervour
,
and one who is bound not only to counsel
but to protect your sex, I distrust the time. I think
the chance of being seen by some passing sail equal
to the probability that those who adventure in the
pinnace will ever reach the land.
Then let us remain, said Gertrude, the blood,
for the first time since her re-appearance on deck,
rushing into her colourless cheeks, until they
appeared
charged to fulness. I like not the wretches
who would be our companions in that boat.
Away, away! impatiently shouted Nighthead.
Each minute of light is a week of life to us all, and
every moment of calm, a year. Away, away, or we
leave you!
Mrs Wyllys answered not, but she stood the image
of doubt and painful indecision. Then the plash of
oars was heard in the water, and at the next moment
the pinnace was seen gliding over the element,
impelled
by the strong arms of six powerful rowers.
Stay! shrieked the governess, no longer
undetermined
;
receive my child, though you abandon
me!
A wave of the hand, and an indistinct rumbling
in the coarse tones of the mate, were the only
answers
given to her appeal. A long, deep, and
breathing
silence followed among the deserted. The grim
countenances of the seamen in the pinnace soon
became
confused and indistinct; and then the boat
itself
began to lessen on the eye, until it seemed no
more than a dark and distant speck, rising and
falling
with the flow and reflux of the blue waters.
During
all this time, not even a whispered word was
spoken. Each of the party gazed, until sight grew
dim, at the receding object; and it was only when
his organs refused to convey the tiny image to his
brain, that Wilder himself shook off the impression
of the sort of trance into which he had fallen. His
look became bent on his companions, and he pressed
his hand upon his forehead, as though his brain were
bewildered by the deep responsibility he had
assumed
in advising them to remain. But the sickening
apprehension quickly passed away, leaving in its
place a firmer mind, and a resolution too often tried,
in scenes of doubtful issue, to be long or easily
shaken
from its calmness and self-possession.
They are gone! he exclaimed, breathing long
and heavily, like one whose respiration had been
unnaturally suspended.
They are gone! echoed the governess, turning
an eye, that was contracting with the intensity of
her care, on the marble-like and motionless form of
her pupil. There is no longer any hope.
The look that Wilder bestowed, on the same silent
but lovely statue, was scarcely less expressive than
the gaze of her who had nurtured the infancy of the
Southern Heiress, in innocence and love. His brow
grew thoughtful, and his lips became compressed,
while all the resources of his fertile imagination and
long experience gathered in his mind, in engrossing,
intense reflection.
Is there hope? demanded the governess, who
was watching the change of his working
countenance
,
with an attention that never swerved.
The gloom passed away from his swarthy features,
and the smile that lighted them was like the radiance
of the sun, as it breaks through the blackest vapours
of the drifting gust.
There is! he said with firmness; our case is
far from desperate.
Then, may He who rules the ocean and the
land receive the praise! cried the grateful
governess
,
giving vent to her long-suppressed agony in a
flood of tears.
Gertrude cast herself upon the neck of Mrs
Wyllys, and for a minute their unrestrained
emotions
were mingled.
And now, my dearest Madam, said Gertrude,
leaving the arms of her governess, let us trust to
the skill of Mr Wilder; he has foreseen and
foretold
this danger; equally well may he predict our
safety.
Foreseen and foretold! returned the other, in
a manner to show that her faith in the professional
prescience of the stranger was not altogether so
unbounded
as that of her more youthful and ardent
companion. No mortal could have foreseen this
awful calamity; and least of all, foreseeing it, would
he have sought to incur its danger! Mr Wilder, I
will not annoy you with requests for explanations
that might now be useless, but you will not refuse
to communicate your grounds of hope.
Wilder hastened to relieve a curiosity that he well
knew must be as painful as it was natural. The
mutineers had left the largest, and much the safest,
of the two boats belonging to the wreck, from a
desire
to improve the calm, well knowing that hours of
severe labour would be necessary to launch it, from
the place it occupied between the stumps of the two
principal masts, into the ocean. This operation,
B 2
which might have been executed in a few minutes
with the ordinary purchases of the ship, would have
required all their strength united, and that, too, to
be exercised with a discretion and care that would
have consumed too many of those moments which
they rightly deemed to be so precious at that wild
and unstable season of the year. Into this little ark
Wilder proposed to convey such articles of comfort
and necessity as he might hastily collect from the
abandoned vessel; and then, entering it with his
companions, to await the critical instant when the
wreck should sink from beneath them.
Call you this hope? exclaimed Mrs Wyllys,
when his short explanation was ended, her cheek
again blanching with disappointment. I have heard
that the gulf, which foundering vessels leave,
swallows
all lesser objects that are floating nigh!
It sometimes happens. For worlds I would not
deceive you; and I now say that I think our chance
for escape equal to that of being ingulfed with the
vessel.
This is terrible! murmured the governess,
but the will of Heaven be done! Cannot ingenuity
supply the place of strength, and the boat be cast
from the decks before the fatal moment arrives?
Wilder shook his head in an unequivocal negative.
We are not so weak as you may think us, said
Gertrude. Give a direction to our efforts, and let
us see what may yet be done. Here is Cassandra,
she addedturning to the black girl already
introduced
to the reader, who stood behind her young
and ardent mistress, with the mantle and shawls of
the latter thrown over her arm, as if about to attend
her on an excursion for the morninghere is
Cassandra
,
who alone has nearly the strength of a man.
Had she the strength of twenty, I should despair
of launching the boat without the aid of machinery.
But we lose time in words; I will go below, in
order
to judge of the probable duration of our doubt;
and then to our preparations. Even you, fair and
fragile as you seem, lovely being, may aid in the
latter.
He then pointed out such lighter objects as would
be necessary to their comfort, should they be so
fortunate
as to get clear of the wreck, and advised their
being put into the boat without delay. While the
three females were thus usefully employed, he
descended
into the hold of the ship, in order to note
the increase of the water, and make his calculations
on the time that would elapse before the sinking
fabric must entirely disappear. The fact proved their
case to be more alarming than even Wilder had been
led to expect. Stripped of her masts, the vessel had
laboured so heavily as to open many of her seams;
and, as the upper works began to settle beneath the
level of the ocean, the influx of the element was
increasing
with frightful rapidity. As the young
mariner
gazed about him with an understanding eye, he
cursed, in the bitterness of his heart, the ignorance
and superstition that had caused the desertion of the
remainder of the crew. There existed, in reality,
no evil that exertion and skill could not have
remedied
;
but, deprived of all aid, he at once saw the
folly of even attempting to procrastinate a
catastrophe
that was now unavoidable. Returning with a
heavy heart to the deck, he immediately set about
those dispositions which were necessary to afford
them the smallest chance of escape.
While his companions deadened the sense of
apprehension
by their light but equally necessary
employment
,
Wilder stepped the two masts of the boat,
and properly disposed of the sails, and those other
implements that might be useful in the event of
success
.
Thus occupied, a couple of hours flew by, as
though minutes were compressed into moments. At
the expiration of that period, his labour had ceased.
He then cut the gripes that had kept the launch in
its place when the ship was in motion, leaving it
standing upright on its wooden beds, but in no other
manner connected with the hull, which, by this time,
had settled so low as to create the apprehension,
that, at any moment, it might sink from beneath
them. After this measure of precaution was taken,
the females were summoned to the boat, lest the
crisis might be nearer than he supposed; for he well
knew that a foundering ship was, like a tottering
wall, liable at any moment to yield to the impulse
of the downward pressure. He then commenced
the scarcely less necessary operation of selection
among the chaos of articles with which the
ill-directed
zeal of his companions had so cumbered the
boat, that there was hardly room left in which they
might dispose of their more precious persons.
Notwithstanding
the often repeated and vociferous
remonstrances
of the negress, boxes, trunks, and
packages
flew from either side of the launch, as though
Wilder had no consideration for the comfort and care
of that fair being in whose behalf Cassandra,
unheeded
,
like her ancient namesake of Troy, lifted
her voice so often in the tones of remonstrance.
The boat was soon cleared of what, under their
circumstances
,
was literally lumber; leaving, however,
far more than enough to meet all their wants, and
not a few of their comforts, in the event that the
elements should accord the permission to use them.
Then, and not till then, did Wilder relax in his
exertions. He had arranged his sails, ready to be
hoisted in an instant; he had carefully examined that
no straggling rope connected the boat to the wreck,
to draw them under with the foundering mass; and
he had assured himself that food, water, compass,
and the imperfect instruments that were then in use
to ascertain the position of a ship, were all
carefully
disposed of in their several places, and ready to
his hand. When all was in this state of preparation,
he disposed of himself in the stern of the boat, and
endeavoured, by the composure of his manner, to
inspire his less resolute companions with a portion of
his own firmness.
The bright sun-shine was sleeping in a thousand
places on every side of the silent and deserted wreck.
The sea had subsided to such a state of utter rest,
that it was only at long intervals that the huge and
helpless mass on which the ark of the expectants lay
was lifted from its dull quietude, to roll heavily, for
a moment, in the washing waters, and then to settle
lower into the greedy and absorbing element. Still
the disappearance of the hull was slow, and even
tedious, to those who looked forward with such
impatience
to its total immersion, as to the crisis of
their own fortunes.
During these hours of weasy and awful suspense,
the discourse, between the watchers, though
conducted
in tones of confidence, and often of
tenderness
,
was broken by long intervals of deep and
musing silence. Each forbore to dwell upon the
danger of their situation, in consideration of the
feelings of the rest; but neither could conceal the
imminent risk they ran, from that jealous
watchfulness
of love of life which was common to them all.
In this manner, minutes, hours, and the day itself,
rolled by, and the darkness was seen stealing along
the deep, gradually narrowing the boundary of their
view towards the east, until the whole of the empty
scene was limited to a little dusky circle around the
spot on which they lay. To this change succeeded
another fearful hour, during which it appeared that
death was about to visit them, environed by its most
revolting horrors. The heavy plunge of the
wallowing
whale, as he cast his huge form upon the
surface of the sea, was heard, accompanied by the
mimic blowings of a hundred imitators, that followed
in the train of the monarch of the ocean. It
appeared
,
to the alarmed and feverish imagination of
Gertrude, that the brine was giving up all its
monsters
;
and, notwithstanding the calm assurances of
Wilder, that these accustomed sounds were rather
the harbingers of peace than signs of any new
danger
,
they filled her mind with images of the secret
recesses over which they seemed suspended by a
thread, and painted them replete with the disgusting
inhabitants of the caverns of the great deep. The
intelligent seaman himself was startled, when he
saw, on the surface of the water, the dark fins of the
voracious shark stealing around the wreck, apprised,
by his instinct, that the contents of the devoted
vessel
were shortly to become the prey of his tribe.
Then came the moon; with its mild and deceptive
light, to throw the delusion of its glow on the
varying
but ever frightful scene.
See, said Wilder, as the luminary lifted its pale
and melancholy orb out of the bed of the ocean;
we shall have light for our hazardous launch!
Is it at hand? demanded Mrs Wyllys, with all
the resolution of manner she could assume in so
trying
a situation.
It isthe ship has already brought her scuppers
to the water. Sometimes a vessel will float until
saturated with the brine. If ours sink at all, it will
be soon.
If at all! Is there then hope that she can float?
None! said Wilder, pausing to listen to the
hollow and threatening sounds which issued from the
depths of the vessel, as the water broke through her
divisions, in passing from side to side, and which
sounded like the groaning of some heavy monster in
the last agony of nature. None; she is already
losing her level!
His companions saw the change; but, not for the
empire of the world, could either of them have
uttered
a syllable. Another low, threatening, rumbling
sound was heard, and then the pent air beneath blew
up the forward part of the deck, with an explosion
like that of a gun.
Now grasp the ropes I have given you! cried
Wilder, breathless with his eagerness to speak.
His words were smothered by the rushing and
gurgling of waters. The vessel made a plunge like
a dying whale; and, raising its stern high into the
air, glided into the depths of the sea, like the
leviathan
seeking his secret places. The motionless
boat was lifted with the ship, until it stood in an
attitude
fearfully approaching to the perpendicular.
As the wreck descended, the bows of the launch
met the element, burying themselves nearly to
filling
;
but, buoyant and light, it rose again, and, struck
powerfully on the stern by the settling mass, the
little
ark shot ahead, as thog it had been driven by
the hand of man. Still, as the water rushed into the
vortex, every thing within its influence yielded to
the suction; and, at the next instant, the launch was
seen darting down the declivity, as if eager to
follow
the vast machine, of which it had so long
formed
a dependant, through the same gaping whirlpool,
to the bottom. Then it rose, rocking, to the
surface
;
and, for a moment, was tossed and whirled
like a bubble circling in the eddies of a pool.
After
which, the ocean moaned, and slept again; the
moon-beams playing across its treacherous bosom,
sweetly and calm, as the rays are seen to quiver on
a lake that is embedded in sheltering mountains.
CHAPTER II.
Every day, some sailor's wife,
The masters of some merchant, and the merchant,
Have just our theme of woe.
Tempest
.
We
are safe! said Wilder, who had stood, amid
the violence of the struggle, with his person firmly
braced against a mast, steadily watching the manner
of their escape. Thus far, at least, are we safe;
for which may Heaven alone be praised, since no
art of mine could avail us a feather.
The females had buried their faces in the folds of
the vestments and clothes on which they were
sitting
;
nor did even the governess raise her
countenance
,
until twice assured by her companion that the
imminency of the risk was past. Another minute
went by, during which Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude
were rendering their thanksgivings, in a manner and
in words less equivocal than the expression which
had just broken from the lips of the young seaman.
When this grateful duty was performed, they stood
erect, as if emboldened, by the offering, to look their
situation more steadily in the face.
On every side lay the seemingly illimitable waste
of waters. To them, their small and frail tenement
was the world. So long as the ship, sinking and
dangerous as she was, remained beneath them, there
had appeared to be a barrier between their existence
and the ocean. But one minute had deprived them
of even this failing support, and they now found
themselves cast upon the sea in a vessel that might
be likened to one of the bubbles of the element.
Gertrude felt, at that instnat, as though she would
have given half her hopes in life for the mere
sight of that vast and nearly untenanted Continent
which stretched for so many thousands of miles
along the west, and kept the world of waters to their
limits.
But the rush of emotions that so properly
belonged
to their forlorn condition soon subsided, and
their thoughts returned to the study of the means
necessary to their further safety. Wilder had,
however
,
anticipated these feelings; and, even before
Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude had recovered their
recollections
,
he was occupied, aided by the ready
hands of the terrified but loquacious Cassandra, in
arranging the contents of the boat in such a manner
as would enable her to move through the element
with the least possible resistance.
With a well-trimmed ship, and a fair breeze,
cried our adventurer, cheerfully, so soon as his little
job was ended, we may yet hope to reach the land
in one day and another night. I have seen the hour
when, in this good launch, I would not have
hesitated
to run the length of the American coast,
provided
You have forgotten your provided, said
Gertrude
,
observing that he hesitated, probably from a
reluctance to express any exception to the opinion,
which might increase the fears of his companions.
Provided it were two months earlier in the year,
he added, in a tone of less confidence.
The season, is, then, against us: It only requires
the greater resolution in ourselves!
Wilder turned his head to regard the fair speaker,
whose pale and placid countenance, as the moon
silvered her fine features, expressed any thing but
the courage to endure the hardships he so well knew
she was liable to encounter, before they might hope
to gain the Continent. After musing a moment, he
lifted his open hand towards the south-west, and
held its palm some little time to the air of the night.
Any thing is better than idleness, for people in
Vol. II. C
our condition, he said. There are some symptoms
of the breeze coming in this quarter; I will be ready
to meet it.
He then spread his two lug-sails; and, trimming
aft the sheets, placed himself at the helm, like one
who expected his services there might be shortly
needed. The result did not disappoint his
expectations
.
Ere long, the light canvas of the boat began
to flutter; and then, as he brought the bows in the
proper direction, the little vessel commenced moving
slowly along its blind and watery path.
The wind soon came fresher upon the sails,
heavily charged with the dampness of the hour.
Wilder urged the latter reason as a motive for the
females to seek their rest beneath a little canopy of
tarpaulings, which his foresight had also provided,
and on mattresses he had brought from the ship.
Perceiving that their protector wished to be alone,
Mrs Wyllys and her pupil did as desired; and, in a
few minutes, if not asleep, no one could have told
that any other than our adventurer had possession of
the solitary launch.
The middle hour of the night went by, without
any material change in the prospects of those whose
fate so much depended on the precarious influence
of the weather. The wind had freshened to a smart
breeze; and, by the calculations of Wilder, he had
already moved across many leagues of ocean,
directly
in a line for the eastern end of that long and
narrow
isle that separates the waters which wash the
shores of Connecticut from those of the open sea.
The minutes flew swiftly by; for the time was
propitious
,
and the thoughts of the young seaman were
busy with the recollections of a short but
adventurous
life. At moments he leaned forward, as if he
would catch the gentle respiration of one who slept
beneath the dark and rude canopy, and as though
he might distinguish the soft breathings of her
slumbers
from those of her companions. Then would
his form fall back into its seat, and his lip curl, or
even move, as he gave inward utterance to the
wayward
fancies of his imagination. But at no time,
not even in the midst of his greatest abandonment to
reverie and thought, did he forget the constant, and
nearly instinctive, duties of his station. A rapid
glance at the heavens, an oblique look at the
compass
,
and an occasional, but more protracted,
examination
of the pale face of the melancholy moon,
were the usual directions taken by his practised eyes.
The latter was still in the zenith; and his brow
began
again to contract, as he saw that she was shining
through an atmosphere without a haze. He would
have liked better to have seen even those portentous
and watery circles by which she is so often
environed
,
and which are thought to foretel the tempest,
than the hard and dry medium through which her
beams fell so clear upon the face of the waters.
The humidity with which the breeze had commenced
was also gone; and, in its place, the quick, sensitive
organs of the seaman detected the often grateful,
though at that moment unwelcome, taint of the land.
All these were signs that the airs from the Continent
were about to prevail, and (as he dreaded, from
certain
wild-looking, long, narrow clouds, that were
gathering over the western horizon) to prevail with
a power conformable to the turbulent season of the
year.
If any doubt had existed in the mind of Wilder
as to the accuracy of his prognostics, it would have
been solved about the commencement of the
morning
watch. At that hour the inconstant breeze
began
again to die; and, even before its last breathing
was felt upon the flapping canvas, it was met by
counter currents from the west. Our adventurer saw
at once that the struggle was now truly to commence,
and he made his dispositions accordingly. The
square sheets of duck, which had so long been
exposed
to the mild airs of the south, were reduced to
one third their original size, by double reefs; and
several of the more cumbrous of the remaining
articles
,
such as were of doubtful use to persons in their
situation, were cast, without pausing to hesitate, into
the sea. Nor was this care without a sufficient
object
.
The air soon came sighing heavily over the
deep from the north-west, bringing with it the
chilling
asperity of the inhospitable regions of the
Canadas
.
Ah! well do I know you, muttered Wilder, as
the first puff of this unwelcome wind struck his sails,
and forced the little boat to bend to its power in
passing; well do I know you, with your
fresh-water
flavour and your smell of the land! Would to
God you had blown your fill upon the lakes, without
coming down to drive many a weary seaman back
upon his wake, and to eke out a voyage, already too
long, by your bitter colds and steady obstinacy!
Do you speak? said Gertrude, half appearing
from beneath her canopy, and then shrinking back,
shivering, into its cover again, as she felt the
influence
in the change of air.
Sleep, Lady, sleep, he answered, as though he
liked not, at such a moment, to be disturbed by even
her soft and silvery voice.
Is there new danger? asked the maiden,
stepping
lightly from the mattress, as if she would not
disturb the repose of her governess. You need not
fear to tell me the worst: I am a soldier's child!
He pointed to the signs so well comprehended by
himself, but continued silent.
I feel that the wind is colder than it was, she
said, but I see no other change.
And do you know whither the boat is going?
To the land, I think. You assured us of that,
and I do not believe you would willingly deceive.
You do me justice; and, as a proof of it, I will
now tell you that you are mistaken. I know that to
your eyes all points of the compass, on this void,
must seem the same; but I cannot thus easily
deceive
myself.
And we are not sailing for our homes?
So far from it, that, should this course continue,
we must cross the whole Atlantic before your eyes
could again see land.
Gertrude made no reply, but retired, in sorrow, to
the side of her governess. In the mean time,
Wilder
,
again left to himself, began to consult his
compass
and the direction of the wind. Perceiving that
he might approach nearer to the continent of
America
by changing the position of the boat, he wore
round, and brought its head as nigh up to the
south-west
as the wind would permit.
But there was little hope in this trifling change.
At each minute, the power of the breeze was
increasing
,
until it soon freshened to a degree that
compelled him to furl his after-sail. The slumbering
ocean was not long in awakening; and, by the time
the launch was snug under a close-reefed fore-sail,
the boat was rising on dark and ever-growing waves,
or sinking into the momentary calm of deep furrows,
whence it rose again, to feel the rapidly increasing
power of the blasts. The dashing of the waters,
and the rushing of the wind, which now began to
sweep heavily across the blue waste, quickly drew
the females to the side of our adventurer. To their
hurried and anxious questions he made considerate
but brief replies, like a man who felt that the time
was far better suited to action than to words.
In this manner the last lingering minutes of the
night went by, loaded with a care that each moment
rendered heavier, and which each successive
freshening
of the breeze had a tendency to render doubly
anxious. The day came, only to bestow more
distinctness
C 2
on the cheerless prospect. The waves
were looking green and angrily, while, here and
there, large crests of foam were beginning to break
on their summitsthe certain evidence that a
conflict
betwixt the elements was at hand. Then came
the sun over the ragged margin of the eastern horizon,
climbing slowly into the blue arch above, which lay
clear, chilling, distinct, and entirely without a cloud.
Wilder noted all these changes of the hour with a
closeness that proved how critical he deemed their
case. He seemed rather to consult the signs of the
heavens than to regard the tossings and rushings of
the water, which dashed against the side of his little
vessel in a manner that, to the eyes of his
companions
,
often appeared to threaten their total
destruction
.
To the latter he was too much accustomed,
to anticipate the true moment of alarm, though to
less instructed senses it might already seem so
dangerous
.
It was to him as is the thunder, when
compared
to the lightning, in the mind of the
philosopher
;
or rather he knew, that, if harm might come
from the one on which he floated, its ability to
injure
must first be called into action by the power of
the sister element.
What think you of our case now? asked Mrs
Wyllys, keeping her look closely fastened on his
countenance, as if she would rather trust its
expression
,
than even to his words for the answer.
So long as the wind continues thus, we may yet
hope to keep within the route of ships to and from
the great northern ports; but, if it freshen to a gale,
and the sea begin to break with violence, I doubt the
ability of this boat to lie-to.
Then our resource must be in endeavouring to
run before the gale.
Then must we scud.
What would be our direction, in such an event?
demanded Gertrude, to whose mind, in the
agitation
of the ocean and the naked view on every hand,
all idea of places and distances was lost, in the most
inextricable confusion.
In such an event, returned our adventurer,
regarding
her with a look in which commiseration
and indefinite concern were so singularly mingled,
that her own mild gaze was changed into a timid and
furtive glance, in such an event, we should be
leaving that land it is so important to reach.
What 'em 'ere? cried Cassandra, whose large
dark eyes were rolling on every side of her, with a
curiosity that no care or sense of danger could
extinguish
;
'em berry big fish on a water?
It is a boat! cried Wilder, springing upon a
thwart, to catch a glimpse of a dark object that was
driving on the glittering crest of a wave, within a
hundred fect of the spot where the launch itself was
struggling through the brine. What ho!boat,
ahoy!holloa there!boat, ahoy!
The deep breathing of the wind swept by them,
but no human sound responded to his shout. They
had already fallen, between two seas, into a deep
vale of water, where the narrow view extended no
farther than the dark and rolling barriers on either
side.
Merciful Providence! exclaimed the governess,
can there be others as unhappy as ourselves!
It was a boat, or my sight is not true as usual,
returned Wilder, still keeping his stand, to watch
the moment when he might catch another view. His
wish was quickly realized. He had trusted the helm,
for the moment, to the hands of Cassandra, who
suffered
the launch to vary a little from its course. The
words were still on his lips, when the same black
object came sweeping down the wave to windward,
and a pinnace, bottom upwards, washed past them
in the trough. Then followed a shriek from the
negress, who abandoned the tiller, and, sinking on
her knees, hid her face in her hands. Wilder
instinctively
caught the helm, as he bent his face in
the direction whence the revolting eye of Cassandra
had been turned. A grim human form was seen,
erect, and half exposed, advancing in the midst of
the broken crest which was still covering the dark
declivity to windward with foam. For a moment,
it stood with the brine dripping from the drenched
locks, like some being that had issued from the deep
to turn its frightful features on the spectators; and
then the lifeless body of a drowned man drove past
the launch, which, at the next minute, rose to the
summit of the wave, to sink into another vale, where
no such terrifying object floated.
Not only Wilder, but Gertrude and Mrs Wyllys,
had seen this startling spectacle so nigh them as to
recognize the countenance of Nighthead, rendered
still more stern and forbidding than ever, in the
impression
left by death. But neither spoke, nor gave
any other evidence of their intelligence. Wilder
hoped that his companions had at least escaped the
shock of recognizing the victim; and the females
themselves saw, in the hapless fortune of the
mutineer
,
too much of their own probable though more
protracted fate, to be able to give vent to the horror
each felt so deeply, in words. For some time, the
elements alone were heard sighing a sort of hoarse
requiem over the victims of their conflict.
The pinnace has filled! Wilder at length
observed
,
when he saw, by the pallid features and
meaning eyes of his companions, it was in vain to
affect reserve on the subject any longer. Their
boat was frail, and loaded to the water's edge.
Think you all are lost? observed Mrs Wyllys,
in a voice that scarcely amounted to a whisper.
There is no hope for any! Gladly would I part
with an arm, for the assistance of the poorest of
those misguided seamen, who have hurried on their
evil fortune by their own disobedience and
ignorance
.
And, of all the happy and thoughtless human
beings who lately left the harbour of Newport, in a
vessel that has so long been the boast of mariners,
we alone remain!
There is not another: This boat, and its
contents
,
are the sole memorials of the `Royal
Caroline
!'
It was not within the ken of human knowledge
to foresee this evil, continued the governess,
fastening
her eye on the countenance of Wilder, as
though she would ask a question which conscience
told her, at the same time, betrayed a portion of that
very superstition which had hastened the fate of the
rude being they had so lately passed.
It was not.
And the danger, to which you so often and so
inexplicably
alluded, had no reference to this we have
incurred?
It had not.
It has gone, with the change in our situation?
I hope it has.
See! interrupted Gertrude, laying a hand, in
her haste, on the arm of Wilder. Heaven be
praised! yonder is something at last to relieve the
view.
It is a ship! exclaimed her governess; but, an
envious wave lifting its green side between them and
the object, they sunk into a trough, as though the
vision had been placed momentarily before their
eyes, merely to taunt them with its image. The
quick glance of Wilder had caught, however, a
glimpse of the tracery against the heavens, as they
descended. When the boat rose again, his look was
properly directed, and he was enabled to be certain
of the reality of the vessel. Wave succeeded wave,
and moments followed moments, during which the
stranger was given to their gaze, and as often
disappeared
,
as the launch unavoidably fell into the troughs
of the seas. These short and hasty glimpses sufficed,
however, to convey all that was necessary to the
eye of a man who had been nurtured on that
element
,
where circumstances now exacted of him
such constant and unequivocal evidences of his skill.
At the distance of a mile, there was in fact a ship
to be seen, rolling and pitching gracefully, and
without
any apparent effort, on those waves through
which the launch was struggling with such difficulty.
A solitary sail was set, to steady the vessel, and that
so reduced, by reefs, as to look like a little snowy
cloud amid the dark maze of rigging and spars. At
times, her long and tapering masts appeared pointing
to the zenith, or even rolling as if inclining against
the wind; and then, again, with slow and graceful
sweeps, they seemed to fall towards the ruffled
surface
of the ocean, as though about to seek refuge
from their endless motion, in the bosom of the
agitated
element itself. There were moments when
the long, low, and black hull was seen distinctly
resting on the summit of a sea, and glittering in the
sun-beams, as the water washed from her sides; and
then, as boat and vessel sunk together, all was lost to
the eye, even to the attenuated lines of her tallest and
most delicate spars.
Both Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude bowed their faces
to their knees, when assured of the truth of their
hopes, and poured out their gratitude in silent and
secret thanksgivings. The joy of Cassandra was
more clamorous, and less restrained. The simple
negress laughed, shed tears, and exulted in the most
touching manner, on the prospect that was now
offered
for the escape of her young mistress and
herself
from a death that the recent sight had set before
her imagination in the most frightful form. But no
answering look of congratulation was to be traced
in the contracting and anxious eye of their
companion
.
Now, said Mrs Wyllys, seizing his hand in both
her own, may we hope to be delivered; and then
shall we be allowed, brave and excellent young man,
some opportunity of proving to you how highly we
esteem your services.
Wilder permitted the burst of her feelings with a
species of bewildered care, but he neither spoke,
nor in any other manner exhibited the smallest
sympathy
in her joy.
Surely you are not grieved, Mr Wilder, added
the wondering Gertrude, that the prospect of escape
from these awful waves is at length so mercifully
held forth to us!
I would gladly die to shelter you from harm,
returned the young sailor; but
This is not a time for any thing but gratitude and
rejoicing, interrupted the governess; I cannot
hearken to any cold exceptions now; what mean
you with that `but?'
It may be not so easy as you think to reach yon
shipthe gale may preventin short, many is the
vessel that is seen at sea which cannot be spoken.
Happily, such is not our cruel fortune. I
understand
,
considerate and generous youth, your wish to
dampen hopes that may possibly be yet thwarted;
but I have too long, and too often, trusted this
dangerous
element, not to know that he who has the
wind can speak, or not, as he pleases.
You are right in saying we are to windward,
Madam; and, were I in a ship, nothing would be
easier than to run within hail of the stranger.That
ship is certainly lying-to, and yet the gale is not
fresh enough to bring so stout a vessel to so short
canvas.
They see us, then, and await our arrival.
No, no: Thank God, we are not yet seen! This
little rag of ours is blended with the spray. They
take it for a gull, or a comb of the sea, for the
moment
it is in view.
And do you thank Heaven for this! exclaimed
Gertrude, regarding the anxious Wilder with a
wonder
that her more cautious governess had the power
to restrain.
Did I thank Heaven for not being seen! I may
have mistaken the object of my thanks: It is an
armed ship!
Perhaps a cruiser of the King's! We are the
more likely to meet with a welcome reception!
Delay
not to hoist some signal, lest they increase their
sail, and leave us.
You forget that the enemy is often found upon
our coast. This might prove a Frenchman!
I have no fears of a generous enemy. Even a
pirate would give shelter, and welcome, to females
in such distress.
A long and profound silence succeeded. Wilder
still stood upon the thwart, straining his eyes to read
each sign that a seaman understands; nor did he
appear
to find much pleasure in the task.
We will drift ahead, he said, and, as the ship
is lying on a different tack, we may yet gain a
position
that will leave us masters of our future
movements
.
To this his companions knew not well how to
make any objections. Mrs Wyllys was so much
struck with the remarkable air of coldness with
which he met this prospect of refuge against the
forlorn
condition in which he had just before confessed
they were placed, that she was much more disposed
to ponder on the cause, than to trouble him with
questions which she had the discernment to see
would be useless. Gertrude wondered, while she
was disposed to think he might be right, though she
knew not why. Cassandra alone was rebellious.
She lifted her voice in loud objections against a
moment's
delay, assuring the abstracted and perfectly
inattentive
young seaman, that, should any evil come to
her young mistress by his obstinacy, General Grayson
would be angered; and then she left him to reflect
on the results of a displeasure that to her simple
mind teemed with all the danger that could attend
the anger of a monarch. Provoked by his
contumacious
disregard of her remonstrances, the negress,
forgetting all her respect, in blindness in behalf of
her whom she not only loved, but had been taught
to reverence, seized the boat-hook, and,
unperceived
by Wilder, fastened to it, with dexterity, one of
the linen cloths that had been brought from the
wreck, and exposed it, far above the diminished sail,
for a couple of minutes, ere her device had caught
the eyes of either of her companions. Then,
indeed
,
she lowered the signal, in haste, before the
dark and frowning look of Wilder. But, short as
was the triumph of the negress, it was crowned with
complete success.
The restrained silence, which is so apt to succeed
a sudden burst of displeasure, was still reigning in
the boat, when a cloud of smoke broke out of the
side of the ship, as she lay on the summit of a
wave; and then came the deadened roar of artillery,
struggling heavily up against the wind.
It is now too late to hesitate, said Mrs Wyllys;
we are seen, let the stranger be friend or enemy.
Wilder did not answer, but continued to profit,
by each opportunity, to watch the movements of the
stranger. In another moment, the spars were seen
receding from the breeze, and, in a couple of minutes
more, the head of the ship was changed to the
direction
in which they lay. Then appeared four or
five broader sheets of canvas in different parts of the
complicated machinery, while the vessel bowed to
the gale, as though she inclined still lower before its
Vol. II. D
power. At moments, as she mounted on a sea, her
bows seemed issuing from the element altogether,
and high jets of spray were cast into the air,
glittering
in the sun, as the white particles scattered in
the breeze, or fell in gems upon the sails and rigging.
It is now too late, indeed; murmured our
adventurer
,
bearing up the helm of his own little craft,
and letting its sheet glide through his hands, until
the sail was bagging with the breeze nearly to
bursting
.
The boat, which had so long been labouring
through the water, with a wish to cling as nigh as
possible to the Continent, flew over the seas, leaving
a long trail of foam behind it; and, before either of
the females had regained their entire self-possession,
she was floating in the comparative calm that was
created by the hull of a large vessel. A light active
form stood in the rigging of the ship, issuing the
necessary
orders to a hundred seamen; and, in the
midst of the confusion and alarm that such a scene
was likely to cause in the bosom of woman,
Gertrude
and Mrs Wyllys, with their two companions,
were transferred in safety to the decks of the
stranger
.
The moment they and their effects were
secured
,
the launch was cut adrift, like useless lumber.
Twenty mariners were then seen climbing among the
ropes; and sail after sail was opened still wider,
until
,
bearing the vast folds of all her canvas spread, the
vessel was urged along the trackless course, like a
swift cloud drifting through the thin medium of the
upper air.
CHAPTER III.
Now let it work: Mischief, thou art afoot,
Take then what course thou wilt!
Shakspeare
.
When
the velocity with which the vessel flew
before
the wind is properly considered, the reader
will not be surprised to learn, that, with the change
of a week in the time from that with which the
foregoing incidents close, we are enabled to open
the scene of the present chapter in a very different
quarter of the same sea. It is unnecessary to follow
the Rover in the windings of that devious and
apparently often uncertain course, during which his
keel furrowed more than a thousand miles of ocean,
and during which more than one cruiser of the King
was skilfully eluded, and sundry less dangerous
rencounters
avoided, as much from inclination as any
other visible cause. It is quite sufficient for our
purpose to lift the curtain, which must conceal her
movements for a time, to expose the gallant vessel in
a milder climate, and, when the season of the year is
considered, in a more propitious sea.
Exactly seven days after Gertrude and her
governess
became the inmates of a ship whose character
it is no longer necessary to conceal from the reader,
the sun rose upon her flapping sails, symmetrical
spars, and dark hull, within sight of a few, low,
small and rocky islands. The colour of the element
would have told a seaman, had no mound of blue
land been seen issuing out of the world of waters,
that the bottom of the sea was approaching nigher
than common to its surface, and that it was
necessary
to guard against the well-known and dreaded
dangers of the coast. Wind there was none; for
the vacillating and uncertain air which, from time to
time, distended for an instant the lighter canvas of
the vessel, deserved to be merely termed the
breathings
of a morning, which was breaking upon the
main, soft, mild, and seemingly so bland as to
impart
to the ocean the placid character of a sleeping
lake.
Every thing having life in the ship was already up
and stirring. Fifty stout and healthy-looking seamen
were hanging in different parts of her rigging, some
laughing, and holding low converse with messmates
who lay indolently on the neighbouring spars, and
others leisurely performing the light and trivial duty
that was the ostensible employment of the moment.
More than as many others loitered carelessly about
the decks below, somewhat similarly engaged; the
whole wearing much the appearance of men who
were set to perform certain immaterial tasks, more
to escape the imputation of idleness than from any
actual necessity that the same should be executed.
The quarter-deck, the hallowed spot of every vessel
that may pretend to either discipline or its semblance,
was differently occupied, though by a set of beings
who could lay no greater claim to activity or interest.
In short, the vessel partook of the character of the
ocean and of the weather, both of which seemed
reserving their powers to some more suitable
occasion
for their display.
Three or four young (and, considering the nature
of their service, far from unpleasant-looking) men
appeared in a sort of undress nautical uniform, in
which the fashion of no people in particular was
very studiously consulted. Notwithstanding the
apparent
calm that reigned on all around them, each
of these individuals bore a short straight dirk at his
girdle; and, as one of them bent over the side of
the vessel, the handle of a little pistol was
discovered
through an opening in the folds of his professional
frock. There were, however, no other immediate
signs of distrust, whence an observer might infer
that this armed precaution was more than the usual
custom of the vessel. A couple of grim and callous
looking sentinels, who were attired and accoutred
like soldiers of the land, and who, contrary to marine
usage, were posted on the line which separated the
resorting place of the officers from the forward part
of the deck, bespoke additional caution. But, still,
all these arrangements were regarded by the seamen
with incurious eyesa certain proof that use had
long rendered them familiar.
The individual who has been introduced to the
reader under the high-sounding title of General,
stood upright and rigid as one of the masts of the
ship, studying, with a critical eye, the equipments of
his two mercenaries, and apparently as regardless of
what was passing around him as though he literally
considered himself a fixture in the vessel. One form,
however, was to be distinguished from all around it,
by the dignity of its mien and the air of authority
that breathed even in the repose of its attitude. It
was the Rover, who stood alone, none presuming to
approach the spot where he had chosen to plant his
light but graceful and imposing person. There was
ever an expression of stern investigation in his quick
wandering eye, as it roved from object to object in
the equipment of the vessel; and at moments, as his
look appeared fastened on some one of the light
fleecy clouds that floated in the blue vacuum above
him, there gathered about his brow a gloom like that
which is thought to be the shadowing of intense
thought. Indeed, so dark and threatening did this
lowering of the eye become, at times, that the fair
hair which broke out in ringlets from beneath a black
velvet sea-cap, from whose top depended a tassel of
gold, could no longer impart to his countenance the
gentleness which it sometimes was seen to express.
As though he disdained concealment, and wished to
D 2
announce the nature of the power he wielded, he
wore his pistols openly in a leathern belt, that was
made to cross a frock of blue, delicately edged with
gold, and through which he had thrust, with the same
disregard of concealment, a light and curved
Turkish
yattagan, with a straight stiletto, which, by the
chasings of its handle, had probably originally come
from the manufactory of some Italian artisan.
On the deck of the poop, overlooking the rest,
and retired from the crowd beneath them, stood Mrs
Wyllys and her charge, neither of whom announced
in the slightest degree, by eye or air, that anxiety
which might readily be supposed natural to females
who found themselves in a condition so critical as in
the company of lawless freebooters. On the
contrary
,
while the former pointed out to the latter the
hillock of pale blue which rose from the water, like
a dark and strongly defined cloud in the distance,
hope was strongly blended with the ordinarily placid
expression of her features. She also called to
Wilder
,
in a cheerful voice; and the youth, who had
long been standing, with a sort of jealous
watchfulness
,
at the foot of the ladder which led from the
quarter-deck, was at her side in an instant.
I am telling Gertrude, said the governess, with
those tones of confidence which had been created
by the dangers they had incurred together, that
yonder is her home, and that, when the breeze shall
be felt, we may speedily hope to reach it; but the
wilfully timid girl insists that she cannot believe her
senses, after the frightful risks we have run, until, at
least, she shall see the dwelling of her childhood,
and the face of her father. You have often been on
this coast before, Mr Wilder?
Often, Madam.
Then, you can tell us what is the distant land we
see.
Land! repeated our adventurer, affecting a look
of surprise; is there then land in view?
Is there land in view! Have not hours gone by
since the same was proclaimed from the masts?
It may be so: We seamen are dull after a night
of watching, and often hear but little of that which
passes.
There was a quick, suspicious glance from the
eye of the governess, as if she apprehended, she
knew not what, ere she continued,
Has the sight of the cheerful, blessed soil of
America so soon lost its charm in your eye, that you
approach it with an air so heedless? The
infatuation
of men of your profession, in favour of so
dangerous
and so treacherous an element, is an enigma
I never could explain.
Do seamen, then, love their calling with so
devoted
an affection? demanded Gertrude, in a haste
that she might have found embarrassing to explain.
It is a folly of which we are often accused,
rejoined
Wilder, turning his eye on the speaker, and
smiling in a manner that had lost every shade of
reserve
.
And justly?
I fear, justly.
Ay! exclaimed Mrs Wyllys, with an emphasis
that was remarkable for the tone of soft and yet bitter
regret with which it was uttered; often better
than their quiet and peaceful homes!
Gertrude pursued the idea no further; but her
fine full eye fell upon the deck, as though she
reflected
deeply on a perversity of taste which could
render
man so insensible to domestic pleasures, and
incline
him to court the wild dangers of the ocean.
I, at least, am free from the latter charge,
exclaimed
Wilder: To me a ship has always been a
home.
And much of my life, too, has been wasted in
one, continued the governess, who evidently was
pursuing, in the recesses of her own mind, some
images of a time long past. Happy and miserable,
alike, have been the hours that I have passed upon
the sea! Nor is this the first King's ship in which it
has been my fortune to be thrown. And yet the
customs seem changed since those days I mention;
or else memory is beginning to lose some of the
impressions of an age when memory is apt to be
most tenacious. Is it usual, Mr Wilder, to admit an
utter stranger, like yourself, to exercise authority in
a vessel of war?
Certainly not.
And yet have you been acting, as far as my weak
judgment teaches, as second here, since the moment
we entered this vessel, wrecked and helpless
fugitives
from the waves.
Our adventurer again averted his eye, and
evidently
searched for words, ere he replied,
A commission is always respected: Mine
procured
for me the consideration you have witnessed.
You are then an officer of the Crown?
Would any other authority be respected in a
vessel of the Crown? Death had left a vacancy in
the second station of thiscruiser. Fortunately for
the wants of the service, perhaps for myself, I was
at hand to fill it.
But, tell me farther, continued the governess,
who appeared disposed to profit by the occasion to
solve more doubts than one, is it usual for the
officers
of a vessel of war to appear armed among their
crew, in the manner I see here?
It is the pleasure of our Commander.
That Commander is evidently a skilful seaman,
but one whose caprices and tastes are as
extraordinary
as I find his mien. I have surely seen him
before
;
and, it would seem, but lately.
Mrs Wyllys then became silent for several minutes.
During the whole time, her eye never averted its
gaze from the form of the calm and motionless being,
who still maintained his attitude of repose, aloof
from all that throng who he had the address to
make so entirely dependant on his authority. It
seemed, for these few minutes, that the organs of the
governess drunk in the smallest peculiarity of his
person, and as if they would never tire of their gaze.
Then, drawing a heavy and relieving breath, she once
more remembered that she was not alone, and that
others were silently, but observantly, awaiting the
operation of her secret thoughts. Without
manifesting
any embarrassment, however, at an absence
of mind that was far too common to surprise her
pupil
,
the governess resumed the discourse where she
had herself dropped it, bending her look again on
Wilder.
Is Captain Heidegger, then, long of your
acquaintance
?
she demanded.
We have met before.
It should be a name of German origin, by the
sound. Certain I am that it is new to me. The time
has been when few officers, of his rank, in the
service
of the King, were unknown to me, at least in
name. Is his family of long standing in England?
That is a question he may better answer
himself
,
said Wilder, glad to perceive that the subject
of their discourse was approaching them, with the
air of one who felt that none in that vessel might
presume to dispute his right to mingle in any
discourse
that should please his fancy. For the
moment
,
Madam, my duty calls me elsewhere.
Wilder evidently withdrew with reluctance; and,
had suspicion been active in the breasts of either of
his companions, they would not have failed to note
the glance of distrust with which he watched the
manner that his Commander assumed in paying the
salutations of the morning. There was nothing,
however, in the air of the Rover that should have
given ground to such jealous vigilance. On the
contrary
,
his manner, for the moment, was cold and
abstracted
,
and he appeared to mingle in their discourse,
much more from a sense of the obligations of
hospitality
,
than from any satisfaction that he might have
been thought to derive from the intercourse. Still,
his deportment was kind, and his voice bland as the
airs that were wafted from the healthful islands in
view.
There is a sighthe said, pointing towards the
low blue ridges of the landthat forms the
landsman's
delight, and the seaman's terror.
Are, then, seamen thus averse to the view of
regions
where so many millions of their fellow
creatures
find pleasure in dwelling? demanded
Gertrude
,
(to whom he more particularly addressed his
words), with a frankness that would, in itself, have
sufficiently proved no glimmerings of his real
character
had ever dawned on her own spotless and
unsuspicious
mind.
Miss Grayson included, he returned, with a
slight bow, and a smile, in which, perhaps, irony was
concealed by playfulness. After the risk you have
so lately run, even I, confirmed and obstinate
sea-monster
as I am, have no reason to complain of your
distaste for our element. And yet, you see, it is not
entirely without its charms. No lake, that lies
within
the limits of yon Continent, can be more calm
and sweet than is this bit of ocean. Were we a few
degrees more southward, I would show you
landscapes
of rock and mountainof bays, and
hill-sides
sprinkled with verdureof tumbling whales,
and lazy fishermen, and distant cottages, and lagging
sailssuch as would make a figure even in pages
that the bright eye of lady might love to read.
And yet for most of this would you be indebted
to the land. In return for your picture, I would take
you north, and show you black and threatening
cloudsa green and angry seashipwrecks and
shoalscottages, hill-sides, and mountains, in the
imagination only of the drowning manand sails
bleached by waters that contain the voracious shark,
or the disgusting polypus.
Gertrude had answered in his own vein; but it
was too evident, by her pale cheek, and a slight
tremour
about her full, rich lip, that memory was also
busy with its frightful images. The quick-searching
eye of the Rover was not slow to detect the change.
As though he would banish every recollection that
might give her pain, he artfully, but delicately, gave
a new direction to the discourse.
There are people who think the sea has no
amusements, he said. To a pining, home-sick,
sea-sick miserable, this may well be true; but the
man who has spirit enough to keep down the qualms
of the animal may tell a different tale. We have our
balls regularly, for instance; and there are artists on
board this ship, who, though they cannot, perhaps,
make as accurate a right angle with their legs as the
first dancer of a leaping ballet, can go through their
figures in a gale of wind; which is more than can
be said of the highest jumper of them all on shore.
A ball, without females, would, at least, be
thought an unsocial amusement, with us
uninstructed
people of terra firma.
Hum! It might be better for a lady or two.
Then, have we our theatre: Farce, comedy, and
the buskin, take their turns to help along the time.
Yon fellow, that you see lying on the
fore-topsail-yard
,
like an indolent serpent basking on the branch
of a tree, will `roar you as gently as any sucking
dove!' And here is a votary of Momus, who would
raise a smile on the lips of a sea-sick friar: I believe
I can say no more in his commendation.
All this is well in the description, returned Mrs
Wyllys; but something is due to the merit of the
poet, or, painter shall I term you?
Neither, but a grave and veritable chronologer.
However, since you doubt, and since you are so
new to the ocean
Pardon me! the lady gravely interrupted. I
am, on the contrary, one who has seen much of it.
The Rover, who had rather suffered his unsettled
glances to wander over the youthful countenance of
Gertrude than towards her companion, now bent his
eyes on the last speaker, where he kept them
fastened
so long as to create some little embarrassment in
the subject of his gaze.
You seem surprised that the time of a female
should have been thus employed, she observed,
with a view to arouse his attention to the impropriety
of his observation.
We were speaking of the sea, if I remember,
he continued, like a man that was suddenly
awakened
from a deep reverie. Ay, I know it was of the
sea; for I had grown boastful in my panegyrics: I
had told you that this ship was faster than
Nothing! exclaimed Gertrude, laughing at his
blunder. You were playing Master of Ceremonies
at a nautical ball!
Will you figure in a minuet? Shall I honour my
boards with the graces of your person?
Me, sir? and with whom? the gentleman who
knows so well the manner of keeping his feet in a
gale?
You were about to relieve any doubts we might
have concerning the amusements of seamen, said
the governess, reproving the too playful spirit of her
pupil, by a glance of her own grave eye.
Ay, it was the humour of the moment, nor will
I balk it.
He then turned towards Wilder, who had posted
himself within ear-shot of what was passing, and
continued,
These ladies doubt our gaiety, Mr Wilder. Let
the boatswain give the magical wind of his call, and
pass the word `To mischief' among the people.
Our adventurer bowed his acquiescence, and
issued
the necessary order. In a few moments, the
precise
individual who has already made acquaintance
with the reader, in the bar-room of the Foul
Anchor
,
appeared in the centre of the vessel, near the
main hatchway, decorated, as before, with his silver
chain and whistle, and accompanied by two mates,
who were humbler scholars of the same gruff school.
Then rose a long, shrill whistle from the instrument
of Nightingale, who, when the sound had died away
on the ear, uttered, in his deepest and least sonorous
tones,
All hands to mischief, ahoy!
We have before had occasion to liken these sounds
to the muttering of a bull, nor shall we at present see
fit to disturb the comparison, since no other
similitude
,
so apt, presents itself. The example of the
boatswain was followed by each of his mates in
turn, and then the summons was deemed sufficient.
However unintelligible and grum the call might
sound in the musical ears of Gertrude, they
produced
no unpleasant effects on the organs of a majority
of those who heard them. When the first swelling
and protracted note of the call mounted on the still
air, each idle and extended young seaman, as he lay
stretched upon a spar, or hung dangling from a
ratling
,
lifted his head, to catch the words that were to
follow, as an obedient spaniel pricks his ears to catch
the tones of his master. But no sonner had the
emphatic
word, which preceded the long-drawn and
customary exclamation with which Nightingale
closed
his summons, been pronounced, than the low
murmur of voices, which had so long been
maintained
Vol. II. E
among the men, broke out in a simultaneous
and common shout. In an instant, every symptom
of lethargy disappeared in a general and
extraordinary
activity. The young and nimble topmen
bounded
,
like leaping animals, into the rigging of their
respective
masts, and were seen ascending the shaking
ladders of ropes as so many squirrels would hasten
to their holes at the signal of alarm. The graver and
heavier seamen of the forecastle, the still more
important
quarter-gunners and quarter-masters, the less
instructed and half-startled waisters, and the raw and
actually alarmed after-guard, all hurried, by a sort
of instinct, to their several points; the more
practised
to plot mischief against their shipmates, and the
less intelligent to concert their means of defence.
In an instant, the tops and yards were ringing with
laughter and loudly-uttered jokes, as each exulting
mariner aloft proclaimed his device to his fellows, or
urged his own inventions, at the expense of some less
ingenious mode of annoyance. On the other hand,
the distrustful and often repeated glances that were
thrown upward, from the men who had clustered on
the quarter-deck and around the foot of the
mainmast
,
sufficiently proclaimed the diffidence with
which the novices on deck were about to enter into
the contest of practical wit that was about to
commence
.
The steady and more earnest seamen
forward
,
however, maintained their places, with a
species
of stern resolution which manifestly proved the
reliance they had on their physical force, and their
long familiarity with all the humours, no less than
with the dangers, of the ocean.
There was another little cluster of men, who
assembled
,
in the midst of the general clamour and
confusion, with a haste and steadiness that
announced
,
at the same time, both a consciousness of the
entire
necessity of unity on the present occasion, and
the habit of acting in concert. These were the
drilled and military dependants of the General,
between
whom, and the less artificial seamen, there
existed
not only an antipathy that might almost be
called instinctive, but which, for obvious reasons,
had been so strongly encouraged in the vessel of
which we write, as often to manifest itself in
turbulent
and nearly mutinous broils. About twenty in
number, they collected quickly; and, although obliged
to dispense with their fire-arms in such an
amusement
,
there was a sternness, in the visage of each of
the whiskered worthies, that showed how readily he
could appeal to the bayonet that was suspended from
his shoulder, should need demand it. Their
Commander
himself withdrew, with the rest of the
officers
,
to the poop, in order that no incumbrance
might be given, by their presence, to the freedom of
the sports to which they had resigned the rest of the
vessel.
A couple of minutes might have been lost in
producing
the different changes we have just related.
But, so soon as the topmen were sure that no
unfortunate
laggard of their party was within reach of
the resentment of the different groupes beneath,
they commenced complying literally with the
summons
of the boatswain, by plotting mischief.
Sundry buckets, most of which had been provided
for the extinction of fire, were quickly seen pendant
from as many whips on the outer extremity of the
different yards descending towards the sea. In spite
of the awkward opposition of the men below, these
leathern vessels were speedily filled, and in the
hands of those who had sent them down. Many
was the gaping waister, and rigid marine, who now
made a more familiar acquaintance with the element
on which he floated than suited either his
convenience
or his humour. So long as the jokes were
confined to these semi-initiated individuals, the
topmen
enjoyed their fun with impunity; but, the
instant
the dignity of a quarter-gunner's person was
invaded, the whole gang of petty officers and
forecastle-men
rose in a body to meet the insult, with a
readiness and dexterity that manifested how much
at home the elder mariners were with all that
belonged
to their art. A little engine was transferred
to the head, and was then brought to bear on the
nearest top, like a well-planted battery clearing the
way for the opening battle. The laughing and
chattering
topmen were soon dispersed: some ascending
beyond the power of the engine, and others
retreating
into the neighbouring top, along ropes, and across
giddy heights, that would have seemed
impracticable
to any animal less agile than a squirrel.
The marines were now summoned, by the
successful
and malicious mariners, forward, to improve
their advantage. Thoroughly drenched already, and
eager to resent their wrongs, a half-dozen of the
soldiers
,
led on by a corporal, the coating of whose
powdered poll had been converted into a sort of
paste by too great an intimacy with a bucket of
water
,
essayed to mount the rigging; an exploit to them
much more arduous than to enter a breach. The
waggish quarter-gunners and quarter-masters,
satisfied
with their own success, stimulated them to the
enterprise; and Nightingale and his mates, while they
rolled their tongues into their cheeks, gave forth, with
their whistles, the cheering sound of heave away!
The sight of these adventurers, slowly and
cautiously
mounting the rigging, acted very much, on the
scattered topmen, in the manner that the
appearance
of so many flies, in the immediate vicinity of
a web, is known to act on their concealed and
rapacious
enemies. The sailors aloft saw, by
expressive
glances from them below, that a soldier was
considered legal game. No sooner, therefore, had
the latter fairly entered into the toils, than twenty
topmen rushed out upon them, in order to make sure
of their prizes. In an incredibly short time, this
important result was achieved. Two or three of
the aspiring adventurers were lashed where they had
been found, utterly unable to make any resistance in
a spot where instinct itself seemed to urge them to
devote both hands to the necessary duty of holding
fast; while the rest were transferred, by the means
of whips, to different spars, very much as a light
sail or a yard would have been swayed into its place.
In the midst of the clamorous rejoicings that
attended
this success, one individual made himself
conspicuous
for the gravity and business-like air with
which he performed his part of the comedy. Seated
on the outer end of a lower yard, with as much
steadiness as though he had been placed on an
ottoman
,
he was intently occupied in examining into the
condition of a captive, who had been run up at his
feet, with an order from the waggish captain of the
top, to turn him in for a jewel-block; a name
that appears to have been taken from the precious
stones that are so often seen pendant from the ears
of the other sex.
Ay, ay, muttered this deliberate and
grave-looking
tar, who was no other than Richard Fid,
the stropping you've sent with the fellow is none
of the best; and, if he squeaks so now, what will he
do when you come to reeve a rope through him!
By the Lord, masters, you should have furnished the
lad a better outfit, if you meant to send him into
good company aloft. Here are more holes in his
jacket than there are cabin windows to a Chinese
junk. Hilloa!on deck there!you Guinea, pick
me up a tailor, and send him aloft, to keep the wind
out of this waister's tarpauling.
The athletic African, who had been posted on the
forecastle for his vast strength, cast an eye upward,
and, with both arms thrust into his bosom, he rolled
along the deck, with just as serious a mien as though
E 2
he had been sent on a duty of the greatest import.
The uproar over his head had drawn a most
helpless-looking
mortal from a retired corner of the
birth-deck, to the ladder of the forward hatch,
where, with a body half above the combings, a skein
of strong coarse thread around his neck, a piece of
bees-wax in one hand, and a needle in the other, he
stood staring about him, with just that sort of
bewildered
air that a Chinese mandarin would manifest,
were he to be suddenly initiated in the mysteries of
the ballet. On this object the eye of Scipio fell.
Stretching out an arm, he cast him upon his shoulder;
and, before the startled subject of his attack knew
into whose hands he had fallen, a hook was passed
beneath the waistband of his trowsers, and he was
half way between the water and the spar, on his way
to join the considerate Fid.
Have a care lest you let the man fall into the
sea! cried Wilder sternly, from his stand on the
distant poop.
He'm tailor, masser Harry, returned the black,
without altering a muscle; if a clothes no 'trong,
he nobody blame but heself.
During this brief parlance, the good-man
Homespun
had safely arrived at the termination of his lofty
flight. Here he was suitably received by Fid, who
raised him to his side; and, having placed him
comfortably
between the yard and the boom, he
proceeded
to secure him by a lashing that would give
the tailor the proper disposition of his hands.
Bouse a bit on this waister! called Richard,
when he had properly secured the good-man; so;
belay all that.
He then put one foot on the neck of his prisoner,
and, seizing his lower member as it swung
uppermost
,
he coolly placed it in the lap of the awe-struck
tailor.
There, friend, he said, handle your needle
and palm now, as if you were at job-work. Your
knowing handicraft always begins with the
foundation
,
wherein he makes sure that his upper gear will
stand.
The Lord protect me, and all other sinful
mortals
,
from an untimely end! exclaimed Homespun,
gazing at the vacant view from his giddy elevation,
with a sensation a little resembling that with which
the aeronaut, in his first experiment, regards the
prospect
beneath.
Settle away this waister, again called Fid; he
interrupts rational conversation by his noise; and,
as his gear is condemned by this here tailor, why,
you may turn him over to the purser for a new
outfit
.
The real motive, however, for getting rid of his
pendant companion was a twinkling of humanity,
that still glimmered through the rough humour of the
tar, who well knew that his prisoner must hang,
where he did, at some little expense of bodily ease.
As soon as his request was complied with, he turned
to the good-man, to renew the discourse, with just
as much composure as though they were both seated
on the deck, or as if a dozen practical jokes, of the
same character, were not in the process of enactment,
in as many different parts of the vessel.
What makes you open your eyes, brother, in this
port-hole fashion? commenced the topman. This
is all water that you see about you, except that
hommoc
of blue in the eastern board, which is a morsel
of upland in the Bahamas, d'ye see.
A sinful and presuming world is this we live in!
returned the good-man; nor can any one tell at
what moment his life is to be taken from him. Five
bloody and cruel wars have I lived to see in safety,
and yet am I reserved to meet this disgraceful and
profane end at last.
Well, since you've had your luck in the wars,
you've the less reason to grumble at the bit of a
surge you may have felt in your garments, as they
run you up to this here yard-arm. I say, brother, I've
known stouter fellows take the same ride, who never
knew when or how they got down again.
Homespun, who did not more than half
comprehend
the allusion of Fid, now regarded him in a way
that announced some little desire for an explanation,
mingled with great admiration of the unconcern with
which his companion maintained his position,
without
the smallest aid from any thing but his
self-balancing
powers.
I say, brother, resumed Fid, that many a
stout seaman has been whipt up to the end of a yard,
who has started by the signal of a gun, and who has
staid there just as long as the president of a
court-martial
was pleased to believe might be necessary to
improve his honesty!
It would be a fearful and frightful trifling with
Providence, in the least offending and conscientious
mariner, to take such awful punishments in vain, by
acting them in his sports; but doubly so do I
pronounce
it in the crew of a ship on which no man
can say at what hour retribution and compunction
are to alight. It seems to me unwise to tempt
Providence
by such provocating exhibitions.
Fid cast a glance of far more than usual
significance
at the good-man, and even postponed his
reply
,
until he had freshened his ideas by an ample
addition to the morsel of weed which he had kept
all along thrust into one of his cheeks. Then, casting
his eyes about him, in order to see that none of his
noisy and riotous companions, of the top, were
within
ear-shot, he fastened a still more meaning look on
the countenance of the tailor, as he responded,
Hark ye, brother; whatever may be the other
good points of Richard Fid, his friends cannot say
he is much of a scholar. This being the case, he has
not seen fit to ask a look at the sailing orders, on
coming aboard this wholesome vessel. I suppose,
howsomever, that they can be forthcoming at need,
and that no honest man need be ashamed to be found
cruising under the same.
Ah! Heaven protect such unoffending innocents
as serve here against their will, when the allotted
time of the cruiser shall be filled! returned
Homespun
.
I take it, however, that you, as a sea-faring
and understanding man, have not entered into this
enterprise without receiving the bounty, and
knowing
the whole nature of the service.
The devil a bit have I entered at all, either in
the `Enterprise' or in the `Dolphin,' as they call this
same craft. There is master Harry, the lad on the
poop there, he who hails a yard as soft as a
bull-whale
roars; I follow his signals, d'ye see; and it is
seldom that I bother him with questions as to what
tack he means to lay his boat on next.
What! would you sell your soul in this manner
to Beelzebub; and that, too, without a price?
I say, friend, it may be as well to overhaul your
ideas, before you let them slip, in this no-man's
fashion
,
from your tongue. I would wish to treat a
gentleman
,
who has come aloft to pay me a visit, with
such civility as may do credit to my top, though the
crew be at mischief, d'ye see. But an officer like
him I follow has a name of his own, without stop
ping to borrow one of the person you've just seen fit
to name. I scorn such a pitiful thing as a threat
but a man of your years needn't be told, that it is
just as easy to go down from this here spar as it was
to come up to it.
The tailor cast a glance beneath him into the
brine, and hastened to do away the unfavourable im
pression which his last unfortunate interrogation had
so evidently left on the mind of his brawny associate.
Heaven forbid that I should call any one but by
their given and family names, as the law commands,
he said; I meant merely to inquire, if you would
follow the gentleman you serve to so unseemly and
pernicious a place as a gibbet?
Fid ruminated some little time, before he saw fit
to reply to so sweeping a query. During this
unusual
process, he agitated the weed, with which his
mouth was nearly gorged, with great industry; and
then, terminating both processes, by casting a jet of
the juice nearly to the sprit-sail-yard, he said, in a
very decided tone,
If I wouldn't, may I be dd! After sailing in
company for four-and-twenty years, I should be no
better than a sneak, to part company, because such
a trifle as a gallows hove in sight.
The pay of such a service should be both
generous
and punctual, and the cheer of the most
encouraging
character, the good-man observed, in a
way that manifested he should not be displeased
were he to receive a reply. Fid was in no
disposition
to balk his curiosity, but rather deemed himself
bound, since he had once entered on the subject, to
leave no part of it in obscurity.
As for the pay, d'ye see, he said, it is seaman's
wages. I should despise myself to take less than
falls to the share of the best foremast-hand in a ship,
since it would be all the same as owning that I got
my deserts. But master Harry has a way of his
own in rating men's services; and if his ideas get
jamm'd in an affair of this sort, it is no marlingspike
that I handle which can loosen them. I once just
named the propriety of getting me a quarter-master's
birth; but devil the bit would he be doing the thing,
seeing, as he says himself, that I have a fashion of
getting a little hazy at times, which would only be
putting me in danger of disgrace; since every body
knows that the higher a monkey climbs in the
rigging
of a ship, the easier every body on deck can
see that he has a tail. Then, as to cheer, it is
seaman's
fare; sometimes a cut to spare for a friend,
and sometimes a hungry stomach.
But then there are often divisions of theaa
the prize-money, in this successful cruiser?
demanded
the good-man, averting his face as he spoke,
perhaps from a consciousness that it might betray an
unseemly interest in the answer. I dare say, you
receive amends for all your sufferings, when the
purser gives forth the spoils.
Hark ye, brother, said Fid, again assuming a
look of significance, can you tell me where the
Admiralty Court sits which condemns her prizes?
The good-man returned the glance, with interest;
but an extraordinary uproar, in another part of the
vessel, cut short the dialogue, just as there was a
rational
probability it might lead to some consolatory
explanations between the parties.
As the action of the tale is shortly to be set in
motion
again, we shall refer the cause of the
commotion
to the opening of the succeeding chapter.
CHAPTER IV.
Come, and get thee a sword, though made of a lath:
They have been up these two days.
King Henry VI
.
While
the little by-play that we have just related
was enacting on the fore-yard-arm of the Rover,
scenes, that partook equally of the nature of tragedy
and farce, were in the process of exhibition elsewhere.
The contest between the possessors of the deck and
those active tenants of the top, so often named, was
far from having reached its termination. Blows had,
in more than one instance, succeeded to angry words;
and, as the former was a part of the sports in which
the marines and waisters were on an equality with
their more ingenious tormentors, the war was
beginning
to be waged with some appearances of a very
doubtful success. Nightingale, however, was always
ready to recall the combatants to their sense of
propriety, with his well-known wind of the call, and
his murmuring voice. A long, shrill whistle, with
the words, Good humour, ahoy! had hitherto
served
to keep down the rising tempers of the different
parties, when the joke bore too hard on the
high-spirited
soldier, or the revengeful, though perhaps less
mettlesome, member of the after-guard. But an
oversight
,
on the part of him who in common kept so
vigilant an eye on the movements of all beneath his
orders, had nearly led to results of a far more serious
nature.
No sooner had the crew commenced the different
rough sports we have just related, than the vein
which had induced the Rover to loosen the reins of
discipline, for the moment, seemed suddenly to
subside
.
The gay and cheerful air that he had
maintained
in his dialogue with his female guests (or
prisoners
,
whichever he might be disposed to consider
them) had disappeared, in a thoughtful and clouded
brow. His eye no longer lighted with those
glimmerings
of wayward and sarcastic humour in which
he much loved to indulge, but its expression became
painfully settled and austere. It was evident that
his mind had relapsed into one of those brooding
reveries that so often obscured his playful and
vivacious
mien, as a shadow darkens the golden tints of
the field of ripe and waving corn.
While most of those who were not actors in the
noisy and humorous achievements of the crew
steadily
regarded the same, some with wonder, others with
distrust, and all with more or less of the humour of
the hour, the Rover, to all appearance, was quite
unconscious of all that was going on before his face.
It is true, that at times he raised his eyes to the active
beings who clung like squirrels to the ropes, or
suffered
them to fall on the duller movements of the
men below; but it was always with a vacancy which
proved that the image they carried to the brain was
dim and illusory. The looks he cast, from time to
time, on Mrs Wyllys and her fair and deeply
interested
pupil, betrayed the workings of the temper of
the inward man. It was only in these brief but
comprehensive glances that the feelings by which he
was governed might have been, in any manner,
traced
to their origin. Still would the nicest observer
have been puzzled, if not baffled, in endeavouring to
pronounce on the entire character of the emotions
uppermost in his mind. At instants, it might have
been fancied that some unholy and licentious passion
was getting the ascendancy; and then, as his eye
ran rapidly over the chaste and matronly, though
still attractive, countenance of the governess, no
imagination
was necessary to read the look of doubt,
as well as respect, with which he gazed.
It was while thus occupied that the sports
proceeded
,
sometimes humorous, and forcing smiles
even from the lips of the half-terrified Gertrude, but
always tending to that violence, and outbreaking of
anger, which might, at any moment, set at naught the
discipline of a vessel in which no other means to
enforce
authority existed, than such as its officers could,
on the instant, command. Water had been so
lavishly
expended, that the decks were running with the
fluid, even more than one flight of spray having
invaded
the privileged precincts of the poop. Every
ordinary device of similar scenes had been resorted
to, by the men aloft, to annoy their less
advantageously
posted shipmates beneath; and such means of
retaliation had been adopted as use or facility
rendered
obvious. Here, a hog and a waister were seen
swinging against each other, pendant beneath a top;
Vol. II. F
there, a marine, lashed in the rigging, was obliged to
suffer the manipulation of a pet monkey, which,
drilled to the duty, and armed with a comb, was
posted on his shoulder, with an air as grave, and an
eye as observant, as though he had been regularly
educated in the art of the perruquier; and, every
where, some coarse and practical joke proclaimed
the licentious liberty which had been momentarily
accorded to a set of beings who were, in common,
kept in that restraint which comfort, no less than
safety, requires for the well-ordering of an armed
ship.
In the midst of the noise and turbulence, a voice
was heard, apparently issuing from the ocean, hailing
the vessel by name, with the aid of a
speaking-trumpet
,
that had been applied to the outer circumference
of a hawse hole.
Who speaks the `Dolphin?'  demanded
Wilder
,
in reply, when he perceived that the summons
had fallen on the dull ears of his Commander,
without
recalling him to the recollection of what was in
action.
Father Neptune is under your fore-foot.
What wills the God?
He has heard that certain strangers have come
into his dominions, and he wishes leave to come
aboard the saucy `Dolphin,' to inquire into their
errands, and to overhaul the log-book of their
characters
.
He is welcome. Show the old man aboard
through the head; he is too experienced a sailor to
wish to come in by the cabin windows.
Here the parlance ceased; for Wilder turned upon
his heel, as though he were already disgusted with
his part of the mummery.
An athletic seaman soon appeared, seemingly
issuing
from the element whose deity he aspired to
personate
.
Mops, dripping with brine, supplied the
place of hoary locks; gulf-weed, of which acres
were floating within a league of the ship, composed
a sort of negligent mantle; and in his hand he bore
a trident made of three marlingspikes properly
arranged
,
and borne on the staff of a half-pike. Thus
accoutred, the God of the Ocean, who was no less
a personage than the captain of the forecastle,
advanced
,
with a suitable air of dignity, along the deck,
attended by a train of bearded water-nymphs and
naiades, in a costume no less grotesque than his own.
Arrived on the quarter-deck, in front of the position
occupied by the officers, the principal personage
saluted
the groupe with a wave of his sceptre, and
resumed
the discourse as follows; Wilder, from the
continued abstraction of his Commander, finding
himself under the necessity of maintaining one
portion
of the dialogue.
A wholesome and prettily-rigged boat have you
come out in this time, my son; and one well filled
with a noble set of my children. How long might
it be since you left the land?
Some eight days ago.
Hardly time enough to give the green ones the
use of their sea legs. I shall be able to find them, by
the manner in which they hold on in a calm. [Here
the General, who was standing with a scornful and
averted eye, let go his hold of a mizzen-shroud,
which he had grasped for no other visible reason
than to render his person utterly immoveable;
Neptune
smiled, and continued.] I sha'n't ask
concerning
the port you are last from, seeing that the
Newport soundings are still hanging about the flukes
of your anchors. I hope you haven't brought out
many fresh hands with you, for I smell the stock-fish
aboard a Baltic-man, who is coming down with the
trades, and who can't be more than a hundred leagues
from this; I shall therefore have but little time to
overhaul your people, in order to give them their
papers.
You see them all before you. So skilful a
mariner
as Neptune needs no advice when or how to
tell a seaman.
I shall then begin with this gentleman,
continued
the waggish head of the forecastle, turning
towards
the still motionless chief of the marines.
There is a strong look of the land about him; and
I should like to know how many hours it is since he
first floated over blue water.
I believe he has made many voyages; and I dare
say has long since paid the proper tribute to your
Majesty.
Well, well; the thing is like enough, tho'f I will
say I have known scholars make better use of their
time, if he has been so long on the water as you
pretend. How is it with these ladies?
Both have been at sea before, and have a right
to pass without a question, resumed Wilder, a
little
hastily.
The youngest is comely enough to have been
born in my dominions, said the gallant Sovereign
of the Sea; but no one can refuse to answer a
hail that comes straight from the mouth of Old
Neptune
;
so, if it makes no great difference in your
Honour's reckoning, I will just beg the young
woman
to do her own talking. Then, without paying
the least attention to the angry glance that shot from
the eye of Wilder, the sturdy representative of the
God addressed himself directly to Gertrude. If,
as report goes of you, my pretty damsel, you have
seen blue water before this passage, you may be
able to recollect the name of the vessel, and some
other small particulars of the run?
The face of our heroine changed its colour from
red to pale, as rapidly, and as glowingly, as the evening
sky flushes, and returns to its pearl-like
loveliness
;
but she kept down her feelings sufficiently to
answer, with an air of entire self-possession,
Were I to enter into all these little particulars,
it would detain you from more worthy subjects.
Perhaps this certificate will convince you that I am
no novice on the sea. As she spoke, a guinea fell
from her white hand into the broad and extended
palm of her interrogator.
I can only account for my not remembering your
Ladyship, by the great extent and heavy nature of
my business, returned the audacious freebooter,
bowing with an air of rude politeness as he
pocketed
the offering. Had I looked into my books
before
I came aboard this here ship, I should have seen
through the mistake at once; for I now remember
that I ordered one of my limners to take your
pretty
face, in order that I might show it to my wife at
home. The fellow did it well enough, in the shell
of an East-India oyster; I will have a copy set in
coral, and sent to your husband, whenever you may
see fit to choose one.
Then, repeating his bow, with a scrape of the
foot, he turned to the governess, in order to continue
his examination.
And you, Madam, he said, is this the first
time you have ever come into my dominions, or
not?
Neither the first, nor the twentieth; I have
often
seen your Majesty before.
An old acquaintance! In what latitude might it
be that we first fell in with each other?
I believe I first enjoyed that honour, quite
thirty
years since, under the Equator.
Ay, ay, I'm often there, looking out for
Indiamen
and your homeward-bound Brazil traders. I
boarded a particularly great number that very
season
,
but can't say I remember your countenance.
I fear that thirty years have made some changes
in it, returned the governess, with a smile, which,
though mournful, was far too dignified in its
melancholy
,
to induce the suspicion that she regretted a
loss so vain as that of her personal charms. I was
in a vessel of the King, and one that was a little
remarkable
by its size, since it was of three decks.
The God received the guinea, which was now
secretly
offered, but it would seem that success had
quickened his covetousness; for, instead of
returning
thanks, he rather appeared to manifest a
disposition
to increase the amount of the bribe.
All this may be just as your Ladyship says, he
rejoined; but the interest of my kingdom, and a
large family at home, make it necessary that I should
look sharp to my rights. Was there a flag in the
vessel?
There was.
Then, it is likely they hoisted it, as usual, at the
end of the jib-boom?
It was hoisted, as is usual with a Vice-Admiral,
at the fore.
Well answered, for petticoats! muttered the
Deity, a little baffled in his artifice. It is dd
queer, saving your Ladyship's presence, that I should
have forgotten such a ship: Was there any thing of
the extraordinary sort, that one would be likely to
remember?
The features of the governess had already lost
their forced pleasantry, in a shade of grave
reflection
,
and her eye was evidently fastened on vacancy,
as she answered, to all appearance like one who
thought, aloud.
I can, at this moment, see the arch and roguish
manner with which that wayward boy, who then
had but eight years, over-reached the cunning of the
mimic Neptune, and retaliated for his devices, by
turning the laugh of all on board on his own head?
Was he but eight? demanded a deep voice at
her elbow.
Eight in years, but maturer in artifice, returned
Mrs Wyllys, seeming to awake from a trance, as she
turned her eyes full upon the face of the Rover.
Well, well, interrupted the captain of the
forecastle
,
who cared not to continue an inquiry in which
his dreaded Commander saw fit to take a part, I
dare say it is all right. I will look into my journal;
if I find it so, wellif not, why, it's only giving the
ship a head-wind, until I've overhauled the Dane,
and then it will be all in good time to receive the
balance of the fee.
So saying, the God hurried past the officers, and
turned his attention to the marine guard, who had
grouped themselves in a body, secretly aware of the
necessity each man might be under of receiving
support
from his fellows, in so searching a scrutiny.
Perfectly familiar with the career each individual
among them had run, in his present lawless
profession
,
and secretly apprehensive that his authority
might be forced suddenly from him, the chief of the
forecastle selected a raw landsman from among them,
bidding his attendants to drag the victim forward,
where he believed they might act the cruel revels he
contemplated with less danger of interruption.
Already
irritated by the laughs which had been created
at their expense, and resolute to defend their
comrade
,
the marines resisted. A long, clamorous, and
angry dispute succeeded, during which each party
maintained its right to pursue the course it had
adopted. From words the disputants were not long
in passing to the signs of hostilities. It was while
the peace of the ship hung, as it were, suspended by
a hair, that the General saw fit to express the disgust
of such an outrage upon discipline, which had,
throughout the whole scene, possessed his mind.
I protest against this riotous and unmilitary
procedure
,
he said, addressing himself to his still
abstracted
and thoughtful superior. I have taught my
men, I trust, the proper spirit of soldiers, and there
is no greater disgrace can happen to one of them
than to lay hands on him, except it be in the regular
and wholesome way of a cat.I give open warning
to all, that, if a finger is put upon one of my bullies,
unless, as I have said, in the way of discipline, it
will be answered with a blow.
As the General had not essayed to smother his
voice, it was heard by his followers, and produced
the effect which might have been expected. A
vigorous
thrust from the fist of the sergeant drew mortal
blood from the visage of the God of the Sea, and at
once established his terrestrial origin. Thus
compelled
to support his manhood, in more senses than
one, the stout seaman returned the salutation, with
such additional embellishments as the exigencies of
the moment seemed to require. Such an interchange
of civilities, between two so prominent personages,
was the signal of general hostilities among their
respective
followers. The uproar that attended the
onset had caught the attention of Fid, who, the
instant
he saw the nature of the sports below,
abandoned
his companion on the yard, and slid
downwards
to the deck by the aid of a backstay, with
about as much facility as that caricature of man, the
monkey, could have performed the same manuvre.
His example was followed by all the topmen; and,
in less than a minute, there was every appearance
that the audacious marines would be borne down
by the sheer force of numbers. But, stout in their
resolution, and bitter in their hostility, these drilled
and resentful warriors, instead of seeking refuge in
flight, fell back upon each other, for support.
Bayonets
were seen gleaming in the sun; while some of
the seamen, in the exterior of the crowd, were
already
laying their hands on the half-pikes that formed
a warlike ornament to the foot of the mast.
Hold! stand back, every man of you! cried
Wilder, dashing into the centre of the throng, and
forcing them aside, with a haste that was possibly
quickened by the recollection of the increased
danger
that would surround the unprotected females,
should the bands of subordination be once fairly
broken among so lawless and desperate a crew.
On your lives, fall back, and obey. And you, sir,
who claim to be so good a soldier, I call on you to
bid your men refrain.
The General, however disgusted he might have
been by the previous scene, had too many important
interests involved in the interior peace of the
vessel
,
not to exert himself at this appeal. He was
seconded by all the inferior officers, who well knew
that their lives, as well as their comfort, depended
on staying the torrent that had so unexpectedly
broken loose. But they only proved how hard it
is to uphold an authority that is not established on
the foundation of legitimate power. Neptune had
cast aside his masquerade; and, backed by all his
stout forecastle-men, was evidently preparing for a
conflict that might speedily give him greater
pretensions
to immortal nature than those he had just
rejected. Until now, the officers, partly by threats
and partly by remonstrances, had so far controlled
the outbreaking, that the time had been passed
rather
in preparations than in violence. But the marines
had seized their arms; while two crowded masses
of the mariners were forming on either side of the
mainmast, abundantly provided with pikes, and such
other weapons as the bars and handspikes of the
vessel afforded. One or two of the cooler heads
among the latter had even proceeded so far as to
clear away a gun, which they were pointing inboard,
and in a direction that might have swept a moiety
of the quarter-deck. In short, the broil had just
reached that pass when another blow, struck from
either side, must have given up the vessel to plunder
and massacre. The danger of such a crisis was
heightened by the bitter taunts that broke forth from
fifty profane lips, which were only opened to lavish
the coarsest revilings on the persons and characters
of their respective enemies.
During the five minutes that might have flown by
in such sinister and threatening symptoms of
insubordination
,
the individual who was chiefly interested
in the maintenance of discipline had manifested the
most extraordinary indifference, or rather
unconsciousness
,
to all that was passing so near him. With
his arms folded on his breast, and his eyes fastened
on the placid sea, he stood motionless as the mast
near which he had placed his person. Long
accustomed
to the noise of scenes similar to the one he
had himself provoked, he heard, in the confused
sounds which rose unheeded on his ear, no more than
the commotion which ordinarily attended the license
of the hour.
His subordinates in command, however, were far
more active. Wilder had already beaten back the
boldest of the seamen, and a space was cleared
between
the hostile parties, into which his assistants
threw themselves, with the haste of men who knew
how much was required at their hands. This
momentary
success might have been pushed too far;
for, believing that the spirit of mutiny was subdued,
our adventurer was proceeding to improve his
advantage
,
by seizing the most audacious of the
offenders
,
when his prisoner was immediately torn from
his grasp by twenty of his confederates.
Who's this, that sets himself up for a Commodore
aboard the `Dolphin!'  exclaimed a voice in the
crowd, at a most unhappy moment for the authority
of the new lieutenant. In what fashion did he
come aboard us? or, in what service did he learn
his trade?
Ay, ay, continued another sinister voice, where
is the Bristol trader he was to lead into our net, and
for which we lost so many of the best days in the
season, at a lazy anchor?
Then broke forth a general and simultaneous
murmur
,
which, had such testimony been wanting, would
in itself have manifested that the unknown officer
was scarcely more fortunate in his present than in
his recent service. Both parties united in
condemning
his interference; and from both sides were heard
scornful opinions of his origin, mingled with certain
fierce denunciations against his person. Nothing
daunted by such palpable evidences of the danger
of his situation, our adventurer answered to their
taunts with the most scornful smiles, challenging a
single individual of them all to dare to step forth,
and maintain his words by suitable actions.
Hear him! exclaimed his auditors.He
speaks like a King's officer in chase of a smuggler!
cried one.Ay, he's a bold'un in a calm, said a
second.He's a Jonah, that has slipp'd into the
cabin windows! cried a third; and, while he
stays in the `Dolphin,' luck will keep upon our
weather-beam
.Into
the sea with him! overboard
with the upstart! into the sea with him! where
he'll find that a bolder and a better man has gone
before
him! shouted a dozen at once; some of whom
immediately gave very unequivocal demonstrations
of an intention to put their threat in execution. But
two forms instantly sprang from the crowd, and
threw themselves, like angry lions, between Wilder
and his foes. The one, who was foremost in the
rescue, faced short upon the advancing seamen, and,
with a blow from an arm that was irresistible,
levelled
the representative of Neptune to his feet, as
though he had been a mere waxen image of a man.
The other was not slow to imitate his example; and,
as the throng receded before this secession from its
own numbers, the latter, who was Fid, flourished a
fist that was as big as the head of a sizeable infant,
while he loudly vociferated,
Away with ye, ye lubbers! away with ye!
Would you run foul of a single man, and he an
officer
,
and such an officer as ye never set eyes on
before
,
except, mayhap, in the fashion that a cat looks
upon a king? I should like to see the man, among
ye all, who can handle a heavy ship, in a narrow
channel, as I have seen master Harry here handle
the saucy
Stand back, cried Wilder, forcing himself
between
his defenders and his foes. Stand back,
I say, and leave me alone to meet the audacious
villains
.
Overboard with him! overboard with them all!
cried the seamen, he and his knaves together!
Will you remain silent, and see murder done
before
your eyes? exclaimed Mrs Wyllys, rushing
from her place of retreat, and laying a hand eagerly
on the arm of the Rover.
He started like one who was awakened suddenly
from a light sleep, looking her full and intently in
the eye.
See! she added, pointing to the violent throng
below, where every sign of an increased commotion
was exhibiting itself. See, they kill your officer,
and there is none to help him!
The look of faded marble, which had so long been
seated on his features, vanished, as his eye passed
quickly over the scene. The organs took in the
whole nature of the action at the glance; and, with
the intelligence, the blood came rushing into every
vein and fibre of his indignant face. Seizing a
rope, which hung from the yard above his head, he
swung his person off the poop, and fell lightly into
the very centre of the crowd. Both parties fell
back, while a sudden and breathing silence
succeeded
to a clamour that a moment before would have
drowned the roar of a cataract. Making a haughty
and repelling motion with his arm, he spoke, and in
a voice that, if any change could be noted, was even
pitched on a key less high and threatening than
common
.
But the lowest and the deepest of its
intonations
reached the most distant ear, and no one who
heard was left to doubt its meaning.
Mutiny! he said, in a tone that strangely
balanced
between irony and scorn; open, violent, and
blood-seeking mutiny! Are ye tired of your lives,
my men? Is there one, among ye all, who is willing
to make himself an example for the good of the
rest? If there be, let him lift a hand, a finger, a
hair: Let him speak, look me in the eye, or dare to
show that life is in him, by sign, breath, or motion!
He paused; and so general and absorbing was the
spell produced by his presence and his mien, that,
in all that crowd of fierce and excited spirits, there
was not one so bold as to presume to brave his
anger
.
Sailors and marines stood alike, passive,
humbled
,
and obedient, as faulty children, when
arraigned
before an authority from which they feel, in
every
fibre, that escape is impossible. Perceiving that
no voice answered, no limb moved, nor even an eye
among them all was bold enough to meet his own
steady but glowing look, he continued, in the same
deep and commanding tone,
It is well: Reason has come of the latest; but,
happily for ye all, it has returned. Fall back, fall
back, I say; you taint the quarter-deck.The men
receded a pace or two on every side of him.Let
those arms be stacked; it will be time to use them
when I proclaim the need. And you, fellows, who
have been so bold as to lift a pike without an order,
Vol. II. G
have a care they do not burn your hands.A
dozen
staves fell upon the deck together.Is there a
drummer in this ship? let him appear!
A terrified and cringing-looking being presented
himself, having found his instrument by a sort of
desperate instinct.
Now speak aloud, and let me know at once
whether I command a crew of orderly and obedient
men, or a set of miscreants, that require some
purifying
before I trust them.
The first few taps of the drum sufficed to tell the
men they heard the beat to quarters. Without
hesitating
a reluctant moment, the crowd dissolved, and
each of the delinquents stole silently to his station;
the crew of the gun that had been turned inward
managing to thrust it through its port again, with a
dexterity that might have availed them greatly in
time of combat. Throughout the whole affair, the
Rover had manifested neither anger nor impatience.
Deep and settled scorn, with a high reliance on
himself
,
had, indeed, been exhibited in the proud curl
of his lip, and in the swelling of his form, but not,
for an instant, did it seem that he had suffered his
ire to get the mastery of his reason. And, now that
he had recalled his crew to their duty, he appeared
no more elated with his success than he had been
daunted by the storm which, a minute before, had
threatened the utter dissolution of his authority.
Instead
of pursuing his further purpose in haste, he
awaited the observance of the minutest form which
etiquette, as well as use, had rendered customary on
such occasions.
The officers approached, and reported their
several
divisions in readiness to engage, with exactly the
same regularity as if an enemy had been in sight.
The topmen and sail-trimmers were enumerated,
and found prepared; shot-plugs and stoppers were
handled; the magazine was even opened; the
armchests
emptied of their contents; and, in short, far
more than the ordinary preparations of an every day
exercise was observed.
Let the yards be slung; the sheets and halyards
stoppered, he said to the first lieutenant, who now
displayed as intimate an acquaintance with the
military
as he had hitherto discovered with the nautical
part of his profession; Give the boarders their
pikes and boarding-axes, sir; we will now show these
fellows that we dare to trust them with arms!
These several orders were obeyed to the letter;
and then succeeded that deep and grave silence
which renders a crew, at quarters, a sight so
imposing
,
even to those who have witnessed it from their
boyhood. In this manner, the skilful leader of this
band of desperate marauders knew how to curb
their violence with the fetters of discipline. When
he believed their minds brought within the
proper
limits, by the situation of restraint in which
he had placed them, where they well knew that a
word, or even a look, of offence would be met by an
instant as well as an awful punishment, he walked
apart with Wilder, of whom he demanded an
explanation
of what had passed.
Whatever might have been the natural tendency
of our adventurer to mercy, he had not been
educated
on the sea to look with lenity on the crime of
mutiny. Had his recent escape from the wreck of
the Bristol trader been already banished from his
mind, the impressions of a whole life still remained
to teach the necessity of keeping tight those cords
which experience has so often proved are absolutely
necessary to quell such turbulent bands, when
removed
from the pale of society, the influence of
woman, and when excited by the constant collision
of tempers rudely provoked, and equally disposed
to violence. Though he set down naught in
malice, it is certain that he did nothing extenuate,
in the account he rendered. The whole of the facts
were laid before the Rover in the direct,
unvarnished
language of truth.
One cannot keep these fellows to their duty by
preaching, returned the irregular chief, when the
other had done. We have no `Execution Dock'
for our delinquents, no `yellow flag' for fleets to gaze
at, no grave and wise-looking courts to thumb a book
or two, and end by saying, `Hang him.'The
rascals
knew my eye was off them. Once before, they
turned my vessel into a living evidence of that
passage
in the Testament which teaches humility to all,
by telling us, `that the last shall be first, and the first
last.' I found a dozen roundabouts drinking and
making free with the liquors of the cabin, and all
the officers prisoners forwarda state of things, as
you will allow, a little subversive of decency as
well as decorum!
I am amazed you should have succeeded in
restoring
discipline!
I got among them single-handed, and with no
other aid than a boat from the shore; but I ask no
more than a place for my foot, and room for an
arm, to keep a thousand such spirits in order. Now
they know me, it is rare we misunderstand each
other.
You must have punished severely!
There was justice done.Mr Wilder, I fear you
find our service a little irregular; but a month of
experience
will put you on a level with us, and remove
all danger of such another scene. As the Rover
spoke, he faced his recruit, with a countenance that
endeavoured to be cheerful, but whose gaiety could
force itself no further than a frightful smile. Come,
he quickly added, this time, I set the mischief
afoot myself; and, as you see we are completely
masters, we may afford to be lenient. Besides, he
continued, glancing his eyes towards the place where
Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude still remained in deep
suspense
,
awaiting his decision, it may be well to
consult
the sex of our guests at such a moment.
Then, leaving his subordinate, the Rover
advanceed
to the centre of the quarter-deck, whither he
immediately
summoned the principal offenders. The
men listened to his rebukes, which were not
altogether
free from admonitory warnings of what might
be the consequences of a similar transgression, like
creatures who stood in presence of a being of a
nature
superior to their own. Though he spoke in his
usual quiet tone, the lowest of his syllables went
into the ears of the most distant of the crew; and,
when his brief lesson was ended, the men stood
before
him not only like delinquents who had been
reproved
though pardoned, but with the air of
criminals
who were as much condemned by their own
consciousness as by the general voice. Among them
all was only one seaman who, perhaps from past
service
,
was emboldened to venture a syllable in his
own justification.
As for the matter with the marines, he said,
your Honour knows there is little love between us,
though certain it is a quarter-deck is no place to
settle
our begrudgings; but, as to the gentleman who
has seen fit to step into the shoes of
It is my pleasure that he should remain there,
hastily interrupted his Commander. Of his merit
I alone can judge.
Well, well, since it is your pleasure, sir, why,
no man can dispute it. But no account has been
rendered of the Bristol-man, and great expectations
were had aboard here from that very ship. Your
Honour is a reasonable gentleman, and will not be
surprised that people, who are on the look-out for
an outward-bound West-Indiaman, should be
unwilling
to take up with a battered and empty launch, in
her stead.
G 2
Ay, sir, if I will it, you shall take an oar, a
tiller
,
a thole, for your portion. No more of this!
You saw the condition of his ship with your own
eyes; and where is the seaman who has not, on
some evil day, been compelled to admit that his art
is nothing, when the elements are against him? Who
saved this ship, in the very gust that has robbed us
of our prize? Was it your skill? or was it that of a
man who has often done it before, and who may one
day leave you to your ignorance to manage your own
interests? It is enough that I believe him faithful.
There is no time to convince your dulness of the
propriety of all that's done. Away, and send me
the two men who so nobly stepped between their
officer and mutiny.
Then came Fid, followed by the negro, rolling
along the deck, and thumbing his hat with one hand,
while the other sought an awkward retreat in a part
of his vestments.
You have done well, my lad; you and your
messmate
No messmate, your Honour, seeing that he is a
nigger, interrupted Fid. The chap messes with
the other blacks, but we take a pull at the can, now
and then, in company.
Your friend, then, if you prefer that term.
Ay, ay, sir; we are friendly enough at odd times,
though a breeze often springs up between us. Guinea
has a dd awkward fashion of luffing up in his
talk; and your Honour knows it isn't always
comfortable
to a white man to be driven to leeward by
a black. I tell him it is inconvenient. He is a good
enough fellow in the main, howsomever, sir; and,
as he is just an African bred and born, I hope you'll
be good enough to overlook his little failings.
Were I otherwise disposed, returned the Rover,
his steadiness and activity to-day would plead in
his favour.
Yes, yes, sir, he is somewhat steady, which is
more than I can always say in my own behalf. Then,
as for seamanship, there are few men who are his
betters; I wish your Honour would take the trouble
to walk forward, and look at the heart he turned in
the mainstay, no later than the last calm; it takes
the strain as easy as a small sin sits upon a rich
man's conscience.
I am satisfied with your description; you call
him Guinea?
Call him by any thing along that coast; for he is
noway particular, seeing he was never christened,
and knows nothing at all of the bearings and
distances
of religion. His lawful name is S'ip, or Shipio
Africa, taken, as I suppose, from the circumstance
that he was first shipp'd from that quarter of the
world. But, as respects names, the fellow is as meek
as a lamb; you may call him any thing, provided you
don't call him too late to his grog.
All this time, the African stood, rolling his large
dark eyes in every direction except towards the
speakers, perfectly content that his long-tried
shipmate
should serve as his interpreter. The spirit
which had, so recently, been awakened in the Rover
seemed already to be subsiding; for the haughty
frown, which had gathered on his brow, was
dissipating
in a look which bore rather the character of
curiosity than any fiercer emotion.
You have sailed long in company, my lads, he
carelessly continued, addressing his words to neither
of them in particular.
Full and by, in many a gale, and many a calm,
your Honour. 'Tis four-and-twenty years the last
equinox, Guinea, since master Harry fell across our
hawse; and, then, we had been together three years
in the `Thunderer,' besides the run we made round
the Horn, in the `Bay' privateer.
Ah! you have been four-and-twenty years with
Mr Wilder? It is not so remarkable that you should
set a value on his life.
I should as soon think of setting a price on the
King's crown! interrupted the straight-going
seaman
.
I overheard the lads, d'ye see, sir, just
plotting
to throw the three of us overboard, and so we
thought it time to say something in our own favour;
and, words not always being at hand, the black saw
fit to fill up the time with something that might
answer
the turn quite as well. No, no, he is no great
talker, that Guinea; nor, for that matter, can I say
much in my own favour in this particular; but,
seeing
that we clapp'd a stopper on their movements,
your Honour will allow that we did as well as if we
had spoken as smartly as a young midshipman fresh
from college, who is always for hailing a top in
Latin, you know, sir, for want of understanding the
proper language.
The Rover smiled, and he glanced his eye aside,
apparently in quest of the form of our adventurer.
Not seeing him at hand, he was tempted to push his
covert inquiries a little further, though too much
governed, by self-respect, to let the intense curiosity
by which he was influenced escape him in any
direct
and manifest interrogation. But an instant's
recollection
recalled him to himself, and he discarded
the idea as unworthy of his character.
Your services shall not be forgotten. Here is
gold, he said, offering a handful of the metal to the
negro, as the one nearest his own person. You
will divide it, like honest shipmates; and you may
ever rely on my protection.
Scipio drew back, and, with a motion of his
elbow
,
replied,
His Honour will give 'em masser Harry.
Your master Harry has it of his own, lad; he
has no need of money.
A S'ip no need 'em eider.
You will please to overlook the fellow's
manners
,
sir, said Fid, very coolly interposing his own
hand, and just as deliberately pocketing the offering;
but I needn't tell as old a seaman as your Honour,
that Guinea is no country to scrape down the seams
of a man's behaviour in. Howsomever, I can say
this much for him, which is, that he thanks your
Honour just as heartily as if you had given him twice
the sum. Make a bow to his Honour, boy, and do
some credit to the company you have kept. And
now, since this little difficulty about the money is
gotten over, by my presence of mind, with your
Honour's leave, I'll just step aloft, and cast loose
the lashings of that bit of a tailor on the larboard
fore-yard-arm. The chap was never made for a
topman
,
as you may see, sir, by the fashion in which he
crosses his lower stanchions. That fellow will make
a carrick bend with his legs as easily as I could do
the same with a yarn of white line!
The Rover signed for him to retire; and, turning
where he stood, he found himself confronted by
Wilder. The eyes of the confederates met; and a
slight colour bespoke the consciousness of the
former
.
Regaining his self-possession on the instant,
however, he smilingly alluded to the character of
Fid; and then, with an air of authority, he directed
his lieutenant to have the retreat from quarters
beat.
The guns were secured, the stoppers loosened,
the magazine closed, the ports lashed, and the crew
withdrew to their several ordinary duties, like men
whose violence had been completely subdued by the
triumphant influence of a master spirit. The Rover
then disappeared from the deck, which, for a time,
was left to the care of an officer of the proper
station
.
CHAPTER V.
Thief
. 'Tis in the malice of mankind, that he thus advises us;
not to have us thrive in our mystery.
Timon of Athens
.
Throughout
the whole of that day, no change
occurred in the weather. The sleeping ocean lay
like a waving and glittering mirror, smooth and
polished
on its surface, though, as usual, the long rising
and falling of a heavy ground-swell announced the
commotion that was in action within some distant
horizon. From the time that he left the deck, until
the sun laved its burnished orb in the sea, the
individual
,
who so well knew how to keep alive his
authority
among the untamed tempers that he governed,
was seen no more. Satisfied with his victory, he no
longer seemed to apprehend that it was possible any
should be bold enough to dare to plot the overthrow
of his power. This apparent confidence in himself
did not fail to impress his people favourably. As no
neglect of duty was overlooked, nor any offence left
to go unpunished, an eye, that was not seen, was
believed
by the crew to be ever on them, and an
invisible
hand was thought to be at all times uplifted, ready
to strike or to reward. It was by a similar system
of energy in moments of need, and of forbearance
when authority was irksome, that this extraordinary
man had so long succeeded, as well in keeping down
domestic treason, as in eluding the utmost address
and industry of his open enemies.
When the watch was set for the night, however,
and the ship lay in the customary silence of the hour,
the form of the Rover was again seen walking swiftly
to and fro across the poop, of which he was now the
solitary occupant. The vessel had drifted in the
stream of the Gulf so far to the northward, that the
little mound of blue had long sunk below the edge
of the ocean; and she was again surrounded, so far
as human eye might see, by an interminable world
of water. As not a breath of air was stirring, the
sails had been handed, the tall and naked spars
rearing
themselves, in the gloom of the evening, like
those of a ship which rested at her anchors. In short,
it was one of those hours of entire repose that the
elements occasionally grant to such adventurers as
trust their fortunes to the capricious government of
the treacherous and unstable winds.
Even the men, whose duty it was to be on the alert,
were emboldened, by the general tranquillity, to
become
careless on their watch, and to cast their
persons
between the guns, or on different portions of the
vessel, seeking that rest which the forms of discipline
and good order prohibited them from enjoying in
their hammocks. Here and there, indeed, the head
of a drowsy officer was seen nodding with the lazy
heaving of the ship, as he leaned against the bulwarks,
or rested his person on the carriage of some gun that
was placed beyond the sacred limits of the
quarter-deck
.
One form alone stood erect, vigilant, and
evidently
maintaining a watchful eye over the whole:
This was Wilder, whose turn to keep the deck had
again arrived, in the regular division of the service
of the officers.
For two hours, not the slightest communication
occurred between the Rover and his lieutenant.
Both rather avoided than sought the intercourse; for
each had his own secret sources of serious meditation.
At the end of that period of silence, the former
stopped
short in his walk, and looked long and steadily
at the still motionless, figure on the deck beneath him.
Mr Wilder, he at length said, the air is fresher
on this poop, and more free from the impurities of
the vessel: Will you ascend?
The other complied; and, for several minutes,
they walked silently, and with even steps, together,
as seamen are wont to move in the hours of deep
night.
We had a troublesome morning, Wilder, the
Rover resumed, unconsciously betraying the subject
of his thoughts, and speaking always in a voice so
guarded, that no ears, but his to whom he addressed
himself, might embrace the sound: Were you ever
so near that pretty precipice, a mutiny, before?
The man who is hit is nigher to danger than he
who feels the wind of the ball.
Ah! you have then been bearded in your ship!
Give yourself no uneasiness on account of the
personal
animosity which a few of the fellows saw fit
to manifest against yourself. I am acquainted with
their most secret thoughts, as you shall shortly know.
I confess, that, in your place, I should sleep on a
thorny pillow, with such evidences of the temper of
my men before my mind. A few hours of disorder
might deliver the vessel, on any day, into the hands
of the Government, and your own life to
The executioner! And why not yours?
demanded
the Rover, so quickly, as to give, in a slight
degree
,
an air of distrust to his manner. But the eye
that has often seen battles seldom winks. Mine has
too often, and too steadily, looked danger in the face,
to be alarmed at the sight of a King's pennant.
Besides
,
it is not usual for us to be much on this ticklish
coast; the islands, and the Spanish Main, are less
dangerous cruising grounds.
And yet have you ventured here at a time when
success against the enemy has given the Admiral
leisure
to employ a powerful force in your pursuit.
I had a reason for it. It is not always easy to
separate the Commander from the man. If I have
temporarily forgotten the obligations of the former,
in the wishes of the latter, so far, at least, harm has
not come of it. I may have tired of chasing your
indolent
Don, and of driving guarda costas into port.
This life of ours is full of excitement which I love;
to me, there is interest even in a mutiny!
I like not treason. In this particular, I confess
myself like the boor who loses his resolution in the
dark. While the enemy is in view, I hope you will
find me true as other men; but sleeping over a mine
is not an amusement to my taste.
So much for want of practice! Hazard is
hazard
,
come in what shape it may; and the human
mind can as readily be taught to be indifferent to
secret
machinations as to open risk. Hush! Struck
the bell six, or seven?
Seven. You see the men slumber, as before.
Instinct
would wake them, were their hour at hand.
'Tis well. I feared the time had passed. Yes,
Wilder, I love suspense; it keeps the faculties from
dying, and throws a man upon the better principles
of his nature. Perhaps I owe it to a wayward spirit,
but, to me, there is enjoyment in an adverse wind.
And, in a calm?
Calms may have their charms for your quiet
spirits; but in them there is nothing to be overcome.
One cannot stir the elements, though one may
counteract
their workings.
You have not entered on this trade of yours
Yours!
I might, now, have said `of ours,' since I too
have become a Rover.
You are still in your noviciate, resumed the
other, whose quick mind had already passed the point
at which the conversation had arrived; and high
enjoyment had I in being the one who shrived you in
your wishes. You manifested a skill in playing round
your subject, without touching it, which gives me
hopes of an apt scholar.
But no penitent, I trust.
That as it may be; we are all liable to our
moments
of weakness, when we look on life as
book-men
Vol. II. H
paint it, and think of being probationers where
we are put to enjoy. Yes, I angled for you as the
fisherman plays with the trout. Nor did I overlook
the danger of deception. You were faithful on the
whole; though I protest against your ever again
acting
so much against my interests as to intrigue to keep
the game from coming to my net.
When, and how, have I done this? You have
yourself admitted
That the `Royal Caroline' was prettily handled,
and wrecked by the will of Heaven. I speak of
nobler quarries, now, than such as any hawk may fly
at. Are you a woman-hater, that you would fain
have frightened the noble-minded woman, and the
sweet girl, who are beneath our feet at this minute,
from enjoying the high privilege of your company?
Was it treacherous, to wish to save a woman from
a fate like that, for instance, which hung over them
both this very day? For, while your authority exists
in this ship, I do not think there can be danger, even
to her who is so lovely.
By heavens, Wilder, you do me no more than
justice. Before harm should come to that fair
innocent
,
with this hand would I put the match into the
magazine, and send her, all spotless as she is, to the
place from which she seems to have fallen.
Our adventurer listened greedily to these words,
though he little liked the strong language of
admiration
with which the Rover was pleased to clothe his
generous sentiment.
How knew you of my wish to serve them? he
demanded, after a pause, which neither seemed in
any hurry to break.
Could I mistake your language? I thought it
plain enough when spoken.
Spoken! exclaimed Wilder, in surprise.
Perhaps
part of my confession was then made when I
least believed it.
The Rover did not answer; but his companion
saw, by the meaning smile which played about his
lip, that he had been the dupe of an audacious and
completely successful masquerade. Startled, perhaps
at discovering how intricate were the toils into
which he had rushed, and possibly vexed at being so
thoroughly over-reached, he made several turns
across the deck before he again spoke.
I confess myself deceived, he at length said,
and henceforth I shall submit to you as a master
from whom one may learn, but who can never be
surpassed. The landlord of the `Foul Anchor,' at
least, acted in his proper person, whoever might have
been the aged seaman?
Honest Joe Joram! An useful man to a
distressed
mariner, you must allow. How liked you the
Newport pilot?
Was he an agent too?
For the job merely. I trust such knaves no
further
than their own eyes can see. But, hist! Heard
you nothing?
I thought a rope had fallen in the water.
Ay, it is so. Now you shall find how thoroughly
I overlook these turbulent gentlemen.
The Rover then cut short the dialogue, which was
growing deeply interesting to his companion, and
moved, with a light step, to the stern, over which he
hung, for a few moments, by himself, like a man who
found a pleasure in gazing at the dark surface of the
sea. But a slight noise, like that produced by agitated
ropes, caught the ear of his companion, who
instantly
placed himself at the side of his Commander,
where he did not wait long without gaining another
proof of the manner in which he, as well as all the
rest of the crew, were circumvented by the devices
of their leader.
A man was guardedly, and, from his situation, with
some difficulty, moving round the quarter of the ship,
by the aid of the ropes and mouldings, which
afforded
him sufficient means to effect his object. He,
however, soon reached a stern ladder, where he
stood suspended, and evidently endeavouring to
discern
which of the two forms, that were overlooking
his proceedings, was that of the individual he sought.
Are you there, Davis? said the Rover, in a
voice but little above a whisper, first laying his hand
lightly on Wilder, as though he would tell him to
attend. I fear you have been seen or heard.
No fear of that, your Honour. I got out at the
port by the cabin bulkhead; and the after-guard are
all as sound asleep as if they had the watch below.
It is well. What news bring you from the
people?
Lord! your Honour may tell them to go to
church, and the stoutest sea-dog of them all wouldn't
dare to say he had forgotten his prayers.
You think them in a better temper than they
were?
I know it, sir: Not but what the will to work
mischief is to be found in two or three of the men;
but they dare not trust each other. Your Honour
has such winning ways with you, that one never
knows when he is on safe grounds in setting up to
be master.
Ay, this is ever the way with your disorganizers,
muttered the Rover, just loud enough to be heard by
Wilder. A little more honesty, than they possess,
is just wanted, in order that each may enjoy the
faith of his neighbour. And how did the fellows
receive
the lenity? Did I well? or must the morning
bring its punishment?
It is better as it stands, sir. The people know
whose memory is good, and they talk already of the
danger of adding another reckoning to this they feel
certain you have not forgotten. There is the captain
of the forecastle, who is a little bitter, as usual, and
the more so just now, on account of the knock-down
he got from the fist of the black.
Ay, he is ever troublesome; a settling day must
come at last with the rogue.
It will be a small matter to expend him in
boatservice
,
sir; and the ship's company will be all the
better for his absence.
Well, well; no more of him, interrupted the
Rover, a little impatiently, as if he liked not that
his companion should look too deeply into the policy
of his government, so early in his initiation. I will
see to him. If I mistake not, fellow, you over-acted
your own part to-day, and were a little too forward
in leading on the trouble.
I hope your Honour will remember that the
crew had been piped to mischief; besides, there
could be no great harm in washing the powder off
a few marines.
Ay, but you pressed the point after your officer
had seen fit to interfere. Be wary in future, lest you
make the acting too true to nature, and you get
applauded
in a manner quite as well performed.
The fellow promised caution and amendment; and
then he was dismissed, with his reward in gold, and
with an injunction to be secret in his return. So
soon as the interview was ended, the Rover and
Wilder resumed their walk; the former having made
sure that no evesdropper had been at hand to steal
into his mysterious connexion with the spy. The
silence was again long, thoughtful, and deep.
Good ears (recommenced the Rover) are
nearly as important, in a ship like this, as a stout
heart. The rogues forward must not be permitted
to eat of the fruit of knowledge, lest we, who are in
the cabins, die.
This is a perilous service in which we are
embarked
,
observed his companion, by a sort of
involuntary
exposure of his secret thoughts.
H 2
The Rover remained silent, making many turns
across the deck, before he again opened his lips.
When he spoke, it was in a voice so bland and
gentle
,
that his words sounded more like the admonitory
tones of a considerate friend, than like the language
of a man who had long been associated with a set
of beings so rude and unprincipled as those with
whom he was now seen.
You are still on the threshold of your life, Mr
Wilder, he said, and it is all before you to choose
the path on which you will go. As yet, you have
been present at no violation of what the world calls
its laws; nor is it too late to say you never will be.
I may have been selfish in my wish to gain you; but
try me; and you will find that self, though often
active
,
cannot, nor does not, long hold its dominion
over my mind. Say but the word, and you are free;
it is easy to destroy the little evidence which exists
of your having made one of my crew. The land is
not far beyond that streak of fading light; before
to-morrow's
sun shall set, your foot may tread it.
Then, why not both? If this irregular life be
evil for me, it is the same for you. Could I hope
What would you say? calmly demanded the
Rover, after waiting sufficiently long to be sure his
companion hesitated to continue. Speak freely
your words are for the ears of a friend.
Then, as a friend will I unbosom myself. You
say, the land is here in the west. It would be easy
for you and I, men nurtured on the sea, to lower
this boat into the water; and, profiting by the dark
ness, long ere our absence could be known, we
should be lost to the eye of any who might seek us.
Whither would you steer?
To the shores of America, where shelter and
peace might be found in a thousand secret places.
Would you have a man, who has so long lived a
prince among his followers, become a beggar in a
land of strangers?
But you have gold. Are we not masters here?
Who is there that might dare even to watch our
movements, until we were pleased ourselves to throw
off the authority with which we are clothed? Ere
the middle watch was set, all might be done.
Alone! Would you go alone?
Nonot entirelythat isit would scarcely
become us, as men, to desert the females to the
brutal
power of those we should leave behind.
And would it become us, as men, to desert those
who put faith in our fidelity? Mr Wilder, your
proposal
would make me a villain! Lawless, in the
opinion of the world, have I long been; but a
traitor
to my faith and plighted word, never! The hour
may come when the beings whose world is in this
ship shall part; but the separation must be open,
voluntary, and manly. You never knew what drew
me into the haunts of man, when we first met in the
town of Boston?
Never, returned Wilder, in a tone of deep
disappointment
.
Listen, and you shall hear. A sturdy follower had
fallen into the hands of the minions of the law. It
was necessary to save him. He was a man I little
loved, but he was one who had ever been honest,
after his opinions. I could not desert the victim;
nor could any but I effect his escape. Gold and
artifice
succeeded; and the fellow is now here, to sing
the praises of his Commander to the crew. Could
I forfeit a good name, obtained at so much hazard?
You would forfeit the good opinions of knaves,
to gain a reputation among those whose
commendations
are an honour.
I know not. You little understand the nature
of man, if you are now to learn that he has pride in
maintaining a reputation for even vice, when he has
once purchased notoriety by its exhibition. Besides,
I am not fitted for the world, as it is found among
your dependant colonists.
You claim your birth, perhaps, in the mother
country?
I am no better than a poor provincial, sir; an
humble satellite of the mighty sun. You have seen
my flags, Mr Wilder:but there was one wanting
among them all; ay, and one which, had it existed,
it would have been my pride, my glory, to have
upheld
with my heart's best blood!
I know not what you mean.
I need not tell a seaman, like you, how many
noble rivers pour their waters into the sea along this
coast of which we have been speakinghow many
wide and commodious havens abound thereor how
many sails whiten the ocean, that are manned by
men who first drew breath on that spacious and
peaceful soil.
Surely I know the advantages of the country you
mean.
I fear not! quickly returned the Rover. Were
they known, as they should be, by you and others
like you, the flag I mentioned would soon be found
in every sea; nor would the natives of our country
have to succumb to the hirelings of a foreign prince.
I will not affect to misunderstand your meaning;
for I have known others as visionary as yourself in
fancying that such an event may arrive.
May!As certain as that star will settle in the
ocean, or that day is to succeed to night, it
must
.
Had that flag been abroad, Mr Wilder, no man would
have ever heard the name of the Red Rover.
The King has a service of his own, and it is
open to all his subjects alike.
I could be a subject of a King; but to be the
subject of a subject, Wilder, exceeds the bounds of
my poor patience. I was educated, I might almost
have said born, in one of his vessels; and how often
have I been made to feel, in bitterness, that an ocean
separated my birth-place from the footstool of his
throne! Would you think it, sir? one of his
Commanders
dared to couple the name of my country
with an epithet I will not wound your ear by
repeating
!
I hope you taught the scoundrel manners.
The Rover faced his companion, and there was
a ghastly smile on his speaking features, as he
answered
,
He never repeated the offence! 'Twas his blood
or mine; and dearly did he pay the forfeit of his
brutality!
You fought like men, and fortune favoured the
injured party?
We fought, sir.But I had dared to raise my
hand against a native of the holy isle!It is enough,
Mr Wilder; the King rendered a faithful subject
desperate
,
and he has had reason to repent it. Enough
for the present; another time I may say more.Good
night.
Wilder saw the figure of his companion descend
the ladder to the quarter-deck; and then was he left
to pursue the current of his thoughts, alone, during
the remainder of a watch which, to his impatience,
seemed without an end.
CHAPTER VI.
She made good view of me; indeed so much,
That sure, methought, her eyes had lost her tongue,
For she did speak in starts, distractedly.
Twelfth Night
.
Though
most of the crew of the Dolphin
slept, either in their hammocks or among the guns,
there were bright and anxious eyes still open in a
different part of the vessel. The Rover had
relinquished
his cabin to Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude, from
the moment they entered the ship; and we shall shift
the scene to that apartment, (already sufficiently
described
to render the reader familiar with the objects
it contained), resuming the action of the tale at an
early part of the discourse just related in the
preceding
chapter.
It will not be necessary to dwell upon the feelings
with which the female inmates of the vessel had
witnessed the disturbances of that day; the
conjectures
and suspicions to which they gave rise may be
apparent in what is about to follow. A mild, soft
light fell from the lamp of wrought and massive
silver
,
that was suspended from the upper deck,
obliquely
upon the painfully pensive countenance of
the governess, while a few of its strongest rays
lighted
the youthful bloom, though less expressive
because
less meditative lineaments, of her companion.
The back-ground was occupied, like a dark shadow
in a picture, by the dusky form of the slumbering
Cassandra. At the moment when we see fit to lift
the curtain on this quiet scene of our drama, the
pupil was speaking, seeking, in the averted eyes of
her instructress, that answer to her question which
the tongue of the latter appeared reluctant to accord.
I repeat, my dearest Madam, said Gertrude,
that the fashion of these ornaments, no less than
their materials, is extraordinary in a ship.
And what would you infer from the same?
I know not. Still I would that we were safe in
the house of my father.
God grant it! It may be imprudent to be longer
silentGertrude, frightful, horrible suspicions have
been engendered in my mind by what we have this
day witnessed.
The cheek of the maiden blanched, and the pupil
of her soft eye contracted, with alarm, while she
seemed to demand an explanation with every
disturbed
lineament of her countenance.
I have long been familiar with the usages of a
vessel of war, continued the governess, who had
only paused in order to review the causes of her
suspicions in her own mind; but never have I seen
such customs as, each hour, unfold themselves in
this vessel.
Of what do you suspect her?
The look of deep, engrossing, maternal anxiety,
that the lovely interrogator received in reply to this
question, might have startled one whose mind had
been more accustomed to muse on the depravity of
human nature than the spotless being who received
it; but to Gertrude it conveyed no more than a
general
and vague sensation of alarm.
Why do you thus regard me, my governessmy
mother? she exclaimed, bending forward, and
laying
a hand imploringly on the arm of the other, as
if she would arouse her from a trance.
Yes, I will speak: It is safer that you know the
worst, than that your innocence should be liable to
be abused. I distrust the character of this ship, and
of all that belong to her.
All! repeated her pupil, gazing fearfully, and a
little wildly, around.
Yes; of all.
There may be wicked and evil-intentioned men
in his Majesty's fleet; but we are surely safe from
them, since fear of punishment, if not fear of
disgrace
,
will be our protector.
I dread lest we find that the lawless spirits, who
harbour here, submit to no laws except those of their
own enacting, nor acknowledge any authority but
that which exists among themselves.
This would make them pirates!
And pirates, I fear, we shall find them.
Pirates? What! all?
Even all. Where one is guilty of such a crime,
it is clear that the associates cannot be free from
suspicion.
But, dear Madam, we know that one among
them, at least, is innocent; since he came with
ourselves
,
and under circumstances that will not admit
of deception.
I know not. There are different degrees of
turpitude
,
as there are different tempers to commit it!
I fear that all who may lay claim to be honest, in
this vessel, are here assembled.
The eyes of Gertrude sunk to the floor, and her
lips quivered, partly in a tremour she could not
control
,
and perhaps in part through an emotion that
she found inexplicable to herself.
Since we know whence our late companion
came, she said, in an under tone, I think you do
him wrong, however right your suspicions may prove
as to the rest.
I may be wrong as to him, but it is important
that we know the worst. Command yourself, my
love; our attendant ascends; some knowledge of
the truth may be gained from him.
Mrs Wyllys gave her pupil an expressive sign to
compose her features, while she herself resumed her
usual, pensive air, with a calmness of mien that
might have deceived one far more practised than the
boy, who now came slowly into the cabin. Gertrude
buried her face in a part of her attire, while the
former addressed the individual who had just
entered
,
in a tone equally divided between kindness and
concern.
Roderick, child, she commenced, your
eyelids
are getting heavy. This service of a ship must
be new to you?
It is so old as to keep me from sleeping on my
watch, coldly returned the boy.
A careful mother would be better for one of
your years, than the school of the boatswain. What
is your age, Roderick?
I have seen years enough to be both wiser and
better, he answered, not without a shade of thought
settling on his brow. Another month will make
me twenty.
Twenty! you trifle with my curiosity, urchin.
Did I say twenty, Madam! Fifteen would be
nearer to the truth.
I believe you well. And how many of those
years have you passed upon the water?
But two, in truth; though I often think them
ten; and yet there are times when they seem but a
day!
You are romantic early, boy. And how like you
the trade of war?
War!
Of war. I speak plainly, do I not? Those who
serve in a vessel that is constructed expressly for
battle, follow the trade of war.
Oh! yes; war is certainly our trade.
And have you yet seen any of its horrors? Has
this ship been in combat since your service?
This ship!
Surely this ship: Have you ever sailed in
another
?
Never.
Vol. II. I
Then, it is of this ship that one must question
you. Is prize-money plenty among your crew?
Abundant; they never want.
Then the vessel and Captain are both favourites.
The sailor loves the ship and Commander that give
him an active life.
Ay, Madam; our lives are active here. And some
there are among us, too, who love both ship and
Commander.
And have you mother, or friend, to profit by
your earnings?
Have I
Struck with the tone of stupor with which the boy
responded to her queries, the governess turned, her
head, to read, in a rapid glance, the language of his
countenance. He stood in a sort of senseless
amazement
,
looking her full in the face, but with an eye
far too vacant to prove that he was sensible of the
image that filled it.
Tell me, Roderick, she continued, careful not
to alarm his jealousy by any sudden allusion to his
manner; tell me of this life of yours. You find it
merry?
I find it sad.
'Tis strange. The young ship-boys are ever
among the merriest of mortals. Perhaps your officer
treats you with severity.
No answer was given.
I am then right: Your Captain is a tyrant?
You are wrong: Never has he said harsh or
unkind
word to me.
Ah! then he is gentle and kind. You are very
happy, Roderick.
Ihappy, Madam!
I speak plainly, and in Englishhappy.
Oh! yes; we are all very happy here.
It is well. A discontented ship is no paradise.
And you are often in port, Roderick, to taste the
sweets of the land?
I care but little for the land, Madam, could I
only have friends in the ship that love me.
And have you not? Is not Mr Wilder your
friend?
I know but little of him; I never saw him
before
When, Roderick?
Before we met in Newport.
In Newport?
Surely you know we both came from Newport,
last.
Ah! I comprehend you. Then, your
acquaintance
with Mr Wilder commenced at Newport? It
was while your ship was lying off the fort?
It was. I carried him the order to take
command
of the Bristol trader. He had only joined us
the night before.
So lately! It was a young acquaintance indeed.
But I suppose your Commander knew his merits?
It is so hoped among the people. But
You were speaking, Roderick.
None here dare question the Captain for his
reasons
.
Even
I
am obliged to be mute.
Even
you!
exclaimed Mrs Wyllys, in a surprise
that for the moment overcame her self-restraint. But
the thought in which the boy was lost appeared to
prevent his observing the sudden change in her
manner
.
Indeed, so little did he know what was passing,
that the governess touched the hand of Gertrude,
and silently pointed out the insensible figure of the
lad, without the slightest apprehension that the
movement
would be observed.
What think you, Roderick, continued his
interrogator
,
would he refuse to answer
us
also?
The boy started; and, as consciousness shot into
his glance, it fell upon the soft and speaking
countenance
of Gertrude.
Though her beauty be so rare, he answered
with vehemence, let her not prize it too highly.
Woman cannot tame his temper!
Is he then so hard of heart? Think you that a
question from this fair one would be denied?
Hear me, Lady, he said, with an earnestness
that was no less remarkable than the plaintive
softness
of the tones in which he spoke; I have seen
more, in the last two crowded years of my life, than
many youths would witness between childhood and
the age of man. This is no place for innocence and
beauty. Oh! quit the ship, if you leave it as you
came, without a deck to lay your head under!
It may be too late to follow such advice, Mrs
Wyllys gravely replied, glancing her eye at the silent
Gertrude as she spoke. But tell me more of this
extraordinary vessel. Roderick, you were not born
to fill the station in which I find you?
The boy shook his head, but remained with
downcast eyes, apparently not disposed to answer
further on such a subject.
How is it that I find the `Dolphin' bearing
different
hues to-day from what she did yesterday? and
why is it that neither then, nor now, does she
resemble
,
in her paint, the slaver of Newport harbour?
And why is it, returned the boy, with a smile,
in which melancholy struggled powerfully with
bitterness
,
that none can look into the secret heart of
him who makes those changes at will? If all
remained
the same, but the paint of the ship, one might
still be happy in her!
Then, Roderick, you are not happy: Shall I
intercede
with Captain Heidegger for your discharge?
I could never wish to serve another.
How! Do you complain, and yet embrace your
fetters?
I complain not.
The governess eyed him closely; and, after a
moment's
pause, she continued,
Is it usual to see such riotous conduct among the
crew as we have this day witnessed?
It is not. You have little to fear from the
people
;
he who brought them under knows how to keep
them down.
They are enlisted by order of the King?
The King! Yes, he is surely a King who has no
equal.
But they dared to threaten the life of Mr
Wilder
.
Is a seaman, in a King's ship, usually so bold?
The boy glanced a look at Mrs Wyllys; as if he
would say, he understood her affected ignorance of
the character of the vessel, but again he chose to
continue silent.
Think you, Roderick, continued the governess,
who no longer deemed it necessary to pursue her
covert inquiries on that particular subject; think
you, Roderick, that the Rov that is, that Captain
Heidegger will suffer us to land at the first port
which offers?
Many have been passed since you reached the
ship.
Ay, many that are inconvenient; but, when one
shall be gained where his pursuits will allow his
ship to enter?
Such places are not common.
But, should it occur, do you not think he will
permit us to land? We have gold to pay him for his
trouble.
He cares not for gold. I never ask him for it,
that he does not fill my hand.
You must be happy, then. Plenty of gold will
compensate for a cold look at times.
Never! returned the boy, with quickness and
energy. Had I the ship filled with the dross, I
I2
would give it all to bring a look of kindness into his
eye.
Mrs Wyllys started, no less at the fervid manner
of the lad than at the language. Rising from her
seat, she approached nigher to him, and in a
situation
where the light of the lamp fell full upon his
lineaments. She saw the large drop that broke out
from beneath a long and silken lash, to roll down a
cheek which, though embrowned by the sun, was
deepening with a flush that gradually stole into it, as
her own gaze became more settled; and then her
eyes fell slowly and keenly along the person of the
lad, until they reached even the delicate feet, that
seemed barely able to uphold him. The usually
pensive
and mild countenance of the governess changed
to a look of cold regard, and her whole form appeared
to elevate itself, in chaste matronly dignity, as she
sternly asked,
Boy, have you a mother?
I know not, was the answer that came from
lips that scarcely severed to permit the smothered
sounds to escape.
It is enough; another time I will speak further
to you. Cassandra will in future do the service of
this cabin; when I have need of you, the gong shall
be touched.
The head of Roderick fell nearly to his bosom.
he shrunk from before that cold and searching eye
which followed his form, until it had disappeared
through the hatch, and whose look was then bent
rapidly, and not without a shade of alarm, on the
face of the wondering but silent Gertrude.
A gentle tap at the door broke in upon the flood
of reflection which was crowding on the mind of
the governess. She gave the customary answer; and,
before time was allowed for any interchange of ideas
between her and her pupil, the Rover entered.
CHAPTER VII.
I melt, and am not of stronger earth than others.
Coriolanus
.
The
females received their visiter with a restraint,
which will be easily understood when the subject of
their recent conversation is recollected. The sinking
of Gertrude's form was deep and hurried, but her
governess maintained the coldness of her air with
greater self-composure. Still, there was a gleaming
of powerful anxiety in the watchful glance that she
threw towards her guest, as though she would divine
the motive of the visit by the wanderings of his
changeful eye, even before his lips had parted in the
customary salute.
The countenance of the Rover himself was
thoughtful
to gravity. He bowed as he came within the
influence
of the lamp, and his voice was heard
muttering
some low and hasty syllables, that conveyed
no meaning to the ears of his listeners. Indeed, so
great was the abstraction in which he was lost, that
he had evidently prepared to throw his person on
the vacant divan, without explanation or apology,
like one who took possession of his own; though
recollection returned just in time to prevent this
breach of decorum. Smiling, and repeating his bow,
with a still deeper inclination, he advanced with
perfect
self-possession to the table, where he expressed
his fears that Mrs Wyllys might deem his visit
unseasonable
,
or perhaps not announced with sufficient
ceremony. During this short introduction his voice
was bland as woman's, and his mien courteous, as
though he actually felt himself an intruder in the
cabin of a vessel in which he was literally a monarch.
But, unseasonable as is the hour, he continued,
I should have gone to my cott with a
consciousness
of not having discharged all the duties of an
attentive and considerate host, had I forgotten to
reassure
you of the tranquillity of the ship, after the
scene you have this day witnessed. I have pleasure
in saying, that the humour of my people is already
expended, and that lambs, in their nightly folds, are
not more placid than they are at this minute in their
hammocks.
The authority that so promptly quelled the
disturbance
is happily ever present to protect us,
returned
the cautious governess; we repose entirely
on your discretion and generosity.
You have not misplaced your confidence. From
the danger of mutiny, at least, you are exempt.
And from all others, I trust.
This is a wild and fickle element we dwell on,
he answered, while he bowed an acknowledgment
for the politeness, and took the seat to which the
other invited him by a motion of the hand; but
you know its character, and need not be told that
we seamen are seldom certain of any of our
movements
.
I loosened the cords of discipline myself
to-day, he added, after a moment's pause, and in
some measure invited the broil that followed: But
it is passed, like the hurricane and the squall; and
the ocean is not now smoother than the tempers of
my knaves.
I have often witnessed these rude sports in
vessels
of the King; but I do not remember to have
known any more serious result than the settlement
of some ancient quarrel, or some odd freak of
nautical
humour, which has commonly proved as
harmless
as it has been quaint.
Ay; but the ship which often runs the hazards
of the shoals gets wrecked at last, muttered the
Rover. I rarely give the quarter-deck up to the
people, without keeping a vigilant watch on their
humours; butto-day
You were speaking of to-day.
Neptune, with his coarse devices, is no stranger
to you, Madam.
I have seen the God in times past.
'Twas thus I understood it;under the line?
And elsewhere.
Elsewhere! repeated the other, in a tone of
disappointment. Ay, the sturdy despot is to be
found in every sea; and hundreds of ships, and ships
of size too, are to be seen scorching in the calms of
the equator. It was idle to give the subject a second
thought.
You have been pleased to observe something
that has escaped my ear.
The Rover started; for he had rather muttered
than spoken the preceding sentence aloud. Casting
a swift and searching glance around him, as it might
be to assure himself that no impertinent listener had
found means to pry into the mysteries of a mind he
seldom saw fit to lay open to the free examination of
his associates, he regained his self-possession on the
instant, and resumed the discourse with a manner as
undisturbed as if it had received no interruption.
Yes, I had forgotten that your sex is often as
timorous as it is fair, he added, with a smile so
insinuating
and gentle, that the governess cast an
involuntary
and uneasy glance towards her charge,
or I might have been earlier with my assurance of
safety.
It is welcome even now.
And your young and gentle friend, he continued,
bowing openly to Gertrude, though he still addressed
his words to the governess; her slumbers will not
be the heavier for what has passed.
The innocent seldom find an uneasy pillow.
There is a holy and unsearchable mystery in
that truth: The innocent pillow their heads in quiet!
Would to God the guilty might find some refuge,
too, against the sting of thought! But we live in a
world, and a time, when men cannot be sure even
of themselves.
He then paused, and looked about him, with a
smile so haggard, that the anxious governess
unconsciously
drew nigher to her pupil, like one who sought,
and was willing to yield, protection against the
uncertain
designs of a maniac. Her visiter, however,
remained in a silence so long and deep, that she felt
the necessity of removing the awkward
embarrassment
of their situation, by speaking herself.
Do you find Mr Wilder as much inclined to
mercy as yourself? she asked. There would be
merit in his forbearance, since he appeared to be the
particular object of the anger of the mutineers.
And yet you saw he was not without his friends.
You witnessed the devotion of the men who stood
forth in his behalf?
I did; and find it remarkable that he should
have been able, in so short a time, to conquer thus
completely two so stubborn natures.
Four-and-twenty years make not an acquaintance
of a day!
And does their friendship bear so old a date?
I have heard that time counted between them.
It is very certain the youth is bound to those uncouth
companions of his by some extraordinary tie.
Perhaps
this is not the first of their services.
Mrs Wyllys looked grieved. Although prepared
to believe that Wilder was a secret agent of the
Rover
,
she had endeavoured to hope his connexion with
the freebooters was susceptible of some explanation
more favourable to his character. However he might
be implicated in the common guilt of those who
pursued the hazards of the reckless fortunes of that
proscribed ship, it was evident he bore a heart too
generous to wish to see her, and her young and
guileless charge, the victims of the licentiousness of
his associates. His repeated and mysterious warnings
no longer needed explanation. Indeed, all that had
been dark and inexplicable, both in the previous and
unaccountable glimmerings of her own mind, and
in the extraordinary conduct of the inmates of the
ship, was at each instant becoming capable of
solution
.
She now remembered, in the person and
countenance
of the Rover, the form and features of the
individual who had spoken the passing Bristol trader,
from the rigging of the slavera form which had
unaccountably haunted her imagination, during her
residence in his ship, like an image recalled from
some dim and distant period. Then she saw at once
the difficulty that Wilder might prove in laying open
a secret in which not only his life was involved, but
which, to a mind that was not hardened in vice,
involved
a penalty not less severethat of the loss of
their esteem. In short, a good deal of that which
the reader has found no difficulty in comprehending
was also becoming clear to the faculties of the
governess
,
though much still remained obscured in
doubts, that she could neither solve nor yet entirely
banish from her thoughts. On all these several points
she had leisure to cast a rapid glance; for her guest,
or host, whichever he might be called, seemed in
nowise disposed to interrupt her short and
melancholy
reverie.
It is wonderful, Mrs Wyllys at length resumed,
that beings so uncouth should be influenced by the
same attachments as those which unite the educated
and the refined.
It is wonderful, as you say, returned the other,
like one awakening from a dream. I would give
a thousand of the brightest guineas that ever came
from the mint of George II. to know the private
history of that youth.
Is he then a stranger to you? demanded
Gertrude
,
with the quickness of thought.
The Rover turned an eye on her, that was vacant
for the moment, but into which consciousness and
expression began to steal as he gazed, until the foot
of the governess was visibly trembling with the
nervous
excitement that pervaded her entire frame.
Who shall pretend to know the heart of man!
he answered, again inclining his head as it might be
in acknowledgment of her perfect right to far deeper
homage. All are strangers, till we can read their
most secret thoughts.
To pry into the mysteries of the human mind,
is a privilege which few possess, coldly remarked
the governess. The world must be often tried, and
thoroughly known, before we may pretend to judge
of the motives of any around us.
And yet it is a pleasant world to those who have
the heart to make it merry, cried the Rover, with
one of those startling transitions which marked his
manner. To him who is stout enough to follow the
beat of his humour, all is easy. Do you know, that
the true secret of the philosopher is not in living for
ever, but in living while you may. He who dies at
fifty, after a fill of pleasure, has had more of life
than he who drags his feet through a century,
bearing
the burden of the world's caprices, and afraid to
speak above his breath, lest, forsooth, his neighbour
should find that his words were evil.
And yet are there some who find their pleasure
in pursuing the practices of virtue.
'Tis lovely in your sex to say it, he answered,
with an air that the sensitive governess fancied was
gleaming with the growing licentiousness of a
freebooter
.
She would now gladly have dismissed her
visiter; but a certain flashing of the eye, and a
manner
that was becoming gay by a species of unnatural
effort, admonished her of the danger of offending
one who acknowledged no law but his own will.
Assuming a tone and a manner that were kind, while
they upheld the dignity of her sex, and pointing to
sundry instruments of music that formed part of
the heterogeneous furniture of the cabin, she
adroitly
turned the discourse, by saying,
One whose mind can be softened by harmony,
and whose feelings are so evidently alive to the
influence
of sweet sounds, should not decry the
pleasures
of virtue. This flute, and you guitar, both call
you master.
And, because of these flimsy evidences about my
person, you are willing to give me credit for the
accomplishments
you mention! Here is another
mistake
of miserable mortality! Seeming is the
every-day
robe of honesty. Why not give me credit for
kneeling, morning and night, before you glittering
bauble? he added, pointing to the diamond crucifix
which hung, as usual, near the door of his own
apartment
.
I hope, at least, that the Being, whose memory
is intended to be revived by that image, is not
without
your homage. In the pride of his strength and
prosperity, man may think lightly of the consolations
that can flow from a power superior to humanity;
but those who have oftenest proved their value feel
deepest the reverence which is their due.
The look of the governess had been averted
from her companion; but, filled with the profound
sentiment she uttered, her mild reflecting eye turned
to him again, as, in a tone that was subdued, in
respect
for the mighty Being whose attributes filled her
mind, she uttered the above simple sentiment. The
gaze she met was earnest and thoughtful as her own.
Lifting a finger, he laid it on her arm, with a motion
Vol. II. K
so light as to be scarcely perceptible, while he
asked,
Think you we are to blame, if our temperaments
meline more to evil than power is given to resist?
It is only those who attempt to walk the path of
life alone that stumble. I shall not offend your
manhood
,
if I ask, do you never commune with your
God?
It is long since that name has been heard in this
vessel, Lady, except to aid in that miserable scoffing
and profanity which simpler language made too dull.
But what is He, that unknown Deity, more than
what man, in his ingenuity, has seen fit to make
him?
`The fool hath said in his heart, there is no
God,'  she answered, in a voice so firm, that it
startled even the ears of one so long accustomed to
the turbulence and grandeur of his wild profession.
`Gird up now thy loins like a man; for I will
demand
of thee, and answer thou me. Where wast
thou when I laid the foundations of the earth?
Declare
,
if thou hast understanding.'
The Rover gazed long and silently on the flushed
countenance of the speaker. Bending his face in an unconscious manner aside, he said aloud,
evidently
rather giving utterance to his thoughts than
pursuing
the discourse,
Now, is there nothing more in this than what I
have often heard, and yet does it come over my
feelings
with the freshness of native air! Then rising,
he approached his mild and dignified companion,
adding, in tones but little above a whisper, Lady,
repeat those words; change not a syllable, nor vary
the slightest intonation of the voice, I pray thee.
Though amazed, and secretly alarmed at the
request
,
Mrs Wyllys complied; delivering the holy
language of the inspired writers with a fervour that
found its support in the strength of her own
emotions
.
Her auditor listened like a being enthralled.
For near a minute, neither eye nor attitude was
changed, but he stood at the feet of her who had so
simply and so powerfully asserted the majesty of
God, as motionless as the mast that rose behind him
through the decks of that vessel which he had so
long devoted to the purposes of his lawless life. It
was long after her accents had ceased to fall on his
ear, that he drew a deep respiration, and once again
opened his lips to speak.
This is re-treading the path of life at a stride,
he said, suffering his hand to fall upon that of his
companion. I know not why pulses, which in
common are like iron, beat so wildly and irregularly
now. Lady, this little and feeble hand might check
a temper that has so often braved the power of
His words suddenly ceased; for, as his eye
unconsciously
followed his hand, it rested on the still
delicate
,
but no longer youthful, member of the
governess
.
Drawing a sigh, like one who felt himself
awakened from an agreeable though complete
illusion
,
he turned away, leaving his sentence unfinished.
You would have music! he recklessly
exclaimed
aloud. Then music shall be heard, though
its symphony be rung upon a gong!
As he spoke, the wayward and vacillating being
we have been attempting to describe struck the
instrument
he named three blows, so quick and
powerfully
,
as to drown all other sensations in the
confusion
produced by the echoing din. Though deeply
mortified that he had so quickly escaped from the
influence
she had partially acquired, and secretly
displeased
at the unceremonious manner in which he
had seen fit to announce his independence again, the
governess was aware of the necessity of concealing
her sentiments.
This is certainly not the harmony I invited,
she said, so soon as the overwhelming sounds had
ceased to fill the ship; nor do I think it of a quality
to favour the slumbers of those who seek their
rest.
Fear nothing for them. The seaman sleeps with
his ear near the port whence the cannon bellows,
and awakes at the call of the hoatswain's whistle.
He is too deeply schooled in habit, to think he has
heard more than a note of the flute; stronger and
fuller than common, if you will, but still a sound that
has no interest for him. Another tap would have
sounded the alarm of fire; but these three touches
say no more than music. It was the signal for the
band. The night is still, and favourable for their art,
and we will listen to sweet sounds awhile.
His words were scarcely uttered before the low
chords of wind instruments were heard without,
where the men had probably stationed themselves by
some previous order of their Captain. The Rover
smiled, as if he exulted in this prompt proof of the
sort of despotic or rather magical power he wielded;
and, throwing his form on the divan, he sat listening
to the sounds which followed.
The strains which now rose upon the night, and
which spread themselves soft and melodiously abroad
upon the water, would in truth have done credit to
far more regular artists. The air was wild and
melancholy
,
and perhaps it was the more in accordance
with the present humour of the man for whose ear
it was created. Then, losing the former character,
the whole power of the music was concentrated in
softer and still gentler sounds, as if the genius who
had given birth to the melody had been pouring out
the feelings of his soul in pathos. The temper of
the Rover's mind answered to the changing
expression
of the music; and, when the strains were
sweetest
and most touching, he even bowed his head
likone
who wept.
Though secretly under the influence of the
harmony
themselves, Mrs Wyllys and her pupil could
but gaze on the singularly constituted being into
whose hands their evil fortune had seen fit to cast
them. The former was filled with admiration at the
fearful contrariety of those passions which could
reveal
themselves, in the same individual, under so
very different and so dangerous forms; while the
latter
,
judging with the indulgence and sympathy of
her years, was willing to believe that a man whose
emotions could be thus easily and kindly excited
was rather the victim of circumstances than the
creator of his own luckless fortune.
There is Italy in those strains, said the Rover,
when the last chord had died upon his ear; sweet,
indolent, luxurious, forgetful Italy! It has never
been your chance, Madam, to visit that land, so
mighty in its recollections, and so impotent in its
actual condition?
The governess made no reply; but, bowing her
head, in turn, her companions believed she was
submitting
also to the influence of the music. At length,
as though impelled by another changeful impulse, the
Rover advanced towards Gertrude, and, addressing
her with a courtesy that would have done credit to
a very different scene, he said, in the laboured
language
that characterised the politeness of the age,
One who in common speaks music should not
have neglected the gifts of nature. You sing?
Had Gertrude possessed the power he affected to
believe, her voice would have denied its services at
his call. Bending to his compliment, she murmured
her apologies in words that were barely audible. He
listened intently; but, without pressing a point that
it was easy to see was unwelcome, he turned away,
and gave the gong a light but startling tap.
Roderick, he continued, when the gentle
footstep
K 2
of the lad was heard upon the stairs that led
into the cabin below, do you sleep?
The answer was slow and smothered; and, of
course, in the negative.
Apollo was not absent at the birth of Roderick,
Madam. The lad can raise such sounds as have been
known to melt the stubborn feelings of a seaman.
Go, place yourself by the cabin door, good Roderick,
and bid the music run a low accompaniment to your
words.
The boy obeyed, stationing his slight form so much
in shadow, that the expression of his working
countenance
was not visible to these who sat within the
stronger light of the lamp. The instruments then
commenced a gentle symphony, which was soon
ended; and twice had they begun the air, but still
no voice was heard to mingle in the harmony.
Words, Roderick, words; we are but dull
interpreters
of the meaning of yon flutes.
Thus admonished of his duty, the boy began to
sing in a full, rich contralto voice, which betrayed a
tremour, however, that evidently formed no part of
the air. His words, so far as they might be distin
guished, ran as follows:
The land was lying broad and fair
Behind the western sea;
And holy solitude was there,
And sweetest liberty.
The ling'ring sun, at ev'ning, hung
A glorious orb, divinely beaming
On silent lake and tree;
And ruddy light was o'er all streaming,
Mark, man! for thee;
O'er valley, lake, and tree!
And now a thousand maidens stray,
Or range the echoing groves;
While, flutt'ring near, on pinions gay.
Fan twice ten thousand loves.
In that softt clime, at even time,
Hope says
Enough of this, Roderick, impatiently
interrupted
his master. There is too much of the
Corydon
in that song for the humour of a mariner. Sing
us of the sea and its pleasures, boy; and roll out
the strains in such a fashion as may suit a sailor's
fancy.
The lad continued mute, perhaps in disinclination
to the task, perhaps from utter inability to comply.
What, Roderick! does the muse desert thee?
or is memory getting dull? You see the child is
wilful
in his melody, and must sing of loves and
sun-shine
,
or he fails. Now touch us a stronger chord,
my men, and put life into your cadences, while I
troll a sea air for the honour of the ship.
The band took the humour of the moment from
their master, (for surely he well deserved the name),
sounding a powerful and graceful symphony, to
prepare
the listeners for the song of the Rover. Those
treacherous and beguiling tones which so often stole
into his voice when speaking, did not mislead
expectation
as to its powers. It proved to be at the
same time rich, full, deep, and melodious. Favoured
by these material advantages, and aided by an
exquisite
ear, he rolled out the following stanzas in a
manner that was singularly divided between that of
the reveller and the man of sentiment. The words
were probably original; for they both smacked
strongly of his own profession, and were not entirely
without a touch of the peculiar taste of the
individual
.
All hands, unmoor! unmoor!
Hark to the hoarse, but welcome sound,
Startling the seaman's sweetest slumbers,
The groaning capstan's labouring round,
The cheerful fife's enliv'ning numbers;
And ling'ring idlers join the brawl,
And merry ship-boys swell the call,
All hands, unmoor! unmoor!
The cry's, A sail! a sail!
Brace high each nerve to dare the fight,
And boldly steer to seek the foeman;
One secret prayer to aid the right,
And many a secret thought to woman!
Now spread the flutt'ring canvas wide,
And dash the foaming sea aside;
The cry's, A sail! a sail!
Three cheers for victory!
Hush'd be each plaint o'er fallen brave;
Still ev'ry sigh to messmate given;
The seaman's tomb is in the wave;
The hero's latest hope is heaven!
High lift the voice in revelry!
Gay raise the song, the shout, the glee;
Three cheers for victory!
So soon as he had ended this song, and without
waiting to listen if any words of compliment were
to succeed an effort that might lay claim to great
excellence both in tones and execution, he arose;
and, desiring his guests to command the services of
his band at pleasure, he wished them soft repose
and pleasant dreams, and then coolly descended
into the lower apartments, apparently for the night.
Mrs Wyllys and Gertrude, notwithstanding both had
been amused, or rather seduced, by the interest
thrown around a manner that was so wayward, while
it was never gross, felt a sensation, as he disappeared,
like that produced by breathing a freer air, after
having been too long compelled to respire the pent
atmosphere of a dungeon. The former regarded her
pupil with eyes in which open affection struggled
with deep inward solicitude; but neither spoke,
since a slight movement near the door of the cabin
reminded them they were not alone.
Would you have further music, Madam? asked
Roderick, in a smothered voice, stealing timidly out
of the shadow as he spoke; I will sing you to sleep,
if you will; but I am choaked when he bids me thus
be merry against my feelings.
The brow of the governess had already
contracted
,
and she was evidently preparing herself to give
a stern and repulsive answer; but, as the plaintive
tones, and shrinking, submissive form of the other,
pleaded strongly to her heart, the frown passed away,
leaving in its place a mild reproving look, like that
which chastens the frown of maternal concern.
Roderick, she said, I thought we should have
seen you no more to-night!
You heard the gong. Although he can be so gay,
and can raise such thrilling sounds in his pleasanter
moments, you have never yet listened to him in
anger.
And is his anger, then, so very fearful?
Perhaps to me it is more frightful than to others;
but I find nothing so terrible as a word of his, when
his mind is moody.
He is then harsh to you?
Never.
You contradict yourself, Roderick. He is, and
he is not. Have you not said how terrible you find
his moody language?
Yes; for I find it changed. Once he was never
thoughtful, or out of humour, but latterly he is not
himself.
Mrs Wyllys did not answer. The language of the
boy was certainly much more intelligible to herself
than to her young and attentive, but unsuspecting,
companion; for, while she motioned to the lad to
retire, Gertrude manifested a desire to gratify the
curious interest she felt in the life and manners of
the freebooter. The signal, however, was
authoritatively
repeated, and the lad slowly, and quite
evidently
with reluctance, withdrew.
The governess and her pupil then retired into
their own state-room; and, after devoting many
minutes to those nightly offerings and petitions which
neither ever suffered any circumstances to cause
them to neglect, they slept in the consciousness of
innocence and in the hope of an all-powerful
protection
.
Though the bell of the ship regularly
sounded
the hours throughout the watches of the night,
scarcely another sound arose, during the darkness,
to disturb the calm which seemed to have settled
equally on the ocean and all that floated on its bosom.
CHAPTER VIII.
But, for the miracle,
I mean our preservation, few in millions
Can speak like us.
Tempest
.
The
Dolphin might well have been likened to a
slumbering beast of prey, during those moments of
treacherous calm. But as nature limits the period
of repose to the creatures of the animal world, so it
would seem that the inactivity of the freebooters
was not doomed to any long continuance. With the
morning sun a breeze came over the water,
breathing
the flavour of the land, to set the sluggish ship
again in motion. Throughout all that day, with a
wide reach of canvas spreading along her booms,
her course was held towards the south. Watch
succeeded
watch, and night came after day, and still no
change was made in her direction. Then the blue
islands were seen heaving up, one after another, out
of the sea. The prisoners of the Rover, for thus
the females were now constrained to consider
themselves
,
silently watched each hillock of green that
the vessel glided past, each naked and sandy key, or
each mountain side, until, by the calculations of the
governess, they were already steering amid the
western
Archipelago.
During all this time no question was asked which
in the smallest manner betrayed to the Rover the
consciousness of his guests that he was not
conducting
them towards the promised port of the Continent.
Gertrude wept over the sorrow her father would
feel, when he should believe her fate involved in
that of the unfortunate Bristol trader; but her tears
flowed in private, or were freely poured upon the
sympathizing bosom of her governess. Wilder she
avoided, with an intuitive consciousness that he was
no longer the character she had wished to believe;
but to all in the ship she struggled to maintain an
equal air and a serene eye. In this deportment, far
safer than any impotent entreaties might have proved,
she was strongly supported by her governess, whose
knowledge of mankind had early taught her that
virtue was never so imposing, in the moments of
trial, as when it knew best how to maintain its
equanimity
.
On the other hand, both the Commander of
the ship and his lieutenant sought no other
communication
with the inmates of the cabin, than courtesy
appeared absolutely to require.
The former, as though repenting already of having
laid so bare the capricious humours of his mind,
drew gradually into himself, neither seeking nor
permitting
familiarity with any; while the latter
appeared
perfectly conscious of the constrained mien
of the governess, and of the altered though still
pitying
eye of her pupil. Little explanation was
necessary
to acquaint Wilder with the reasons of this
change. Instead of seeking the means to vindicate
his character, however, he rather imitated their
reserve
.
Little else was wanting to assure his former
friends of the nature of his pursuits; for even Mrs
Wyllys admitted to her charge, that he acted like
one in whom depravity had not yet made such
progress
as to have destroyed that consciousness which
is ever the surest test of innocence.
We shall not detain the narrative, to dwell upon
the natural regrets in which Gertrude indulged, as
this sad conviction forced itself upon her
understanding
,
nor to relate the gentle wishes in which she did
not think it wrong to indulge, that one, who certainly
was master of so many manly and generous
qualities
,
might soon be made to see the error of his life,
and to return to a course for which even her cold
and nicely judging governess allowed nature had so
eminently endowed him. Perhaps the kind emotions
that had been awakened in her bosom, by the events
of the last fortnight, were not content to exhibit
themselves in wishes alone, and that petitions more
personal, and even more fervent than common,
mingled
in her prayers; but this is a veil which it is not
our province to raise, the heart of one so pure and
so ingenuous being the best repository for its own
gentle feelings.
For several days the ship had been contending
with the unvarying winds of those regions. Instead of
struggling, however, like a cumbered trader, to gain
some given port, the Rover suddenly altered her
course, and glided through one of the many passages
that offered, with the ease of a bird that is settling
swiftly to its nest. A hundred different sails were
seen steering among the islands, but all were
avoided
alike; the policy of the freebooters teaching them
the necessity of moderation, in a sea so crowded
with vessels of war. After the vessel had shot
through one of the straits which divide the chain of
the Antilles, she issued in safety on the more open
sea which separates them from the Spanish Main.
The moment the passage was effected, and a broad
and clear horizon was seen stretching on every side
of them, a manifest alteration occurred in the mien
of every individual of the crew. The brow of the
Rover himself lost its contraction; and the look of
care, which had wrapped the whole man in a
mantle
of reserve, disappeared, leaving him the reckless,
wayward being we have more than once described.
Even the men, whose vigilance had needed no
quickening
in running the gauntlet of the cruisers which
were known to swarm in the narrower seas, appeared
to breathe a freer air, and sounds of merriment and
thoughtless gaiety were once more heard in a place
over which the gloom of distrust had been so long
and so heavily cast.
On the other hand, the governess saw new ground
for uneasiness in the course the vessel was taking.
While the islands were in view, she had hoped, and
surely not without reason, that their captor only
awaited a suitable occasion to place them in safety
within the influence of the laws of some of the
colonial governments. Her own observation told
her there was so much of what was once good, if not
noble, mingled with the lawlessness of the two
principal
individuals in the vessel, that she saw nothing
that was visionary in such an expectation. Even
the tales of the time, which recounted the desperate
acts of the freebooter, with not a little of wild and
fanciful exaggeration, did not forget to include
numberless
striking instances of marked, and even
chivalrous
generosity. In short, he bore the character
of one who, while he declared himself the enemy
of all, knew how to distinguish between the weak
and the strong, and who often found as much
gratification
in repairing the wrongs of the former, as in
humbling the pride of the latter.
But all her agreeable anticipations from this
quarter
were forgotten when the last island of the groupe
sunk into the sea behind them, and the ship lay alone
on an ocean which showed not another object above
its surface. As if now ready to lay aside the mask,
the Rover ordered the sails to be reduced, and,
neglecting
the favourable breeze, the vessel to be
brought to the wind. In a word, as if no object
called
for the immediate attention of her crew, the
Dolphin came to a stand, in the midst of the
water
,
her officers and people abandoning themselves
Vol. II. L
to their pleasures, or to idleness, as whim or
inclination
dictated.
I had hoped that your convenience would have
permitted us to land in some of his Majesty's islands,
said Mrs Wyllys, speaking for the first time since her
suspicions had been awakened on the subject of her
quitting the ship, and addressing her words to the
self-styled Captain Heidegger, just after the order
to heave-to the vessel had been obeyed. I fear
you find it irksome to be so long dispossessed of your
cabin.
It cannot be better occupied, he rather
evasively
replied; though the observant and anxious
governess
fancied his eye was bolder, and his air under
less restraint, than when she had before dwelt on
the same topic. If custom did not require that a
ship should wear the colours of some people, mine
should always sport those of the fair.
And, as it is?
As it is, I hoist the emblems that belong to the
service I am in.
In fifteen days, that you have been troubled with
my presence, it has never been my good fortune to
see those colours set.
No! exclaimed the Rover, glancing his eye at
her, as if to penetrate her thoughts: Then shall
the uncertainty cease on the sixteenth.Who's there,
abaft?
No one better nor worse than Richard Fid,
returned the individual in question, lifting his head
from out a locker, into which it had been thrust, as
though its owner searched for some mislaid
implement
,
and who added a little quickly, when he
ascertained
by whom he was addressed, and always
at your Honour's orders.
Ah! 'Tis the friend of
our
friend, the Rover
observed to Mrs Wyllys, with an emphasis which
the other understood. He shall be my interpreter.
Come hither, lad; I have a word to exchange with
you.
A thousand at your service, sir, returned
Richard
,
unhesitatingly complying; for, though no great
talker, I have always something uppermost in my
mind, which can be laid hold of at need.
I hope you find that your hammock swings easily
in my ship?
I'll not deny it, your Honour; for an easier craft,
especially upon a bow-line, might be hard to find.
And the cruise?I hope you also find the cruise
such as a seaman loves.
D'ye see, sir, I was sent from home with little
schooling, and so I seldom make so free as to
pretend
to read the Captain's orders.
But still you have your inclinations, said Mrs
Wyllys, firmly, as though determined to push the
investigation
even further than her companion had
intended.
I can't say that I'm wanting in natural feeling, your
Ladyship, returned Fid, endeavouring to manifest
his admiration of the sex, by the awkward bow he
made to the governess as its representative, tho'f
crosses and mishaps have come athwart me as well as
better men. I thought as strong a splice was laid,
between
me and Kate Whiffle, as was ever turned into
a sheet-cable; but then came the law, with its
regulations
and shipping articles, luffing short athwart
my happiness, and making a wreck at once of all
the poor girl's hopes, and a Flemish account of my
comfort.
It was proved that she had another husband?
said the Rover, nodding his head, understandingly.
Four, your Honour. The girl had a love of
company, and it grieved her to the heart to see an
empty house: But then, as it was seldom more than
one of us could be in port at a time, there was no
such need to make the noise they did about the trifle.
But envy did it all, sir; envy, and the greediness of
the land-sharks. Had every woman in the parish as
many husbands as Kate, the devil a bit would they
have taken up the precious time of judge and jury,
in looking into the manner in which a wench like
her kept a quiet household.
And, since that unfortunate repulse, you have
kept yourself altogether out of the hands of
matrimony
?
Ay, ay;
since
, your Honour, returned Fid,
giving
his Commander another of those droll looks, in
which a peculiar cunning struggled with a more
direct
and straight-going honesty;
since
, as you say
rightly, sir; though they talked of a small matter of
a bargain that I had made with another woman,
myself
;
but, in overhauling the affair, they found, that,
as the shipping articles with poor Kate wouldn't
hold together, why, they could make nothing at all
of me; so I was white-washed like a queen's
parlour
,
and sent adrift.
And all this occurred after your acquaintance
with Mr Wilder?
Afore, your Honour; afore. I was but a younker
in the time of it, seeing that it is four-and-twenty
years, come May next, since I have been towing at
the stern of master Harry. But then, as I have had
a sort of family of my own, since that day, why, the
less need, you know, to be birthing myself again in
any other man's hammock.
You were saying, it is four-and-twenty years,
interrupted Mrs Wyllys, since you made the
acquaintance
of Mr Wilder?
Acquaintance! Lord, my Lady, little did he
know of acquaintances at that time; though, bless
him! the lad has had occasion to remember it often
enough since.
The meeting of two men, of so singular merit,
must have been somewhat remarkable, observed
the Rover.
It was, for that matter, remarkable enough, your
Honour; though, as to the merit, notwithstanding
master Harry is often for overhauling that part of
the account, I've set it down for just nothing at all.
I confess, that, in a case where two men, both
of whom are so well qualified to judge, are of
different
opinions, I feel at a loss to know which can
have the right. Perhaps, by the aid of the facts, I
might form a truer judgment.
Your Honour forgets the Guinea, who is
altogether
of my mind in the matter, seeing no great
merit in the thing either. But, as you are saying, sir,
reading the log is the only true way to know how
fast a ship can go; and so, if this Lady and your
Honour have a mind to come at the truth of the
affair
,
why, you have only to say as much, and I will
put it all before you in creditable language.
Ah! there is reason in your proposition,
returned
the Rover, motioning to his companion to follow
to a part of the poop where they were less exposed
to the observations of inquisitive eyes. Now, place
the whole clearly before us; and then you may
consider
the merits of the question disposed of
definitively
.
Fid was far from discovering the smallest
reluctance
to enter on the required detail; and, by the
time he had cleared his throat, freshened his supply
of the weed, and otherwise disposed himself to
proceed
,
Mrs Wyllys had so far conquered her
reluctance
to pry clandestinely into the secrets of others,
as to yield to a curiosity which she found
unconquerable
,
and to take the seat to which her companion
invited her by a gesture of his hand.
I was sent early to sea, your Honour, by my
father
,
commenced Fid, after these little
preliminaries
L 2
had been duly observed, who was, like myself,
a man that passed more of his time on the water
than on dry ground; though, as he was nothing more
than a fisherman, he generally kept the land aboard;
which is, after all, little better than living on it
altogether
.
Howsomever, when I went, I made a broad
offing at once, fetching up on the other side of the
Horn, the very first passage I made; which was no
small journey for a new beginner; but then, as I
was only eight years old
Eight! you are now speaking of yourself,
interrupted
the disappointed governess.
Certain, Madam; and, though genteeler peopie
might be talked of, it would be hard to turn the
conversation
on any man who knows better how to rig
or how to strip a ship. I was beginning at the right
end of my story; but, as I fancied your Ladyship
might not choose to waste time in hearing
concerning
my father and mother, I cut the matter short, by
striking in at eight years old, overlooking all about
my birth and name, and such other matters as are
usually logged, in a fashion out of all reason, in your
every-day sort of narratives.
Proceed, she rejoined, with a species of
compelled
resignation.
My mind is pretty much like a ship that is about
to slip off its ways, resumed Fid. If she makes
a fair start, and there is neither jam nor dry-rub,
smack see goes into the water, like a sail let run in
a calm; but, if she once brings up, a good deal of
labour is to be gone through to set her in motion
again. Now, in order to wedge up my ideas, and
to get the story slushed, so that I can slip through it
with case, it is needful to overrun the part which I
have just let go; which is, how my father was a
fisherman, and how I doubled the HornAh! here
I have it again, clear of kinks, fake above fake, like
a well-coiled cable; so that I can pay it out as easily
as the boatswain's yeoman can lay his hand on a bit
of ratling stuff. Well, I doubled the Horn, as I was
saying, and might have been the matter of four years
cruising about among the islands and seas of those
parts, which were none of the best known then, or,
for that matter, now. After this, I served in his
Majesty's
fleet a whole war, and got as much honour as
I could stow beneath hatches. Well, then, I fell in
with the Guineathe black, my Lady, that you see
turning in a new clue-garnet-block for the starboard
clue of the fore-course.
Ay; then you fell in with the African, said the
Rover.
Then we made our acquaintance; and, although
his colour is no whiter than the back of a whale, I
care not who knows it, after master Harry, there is
no man living who has an honester way with him,
or in whose company I take greater satisfaction. To
be sure, your Honour, the fellow is something
contradictory
,
and has a great opinion of his strength,
and thinks his equal is not to be found at a
weatherearing
,
or in the bunt of a topsail; but then he is no
better than a black, and one is not to be too
particular
in looking into the faults of such as are not
actually
his fellow creatures.
No, no; that would be uncharitable in the
extreme
.
The very words the chaplain used to let fly
aboard the `Brunswick!' It is a great thing to have
schooling, your Honour; since, if it does nothing
else, it fits a man for a boatswain, and puts him in
the track of steering the shortest course to heaven.
But, as I was saying, there was I and Guinea
shipmates
,
and in a reasonable way friends, for five years
more; and then the time arrived when we met with
the mishap of the wreck in the West-Indies.
What wreck? demanded his officer.
I beg your Honour's pardon; I never swing my
head-yards till I'm sure the ship won't luff back into
the wind; and, before I tell the particulars of the
wreck, I will overrun my ideas, to see that nothing
is forgotten that should of right be first mentioned.
The Rover, who saw, by the uneasy glances that
she cast aside, and by the expression of her
countenance
,
how impatient his companion was becoming
for a sequel that approached so tardily, and how
much she dreaded an interruption, made a significant
sign to her to permit the straight-going tar to take
his own course, as the best means of coming at the
facts they both longed so much to hear. Left to
himself, Fid soon took the necessary review of the
transactions, in his own quaint manner; and, having
happily found that nothing which he considered as
germain to the present relation was omitted, he
proceeded
at once to the more material, and what was
to his auditors by far the most interesting, portion of
his narrative.
Well, as I was telling your Honour, he
continued
,
Guinea was then a maintopman, and I was
stationed in the same place aboard the `Proserpine,'
a quick-going two-and-thirty, when we fell in with a
bit of a smuggler, between the islands and the
Spanish
Main; and so the Captain made a prize of her,
and ordered her into port; for which I have always
supposed, as he was a sensible man, he had his
orders
.
But this is neither here nor there, seeing that
the craft had got to the end of her rope, and
foundered
in a heavy hurricane that came over us, mayhap
a couple of days' run to leeward of our haven.
Well, she was a small boat; and, as she took it into
her mind to roll over on her side before she went to
sleep, the master's mate in charge, and three others,
slid off her decks to the bottom of the sea, as I have
always had reason to believe, never having heard
any thing to the contrary. It was here that Guinea
first served me the good turn; for, though we had
often before shared hunger and thirst together, this
was the first time he ever jumped overboard to keep
me from taking in salt water like a fish.
He kept you from drowning with the rest?
I'll not say just that much, your Honour; for
there is no knowing what lucky accident might have
done the same good turn for me. Howsomever,
seeing
that I can swim no better nor worse than a
double-headed
shot, I have always been willing to give
the black credit for as much, though little has ever
been said between us on the subject; for no other
reason, as I can see, than that settling-day has not
yet come. Well, we contrived to get the boat afloat,
and enough into it to keep soul and body together,
and made the best of our way for the land, seeing
that the cruise was, to all useful purposes, over in
that smuggler. I needn't be particular in telling this
lady of the nature of boat-duty, as she has lately
had some experience in that way herself; but I can
tell her this much: Had it not been for that boat in
which the black and myself spent the better part of
ten days, she would have fared but badly in her own
navigation.
Explain your meaning.
My meaning is plain enough, your Honour, which
is, that little else than the handy way of master Harry
in a boat could have kept the Bristol trader's launch
above water, the day we fell in with it.
But in what manner was your own shipwreck
connected with the safety of Mr Wilder?
demanded
the governess, unable any longer to await the
dilatory
explanation of the prolix seaman.
In a very plain and natural fashion, my Lady, as
you will say yourself, when you come to hear the
pitiful part of my tale. Well, there were I and
Guinea, rowing about in the ocean, on short
allowance
of all things but work, for two nights and a day,
heading-in for the islands; for, though no great
navigators
,
we could smell the land, and so we pulled
away lustily, when you consider it was a race in
which life was the wager, until we made, in the
pride of the morning, as it might be here, at
east-and-by-south
,
a ship under bare poles; if a vessel
can be called bare that had nothing better than the
stumps of her three masts standing, and they
without
rope or rag to tell one her rig or nation.
Howsomever
,
as there were three naked sticks left, I have
always put her down for a full-rigged ship; and,
when we got night enough to take a look at her hull,
I made bold to say she was of English build.
You boarded her, observed the Rover.
A small task that, your Honour, since a starved
dog was the whole crew she could muster to keep
us off. It was a solemn sight when we got on her
decks, and one that bears hard on my manhood,
continued Fid, with an air that grew more serious
as he proceeded, whenever I have occasion to
overhaul the log-book of memory.
You found her people suffering of want!
We found a noble ship, as helpless as a hallibut
in a tub. There she lay, a craft of some four hundred
tons, water-logged, and motionless as a church. It
always gives me great reflection, sir, when I see a
noble vessel brought to such a strait; for one may
liken her to a man who has been docked of his fins,
and who is getting to be good for little else than to
be set upon a cat-head to look out for squalls.
The ship was then deserted?
Ay, the people had left her, sir, or had been
washed away in the gust that had laid her over. I
never could come at the truth of them particulars.
The dog had been mischievous, I conclude, about
the decks; and so he had been lashed to a
timberhead
,
the which saved his life, since, happily for him,
he found himself on the weather-side when the hull
righted a little, after her spars gave way. Well, sir,
there was the dog, and not much else, as we could
see, though we spent half a day in rummaging round.
in order to pick up any small matter that might be
useful; but then, as the entrance to the hold and
cabin was full of water, why, we made no great
affair of the salvage, after all.
And then you left the wreck?
Not yet, your Honour. While knocking about
among the bits of rigging and lumber above board.
says Guinea, says he, `Mister Dick, I hear some one
making their plaints below.' Now, I had heard the
same noises myself, sir; but had set them down as the
spirits of the people moaning over their losses, and
had said nothing of the same, for fear of stirring up
the superstition of the black; for the best of them
are no better than superstitious niggers, my Lady;
so I said nothing of what I had heard, until he saw
fit to broach the subject himself. Then we both
turned-to to listening with a will; and sure enough
the groans began to take a human sound. It was a
good while, howsomever, before I could make up
whether it was any thing more than the complaining
of the hulk itself; for you know, my Lady, that a
ship which is about to sink makes her lamentations
just like any other living thing.
I do, I do, returned the governess, shuddering.
I have heard them, and never will my memory
lose the recollection of the sounds.
Ay, I thought you might know something of the
same; and solemn groans they are: But, as the hulk
kept rolling on the top of the sea, and no further
signs of her going down, I began to think it best to
cut into her abaft, in order to make sure that some
miserable wretch had not been caught in his
hammock
,
at the time she went over. Well, good will,
and an axe, soon let us into the secret of the moans.
You found a child?
And its mother, my Lady. As good luck would
have it, they were in a birth on the weather-side,
and as yet the water had not reached them. But
pent air and hunger had nearly proved as bad as the
brine. The lady was in the agony when we got her
out; and as to the boy, proud and strong as you now
see him there on yonder gun, my Lady, he was just
so miserable, that it was no small matter to make
him swallow the drop of wine and water that the
Lord had left us, in order, as I have often thought
since, to bring him up to be, as he at this moment is,
the pride of the ocean!
But, the mother?
The mother had given the only morsel of biscuit
she had to the child, and was dying, in order that
the urchin might live. I never could get rightly into
the meaning of the thing, my Lady, why a woman,
who is no better than a Lascar in matters of strength,
nor any better than a booby in respect of courage,
should be able to let go her hold of life in this quiet
fashion, when many a stout mariner would be
fighting
for each mouthful of air the Lord might see fit
to give. But there she was, white as the sail on
which the storm has long beaten, and limber as a
pennant in a calm, with her poor skinny arm around
the lad, holding in her hand the very mouthful that
might have kept her own soul in the body a little
longer.
What did she, when you brought her to the
light?
What did she! repeated Fid, whose voice was
getting thick and husky, why, she did a dd
honest thing; she gave the boy the crumb, and
motioned
,
as well as a dying woman could, that we
should have an eye over him, till the cruise of life
was up.
And was that all?
I have always thought she prayed; for
something
passed between her and one who was not to
be seen, if a man might judge by the fashion in which
her eyes were turned aloft, and her lips moved. I
hope, among others, she put in a good word for one
Richard Fid; for certain she had as little need to be
asking for herself as any body. But no man will
ever know what she said, seeing that her mouth was
shut from that time for ever after.
She died!
Sorry am I to say it. But the poor lady was
past swallowing when she came into our hands, and
then it was but little we had to offer her. A quart
of water, with mayhap a gill of wine, a biscuit, and
a handful of rice, was no great allowance for two
hearty men to pull a boat some seventy leagues
within
the tropics. Howsomever, when we found no
more was to be got from the wreck, and that, since
the air had escaped by the hole we had cut, she was
settling fast, we thought it best to get out of her;
and sure enough we were none too soon, seeing that
she went under just as we had twitched our
jollyboat
clear of the suction.
And the boythe poor deserted child!
exclaimed
the governess, whose eyes had now filled to
overflowing
.
There you are all aback, my Lady. Instead of
deserting him, we brought him away with us, as we
did the only other living creature to be found about
the wreck. But we had still a long journey before
us, and, to make the matter worse, we were out of
the track of the traders. So I put it down as a case
for a council of all hands, which was no more than
I and the black, since the lad was too weak to talk,
and little could he have said otherwise in our
situation
.
So I begun myself, saying, says I, `Guinea, we
must eat either this here dog, or this here boy. If
we eat the boy, we shall be no better than the
people
in your own country, who, you know, my Lady,
are cannibals; but if we eat the dog, poor as he is,
Vol. II. M
we may make out to keep soul and body together,
and to give the child the other matters.'So Guinea,
he says, says he, `I've no occasion for food at all;
give 'em to the boy,' says he, `seeing that he is little,
and has need of strength.' Howsomever, master
Harry took no great fancy to the dog, which we soon
finished between us; for the plain reason that he
was so thin. After that, we had a hungry time of it
ourselves; for, had we not kept up the life in the
lad, you know, it would have slipt through our
fingers.
And you fed the child, though fasting
yourselves
?
No, we wer'n't altogether idle, my Lady, seeing
that we kept our teeth jogging on the skin of the
dog, though I will not say that the food was over
savoury. And then, as we had no occasion to lose
time in eating, we kept the oars going so much the
livelier. Well, we got in at one of the islands after
a time, though neither I nor the nigger had much to
boast of as to strength or weight when we made the
first kitchen we fell in with.
And the child?
Oh! he was doing well enough; for, as the
doctors
afterwards told us, the short allowance on which
he was put did him no harm.
You sought his friends?
Why, as for that matter, my Lady, so far as I
have been able to discover, he was with his best
friends already. We had neither chart nor bearings
by which we knew how to steer in search of his
family. His name he called master Harry, by which
it is clear he was a gentleman born, as indeed any
one may see by looking at him; but not another
word could I learn of his relations or country,
except
that, as he spoke the English language, and was
found in an English ship, there is a natural reason
to believe he is of English build himself.
Did you not learn the name of the ship?
demanded
the attentive Rover, in whose countenance
the traces of a lively interest were very distinctly
discernible.
Why, as to that matter, your Honour, schools
were scarce in my part of the country; and in
Africa, you know, there is no great matter of
learning
;
so that, had her name been out of water, which
it was not, we might have been bothered to read it.
Howsomever, there was a horse-bucket kicking about
her decks, and which, as luck would have it, got
jammed-in with the pumps in such a fashion that it
did not go overboard until we took it with us. Well,
this bucket had a name painted on it; and, after we
had leisure for the thing, I got Guinea, who has a
natural turn at tattooing, to rub it into my arm in
gunpowder, as the handiest way of logging these
small particulars. Your Honour shall see what the
black has made of it.
So saying, Fid very coolly doffed his jacket, and
Iaid bare, to the elbow, one of his brawny arms, on
which the blue impression was still very plainly
visible
.
Although the letters were rudely imitated, it
was not difficult to read, in the skin, the words Ark,
of Lynnhaven.
Here, then, you had a clue at once to find the
relatives of the boy, observed the Rover, after he
had deciphered the letters.
It seems not, your Honour; for we took the
child with us aboard the `Proserpine,' and our
worthy
Captain carried sail hard after the people; but
no one could give any tidings of such a craft as the
`Ark, of Lynnhaven;' and, after a twelvemonth, or
more, we were obliged to give up the chase.
Could the child give no account of his friends?
demanded the governess.
But little, my Lady; for the reason he knew but
little about himself. So we gave the matter over
altogether
;
I, and Guinea, and the Captain, and all of
us, turning-to to educate the boy. He got his
seamanship
of the black and myself, and mayhap some
little of his manners also; and his navigation and
Latin of the Captain, who proved his friend till such
a time as he was able to take care of himself, and,
for that matter, some years afterwards.
And how long did Mr Wilder continue in a
King's ship? asked the Rover, in a careless and
apparently indifferent manner.
Long enough to learn all that is taught there,
your Honour, was the evasive reply.
He came to be an officer, I suppose?
If he didn't, the King had the worst of the
bargain
.But
what is this I see hereaway, atween the
backstay and the vang? It looks like a sail; or is
it only a gull flapping his wings before he rises?
Sail, ho! called the look-out from the mast
head. Sail, ho! was echoed from a top and from
the deck; the glittering though distant object having
struck a dozen vigilant eyes at the same instant. The
Rover was compelled to lend his attention to a
summons
so often repeated; and Fid profited by the
circumstance
to quit the poop, with the hurry of one
who was not sorry for the interruption. Then the
governess arose too, and, thoughtful and melancholy,
she sought the privacy of her cabin.
CHAPTER IX.
Their preparation is to-day by sea.
Anthony and Cleopatra
Sail
, ho! in the little frequented sea in which
the Rover lay, was a cry that quickened every
dull pulsation in the bosoms of her crew. Many
weeks had now, according to their method of
calculation
,
been entirely lost in the visionary and
profitless
plans of their chief. They were not of a
temper
to reason on the fatality which had forced the
Bristol trader from their toils; it was enough, for
their rough natures, that the rich spoil had escaped
them. Without examining for the causes of this
loss, as has been already seen, they had been but too
well disposed to visit their disappointment on the
head of the innocent officer who was charged with
the care of a vessel that they already considered a
prize. Here, then, was at length an opportunity to
repair their loss. The stranger was about to
encounter
them in a part of the ocean where succour was
nearly hopeless, and where time might be afforded
to profit, to the utmost, by any success that the
freebooters
should obtain. Every man in the ship
seemed
sensible of these advantages; and, as the words
sounded from mast to yard, and from yard to deck,
they were taken up in cheerful echos from fifty
mouths, which repeated the cry, until it was heard
issuing from the inmost recesses of the vessel.
The Rover himself manifested more than usual
satisfaction at this prospect of a capture. He was
quite aware of the necessity of some brilliant or of
some profitable exploit, to curb the rising tempers of
his men; and long experience had taught him that
he could ever draw the cords of discipline the
tightest
in moments that appeared the most to require the
exercise of his own high courage and consummate
skill. He walked forward, therefore, among his
people, with a countenance that was no longer buried
in reserve, speaking to several, whom he addressed
by name, and of whom he did not even disdain to
ask opinions concerning the character of the distant
sail. When a sort of implied assurance that their
recent offences were overlooked had thus been given,
he summoned Wilder, the General, and one or two
others of the superior officers, to the poop, where
M 2
they all disposed themselves to make more particular
and more certain observations, by the aid of a
half-dozen
excellent glasses.
Many minutes were now passed in silent and
intense
scrutiny. The day was cloudless, the wind
fresh, without being heavy, the sea long, even, and
far from high, and, in short, all things combined, as
far as is ever seen on the restless ocean, not only to
aid their examination, but to favour those subsequent
evolutions which each instant rendered more
probable
would become necessary.
It is a ship! exclaimed the Rover, lowering his
glass, the first to proclaim the result of his long and
close inspection.
It is a ship! echoed the General, across
whose disciplined features a ray of something like
animated satisfaction was making an effort to display
itself.
A full-rigged ship! continued a third, relieving
his eye in turn, and answering to the grim smile of
the soldier.
There must be something to hold up all those
lofty spars, resumed their Commander. A hull
of price is beneath.But you say nothing, Mr
Wilder
!
You make her out
A ship of size, returned our adventurer, who,
though hitherto silent, had been far from the least
interested
in his investigations. Does my glass
deceive
meor
Or what, sir?
I see her to the heads of her courses.
You see her as I do. It is a tall ship on an easy
bow-line, with every thing set that will draw. And
she is standing hitherward. Her lower sails have
lifted within five minutes.
I thought as much. But
But what, sir? There can be little doubt but
she is heading north-and-east. Since she is so kind
as to spare us the pains of a chase, we will not hurry
our movements. Let her come on. How like you
the manner of the stranger's advance, General?
Unmilitary, but enticing! There is a look of the
mines about her very royals.
And you, gentlemen, do you also see the fashion
of a galleon in her upper sails?
'Tis not unreasonable to believe it, answered
one of the inferiors. The Dons are said to run
this passage often, in order to escape speaking us
gentlemen, who sail with roving commissions.
Ah! your Don is a prince of the earth! There
is charity in lightening his golden burden, or the man
would sink under it, as did the Roman matron under
the pressure of the Sabine shields. I think you see
no such gilded beauty in the stranger, Mr Wilder.
It is a heavy ship!
The more likely to bear a noble freight. You
are new, sir, to this merry trade of ours, or you
would know that size is a quality we always esteem
in our visiters. If they carry pennants, we leave
them to meditate on the many `slips which exist
between
the cup and the lip;' and, if stored with metal
no more dangerous than that of Potosi, they
generally
sail the faster after passing a few hours in our
company.
Is not the stranger making signals? demanded
Wilder, thoughtfully.
Is he so quick to see us! A good look-out must
be had, when a vessel, that is merely steadied by her
stay-sails, can be seen so far. Vigilance is a
never-failing
sign of value!
A pause succeeded, during which all the glasses,
in imitation of that of Wilder, were again raised in
the direction of the stranger. Different opinions
were given; some affirming, and some doubting, the
fact of the signals. The Rover himself was silent,
though his observation was keen, and long continued.
We have wearied our eyes till sight is getting
dim, he said. I have found the use of trying fresh
organs when my own have refused to serve me.
Come hither, lad, he continued, addressing a man
who was executing some delicate job in seamanship
on the poop, at no great distance from the spot where
the groupe of officers had placed themselves; come
hither: Tell me what you make of the sail in the
south-western board.
The man proved to be Scipio, who had been
chosen
,
for his expertness, to perform the task in
question
.
Placing his cap on the deck, in a reverence
even deeper than that which the seaman usually
manifests toward his superior, he lifted the glass in
one hand, while with the other he covered the eye
that had at the moment no occasion for the use of
its vision. But no sooner did the wandering
instrument
fall on the distant object, than he dropped it
again, and fastened his look, in a sort of stupid
admiration, on Wilder.
Did you see the sail? demanded the Rover.
Masser can see him wid he naked eye.
Ay, but what make you of him by the aid of the
glass?
He'm ship, sir.
True. On what course?
He got he starboard tacks aboard, sir.
Still true. But has he signals abroad?
He'm got t'ree new cloths in he
maintop-gallant-royal
,
sir.
His vessel is all the better for the repairs. Did
you see his flags?
He'm show no flag, masser.
I thought as much myself. Go forward, lad
stayone often gets a true idea by seeking it where
it is not thought to exist. Of what size do you take
the stranger to be?
He'm just seven hundred and fifty tons, masser.
How's this! The tongue of your negro, Mr
Wilder, is as exact as a carpenter's rule. The fellow
speaks of the size of a vessel, that is hull down, with
an air as authoritative as a runner of the King's
customs
could pronounce on the same, after she had
been submitted to the office admeasurement.
You will have consideration for the ignorance
of the black; men of his unfortunate state are
seldom
skilful in answering interrogatories.
Ignorance! repeated the Rover, glancing his
eye uneasily, and with a rapidity peculiar to himself,
from one to the other, and from both to the rising
object in the horizon: Skilful! I know not: The
man has no air of doubt.You think her tonnage
to be precisely that which you have said?
The large dark eyes of Scipio rolled, in turn, from
his new Commander to his ancient master, while, for
a moment, his faculties appeared to be lost in
inextricable
confusion. But the uncertainty continued only
for a moment. He no sooner read the frown that
was gathering deeply over the brow of the latter,
than the air of confidence with which he had
pronounced
his former opinion vanished in a look of
obstinacy so settled, that one might well have
despaired
of ever driving, or enticing, him again to
seem to think.
I ask you, if the stranger may not be a dozen
tons larger or smaller than what you have named?
continued the Rover, when he found his former
question
was not likely to be soon answered.
He'm just as masser wish 'em, returned Scipio.
I wish him a thousand; since he will then prove
the richer prize.
I s'pose he'm quite a t'ousand, sir.
Or a snug ship of three hundred, if lined with
gold, might do.
He look berry like a t'ree hundred.
To me it seems a brig.
I t'ink him brig too, masser.
Or possibly, after all, the stranger may prove a
schooner, with many lofty and light sails.
A schooner often carry a royal, returned the
black, resolute to acquiesce in all the other said.
Who knows it is a sail at all! Forward there!
It may be well to have more opinions than one on
so weighty a matter. Forward there! send the
foretopman
that is called Fid upon the poop. Your
companions are so intelligent and so faithful, Mr
Wilder, that you are not to be surprised if I shew
an undue desire for their information.
Wilder compressed his lips, and the rest of the
groupe manifested a good deal of amazement; but
the latter had been too long accustomed to the
caprice of their Commander, and the former was
too wise, to speak at a moment when his humour
seemed at the highest. The topman, however, was
not long in making his appearance, and then the
chief saw fit again to break the silence.
And you think it questionable whether it be a
sail at all? he continued.
He'm sartain nothing but a fly-away, returned
the obstinate black.
You hear what your friend the negro says,
master
Fid; he thinks that yonder object, which is lifting
so fast to leeward, is not a sail.
As the topman saw no sufficient reason for
concealing
his astonishment at this wild opinion, it was
manifested with all the embellishments with which
the individual in question usually set forth any of
his more visible emotions. After casting a short
glance in the direction of the sail, in order to assure
himself there had been no deception, he turned his
eyes in great disgust on Scipio, as if he would
vindicate
the credit of the association at the expense
of some little contempt for the ignorance of his
companion.
What the devil do you take it for, Guinea? a
church?
I t'ink he'm church, responded the acquiescent
black.
Lord help the dark-skinned fool! Your Honour
knows that conscience is dnab-y overlooked in
Africa, and will not judge the nigger hardly for any
little blunder he may make in the account of his
religion
.
But the fellow is a thorough seaman, and
should know a top-gallant-sail from a weathercock.
Now, look you, S'ip, for the credit of your friends.
if you've no great pride on your own behalf, just tell
his
It is of no account, interrupted the Rover.
Take you this glass, and pass an opinion on the
sail in sight yourself.
Fid scraped his foot, and made a low bow, in
acknowledgment
of the compliment; and then,
depositing
his little tarpaulin hat on the deck of the poop,
he very composedly, and, as he flattered himself,
very understandingly, disposed of his person to take
the desired view. The gaze of the topman was far
longer than had been that of his black companion;
and it is to be presumed, in consequence, much more
accurate. Instead, however, of venturing any
sudden
opinion, when his eye was wearied, he lowered
the glass, and with it his head, standing long in the
attitude of one whose thoughts had received some
subject of deep cogitation. During the process of
thinking, the weed was diligently rolled over his
tongue, and one hand was stuck a-kimbo into his
side, as if he would brace all his faculties to support
some extraordinary mental effort.
I wait your opinion, resumed his attentive
Commander, when he thought sufficient time had
been allowed to mature the opinion even of Richard
Fid.
Will your Honour just tell me what day of the
month this here may be, and mayhap, at the same
time, the day of the week too, if it shouldn't be
giving too much trouble?
His two questions were directly answered.
We had the wind at east-with-southing, the first
day out, and then it chopped in the night, and blew
great guns at north-west, where it held for the
matter
of a week. After which there was an Irishman's
hurricane, right up and down, for a day; then we
got into these here trades, which have stood as steady
as a ship's chaplain over a punch bowl, ever since.
Here the topman closed his soliloquy, in order to
agitate the tobacco again, it being impossible to
conduct
the process of chewing and talking at one and
the same time.
What of the stranger? demanded the Rover, a
little impatiently.
It's no church, that's certain, your Honour,
said Fid, very decidedly.
Has he signals flying?
He may be speaking with his flags, but it needs
a better scholar than Richard Fid to know what he
would say. To my eye, there are three new cloths
in his main-top-gallant-royal, but no bunting abroad.
The man is happy in having so good a sail. Mr
Wilder, do
you
too see the darker cloths in
question
?
There is certainly something which might be
taken for canvas newer than the rest. I believe I
first mistook the same, as the sun fell brightest on the
sail, for the signals I named.
Then we are not seen, and may lie quiet for a
while, though we enjoy the advantage of measuring
the stranger, foot by footeven to the new cloths in
his royal!
The Rover spoke in a tone that was strangely
divided
between sarcasm and thought. He then made
an impatient gesture to the seamen to quit the poop.
When they were alone, he turned to his silent and
respectful officers, continuing, in a manner that was
grave, while it was conciliatory,
Gentlemen, he said, our idle time is past, and
fortune has at length brought activity into our track.
Whether the ship in sight be of just seven hundred
and fifty tons, is more than I can pretend to
pronounce
,
but something there is which any seaman
may know. By the squareness of her upper-yards,
the symmetry with which they are trimmed, and the
press of canvas she bears on the wind, I pronounce
her to be a vessel of war. Do any differ from my
opinion? Mr Wilder, speak.
I feel the truth of all your reasons, and think
with you.
A shade of gloomy distrust, which had gathered
over the brow of the Rover during the foregoing
scene, lighted a little as he listened to the direct and
frank avowal of his lieutenant.
You believe she bears a pennant? I like this
manliness of reply. Then comes another question:
Shall we fight her?
To this interrogatory it was not so easy to give a
decisive answer. Each officer consulted the opinions
of his comrades, in their eyes, until their leader saw
fit to make his application still more personal.
Now, General, this is a question peculiarly fitted
for your wisdom, he resumed: Shall we give
battle
to a pennant? or shall we spread our wings, and
fly?
My bullies are not drilled to the retreat. Give
them any other work to do, and I will answer for
their steadiness.
But shall we adventure, without a reason?
The Spaniard often sends his bullion home
under
cover of a cruiser's guns, observed one of the
inferiors, who rarely found pleasure in any risk
that did not infer its correspondent benefit. We
Vol. II. N
may feel the stranger; if he carries more than his
guns, he will betray it by his reluctance to speak;
but if poor, we shall find him fierce as a half-fed
tiger.
There is sense in your counsel, Brace, and it
shall be regarded. Go then, gentlemen, to your
several
duties. We'll pass the half hour that may be
needed, before his hull shall rise, in looking to our
gear, and overhauling the guns. As it is not decided
to fight, let what is done be done without display.
My people must see no receding from a resolution
taken.
The groupe then separated, each man preparing
to undertake the task that more especially belonged
to the situation that he filled in the ship. Wilder
was about to retire with the rest, but a significant
sign drew him to the side of his chief, who continued
on the poop alone with his new confederate.
The monotony of our lives is now likely to be
interrupted, Mr Wilder, commenced the former,
first glancing his eye around, to make sure they were
alone. I have seen enough of your spirit and
steadiness, to be sure, that, should accident disable me
to conduct the fortunes of these people, my authority
will fall into firm and able hands.
Should such a calamity befall us, I hope it may
be found that your expectations shall not be deceived.
I have confidence, sir; and, where a brave man
reposes his confidence, he has a right to hope it will
not be abused. I speak in reason.
I acknowledge the justice of your words.
I would, Wilder, that we had known each other
earlier. But what matters vain regrets! These
fellows of yours are keen of sight to note those cloths
so soon!
'Tis just the observation of people of their class.
The nicer distinctions which marked the cruiser
came first from yourself!
And then the `seven hundred and fifty tons' of
the black!It was giving an opinion with great
decision
.
It is the quality of ignorance to be positive.
You say truly. Cast an eye at the stranger, and
tell me how he comes on.
Wilder obeyed, seemingly glad to be relieved from
a discourse that he might have found embarrassing.
Many moments were passed before he dropped the
glass, during which time not a syllable fell from the
lips of his companion. When he turned, however,
to deliver the result of his observations, he met an
eye, that seemed to pierce his soul, fastened on his
countenance. Colouring highly, as if he resented
the suspicion betrayed by the act, Wilder closed his
half-open lips, and continued silent.
And the ship? deeply demanded the Rover.
The ship has already raised her courses; in a
few more minutes we shall see the hull.
It is a swift vessel! She is standing directly for
us.
I think not. Her head is lying more at east.
It may be well to make certain of that fact. You
are right, he continued, after taking a look himself
at the approaching cloud of canvas; you are very
right. As yet we are not seen. Forward there!
haul down that head stay-sail; we will steady the
ship by her yards. Now let him look with all his
eyes; they must be good to see these naked spars at
such a distance.
Our adventurer made no reply, assenting to the
truth of what the other had said by a simple
inclination
of his head. They then resumed the walk to
and fro in their narrow limits, neither manifesting,
however, any anxiety to renew the discourse.
We are in good condition for the alternative of
flight or combat, the Rover at length observed, while
he cast a rapid look over the preparations which had
been unostentatiously in progress from the moment
when the officers dispersed. Now will I confess,
Wilder, a secret pleasure in the belief that yonder
audacious fool carries the boasted commission of the
German who wears the Crown of Britain. Should
he prove more than man may dare attempt, I will
flout him; though prudence shall check any further
attempts; and, should he prove an equal, would it
not gladden your eyes to see St. George come
drooping
to the water?
I thought that men in our pursuit left honour to
silly heads, and that we seldom struck a blow that
was not intended to ring on a metal more precious
than iron.
'Tis the character the world gives; but I, for
one, would rather lower the pride of the minions of
King George than possess the power of unlocking
his treasury! Said I well, General? he added, as
the individual he named approached; said I well,
in asserting there was glorious pleasure in making a
pennant trail upon the sea?
We fight for victory, returned the martinet. I
am ready to engage at a minute's notice.
Prompt and decided, as a soldier.Now tell me,
General, if Fortune, or Chance, or Providence,
whichever
of the powers you may acknowledge for a
leader
,
were to give you the option of enjoyments, in
what would you find your deepest satisfaction?
The soldier seemed to ruminate, ere he
answered
,
I have often thought, that, were I commander of
things on earth, I should, backed by a dozen of my
stoutest bullies, charge at the door of that cave which
was entered by the tailor's boy, him they call
Aladdin
.
The genuine aspirations of a freebooter! In such
a case, the magic trees would soon be disburdened
of their fruit. Still it might prove an inglorious
victory
,
since incantations and charms are the weapons
of the combatants. Call you honour nothing?
Hum! I fought for honour half of a
reasonably-long
life, and found myself as light at the close of all
my dangers as at the beginning. Honour and I have
shaken hands, unless it be the honour of coming off
conqueror. I have a strong disgust of defeat, but am
always ready to sell the mere honour of the victory
cheap.
Well, let it pass. The quality of the service is
much the same, find the motive where you will.
How now! who has dared to let yonder
top-gallant-sail
fly?
The startling change in the voice of the Rover
caused all within hearing of his words to tremble.
Deep, anxious, and threatening displeasure was in
all its tones, and each man cast his eyes upwards, to
see on whose devoted head the weight of the
dreaded
indignation of their chief was about to fall. As
there was little but naked spars and tightened ropes
to obstruct the view, all became, at the same instant,
apprized of the truth. Fid was standing on the head
of that topmast which belonged to the particular
portion
of the vessel where he was stationed, and the
sail in question was fluttering, with all its gear
loosened
,
far and high in the wind. His hearing had
probably been drowned by the heavy flapping of the
canvas; for, instead of lending his ears to the deep
powerful call just mentioned, he rather stood
contemplating
his work, than exhibiting any anxiety as
to the effect it might produce on the minds of those
beneath him. But a second warning came in tones
too terrible to be any longer disregarded by ears even
as dull as those of the offender.
By whose order have you dared to loosen the
sail? demanded the Rover.
By the order of King Wind, your Honour. The
N 2
best seaman must give in, when a squall gets the
upper
hand.
Furl it! away aloft, and furl it! shouted the
excited leader. Roll it up; and send the fellow
down who has been so bold as to own any authority
but my own in this ship, though it were that of a
hurricane.
A dozen nimble topmen ascended to the assistance
of Fid. In another minute, the unruly canvas was
secured, and Richard himself was on his way to the
poop. During this brief interval, the brow of the
Rover was dark and angry as the surface of the
element
on which he lived, when blackened by the
tempest. Wilder, who had never before seen his new
Commander thus excited, began to tremble for the
fate of his ancient comrade, and drew nigher, as the
latter approached, to intercede in his favour, should
the circumstances seem to require such an
interposition
.
And why is this? the still stern and angry leader
demanded of the offender. Why is it that you,
whom I have had such recent reason to applaud,
should dare to let fly a sail, at a moment when it is
important to keep the ship naked?
Your Honour will admit that his rations
sometimes
slips through the best man's fingers, and why
not a bit of canvas? deliberately returned the
delinquent
.
If I took a turn too many of the gasket
off the yard, it is a fault I am ready to answer for.
You say true, and dearly shall you pay the
forfeit
.
Take him to the gangway, and let him make
acquaintance with the cat.
No new acquaintance, your Honour, seeing that
we have met before, and that, too, for matters which
I had reason to hide my head for; whereas, here, it
may be many blows, and little shame.
May I intercede in behalf of the offender?
interrupted
Wilder, with earnestness and haste. He
is often blundering, but rarely would he err, had he
as much knowledge as good-will.
Say nothing about it, master Harry, returned
the topman, with a peculiar glance of his eye. The
sail has been flying finely, and it is now too late to
deny it; and so, I suppose, the fact must be scored
on the back of Richard Fid, as you would put any
other misfortune into the log.
I would he might be pardoned. I can venture
to promise, in his name, 'twill be the last offence
Let it be forgotten, returned the Rover,
struggling
powerfully to conquer his passion. I will not
disturb our harmony at such a moment, Mr Wilder,
by refusing so small a boon: but you need not be
told to what evil such negligence might lead. Give
me the glass again; I will see if the fluttering canvas
has escaped the eye of the stranger.
The topman bestowed a stolen but exulting glance
on Wilder, and then the latter motioned the other
hastily away, turning himself to join his Commander
in the examination.
CHAPTER X.
As I am an honest man, he looks pale: Art thou sick, or angry?
Much ado about Nothing
.
The
approach of the strange sail was becoming
rapidly more and more visible to the naked eye. The
little speck of white, which had first been seen on
the margin of the sea, resembling some gull floating
on the summit of a wave, had gradually arisen
during
the last half hour, until a tall pyramid of canvas
was reared on the water. As Wilder bent his look
again on this growing object, the Rover put a glass
into his hands, with an expression of feature which
the other understood to say, You may perceive that
the carelessness of your dependant has already
betrayed
us! Still the look was one rather of regret
than of reproach; nor did a single syllable of the
tongue confirm the meaning language of the eye. On
the contrary, it would seem that his Commander was
anxious to preserve their recent amicable compact
inviolate; for, when the young mariner attempted an
awkward explanation of the probable causes of the
blunder of Fid, he was met by a quiet gesture, which
said, in a sufficiently intelligible language, that the
offence was already pardoned.
Our neighbour keeps a good look-out, as you may
see, observed the other. He has tacked, and is
laying boldly up across our fore-foot. Well, let him
come on; we shall soon get a look at his battery, and
then may we come to our conclusion as to the nature
of the intercourse we are to hold.
If you permit the stranger to near us, it might be
difficult to throw him off the chase, should we be
glad to get rid of him.
It must be a fast-going vessel to which the `
Dolphin'
cannot spare a top-gallant-sail.
I know not, sir. The sail in sight is swift on the
wind, and it is to be believed that she is no duller off.
I have rarely known a vessel rise so rapidly as she
has done since first we made her.
The youth spoke with such earnestness, as to draw
the attention of his companion from the object he
was studying to the countenance of the speaker.
Mr Wilder, he said quickly, and with an air of
decision, you know the ship?
I'll not deny it. If my opinion be true, she will
be found too heavy for the `Dolphin,' and a vessel
that offers little inducement for us to attempt to carry.
Her size?
You heard it from the black.
Your followers know her also?
It would be difficult to deceive a topman in the
cut and trim of sails among which he has passed
months, nay years.
I understand the `new cloths' in her
top-gallant-royal
!
Mr Wilder, your departure from that vessel
has been recent?
As my arrival in this.
The Rover continued silent for several minutes,
communing with his own thoughts. His companion
made no offer to disturb his meditations; though the
furtive glances, he often cast in the direction of the
other's musing eye, betrayed some little anxiety to
learn the result of his self-communication.
And her guns? at length his Commander
abruptly
demanded.
She numbers four more than the `Dolphin.'
The metal?
Is still heavier. In every particular is she a ship
a size above your own.
Doubtless she is the property of the King?
She is.
Then shall she change her masters. By heaven,
she shall be mine!
Wilder shook his head, answering only with an
incredulous
smile.
You doubt it, resumed the Rover. Come
hither, and look upon that deck. Can he whom you
so lately quitted muster fellows like these, to do his
biddings?
The crew of the `Dolphin' had been chosen, by
one who thoroughly understood the character of a
seaman, from among all the different people of the
Christian world. There was not a maritime nation
in Europe which had not its representative among
that band of turbulent and desperate spirits. Even
the descendant of the aboriginal possessors of America
had been made to abandon the habits and opinions of
his progenitors, to become a wanderer on that
element
which had laved the shores of his native land
for ages, without exciting a wish to penetrate its
mysteries
in the bosoms of his simple-minded ancestry.
All had been suited, by lives of wild adventure, on
the two elements, for their present lawless pursuits;
and, directed by the mind which had known how to
obtain and to continue its despotic ascendancy over
their efforts, they truly formed a most dangerous and
(considering their numbers) resistless crew. Their
Commander smiled in exultation, as he watched the
evident reflection with which his companion
contemplated
the indifference, or fierce joy, which different
individuals among them exhibited at the appearance
of an approaching conflict. Even the rawest of their
numbers, the luckless waisters and after-guard, were
apparently as confident of victory as those whose
audacity
might plead the apology of uniform and often
repeated success.
Count you these for nothing? asked the Rover,
at the elbow of his lieutenant, after allowing him time
to embrace the whole of the grim band with his eye.
See! here is a Dane, ponderous and steady as the
gun at which I shall shortly place him. You may
cut him limb from limb, and yet will he stand like a
tower, until the last stone of the foundation has been
sapped. And, here, we have his neighbours, the Swede
and the Russ, fit companions for managing the same
piece; which, I'll answer, shall not be silent, while a
man of them all is left to apply a match, or handle
a spunge. Yonder is a square-built athletic mariner,
from one of the Free Towns. He prefers our liberty
to that of his native city; and you shall find that the
venerable Hanseatic institutions shall give way sooner
than he be known to quit the spot I give him to
defend
.
Here, you see a brace of Englishmen; and,
though they come from the island that I love so little,
better men at need will not be often found. Feed
them, and flog them, and I pledge myself to their
swaggering, and their courage. D'ye see that
thoughtful-looking
,
bony miscreant, that has a look of
godliness
in the midst of all his villany? That fellow fish'd
for herring till he got a taste of beef, when his
stomach
revolted at its ancient fare; and then the
ambition
of becoming rich got uppermost. He is a Scot.
from one of the lochs of the North.
Will he fight?
For moneythe honour of the Macsand his
religion. He is a reasoning fellow, after all: and I
like to have him on my own side in a quarrel. Ah!
yonder is the boy for a charge. I once told him to
cut a rope in a hurry, and he severed it above his
head, instead of beneath his feet, taking a flight from
a lower yard into the sea, as a reward for the exploit.
But, then, he always extols his presence of mind in
not drowning! Now are his ideas in a hot ferment;
and, if the truth could be known, I would wager a
handsome venture, that the sail in sight is, by some
mysterious process, magnified to six in his fertile
fancy.
He must be thinking, then, of escape.
Far from it; he is rather plotting the means of
surrounding them with the `Dolphin.' To your true
Hibernian, escape is the last idea that gives him an
uneasy moment. You see the pensive-looking,
sallow
mortal, at his elbow. That is a man who will
fight with a sort of sentiment. There is a touch of
chivalry in him, which might be worked into
heroism
,
if one had but the opportunity and the
inclination
.
As it is, he will not fail to show a spark of the
true Castilian. His companion has come from the
Rock of Lisbon; I should trust him unwillingly, did I
not know that little opportunity of taking pay from
the enemy is given here. Ah! here is a lad for a
dance of a Sunday. You see him, at this moment,
with foot and tongue going together. That is a
creature
of contradictions. He wants for neither wit nor
good-nature, but still he might cut your throat on an
occasion. There is a strange medley of ferocity and
bonhommie about the animal. I shall put him among
the boarders; for we shall not be at blows a minute
before his impatience will be for carrying every thing
by a coup-de-main.
And who is the seaman at his elbow, that
apparently
is occupied in divesting his person of some
superfluous garments? demanded Wilder, irresistibly
attracted, by the manner of the Rover, to pursue the
subject.
An economical Dutchman. He calculates that
it is just as wise to be killed in an old jacket as in
a new one; and has probably said as much to his
Gascon neighbour, who is, however, resolved to die
decently, if die he must. The former has happily
commenced
his preparations for the combat in good
season
,
or the enemy might defeat us before he would be
in readiness. Did it rest between these two worthies
to decide this quarrel, the mercurial Frenchman
would defeat his neighbour of Holland, before the
latter
believed the battle had commenced; but, should
he let the happy moment pass, rely on it, the
Dutchman
would give him trouble. Forget you, Wilder,
that the day has been when the countrymen of that
slow-moving and heavy-moulded fellow swept the
narrow seas with a broom at their mast-heads?
The Rover smiled wildly as he spoke, and what
he said he uttered with bitter emphasis. To his
companion
,
however, there appeared no such grounds of
unnatural exultation, in recalling the success of a
foreign
enemy, and he was content to assent to the truth
of the historical fact with a simple inclination of his
head. As if he even found pain in this confession,
and would gladly be rid of the mortifying reflection
altogether, he rejoined, in some apparent haste,
You have overlooked the two tall seamen, who
are making out the rig of the stranger with so much
gravity of observation.
Ay, those are men that came from a land in
which we both feel some interest. The sea is not
more unstable than are those rogues in their knavery.
Their minds are but half made up to piracy.'Tis
a coarse word, Mr Wilder, but I fear we earn it.
But these rascals make a reservation of grace in the
midst of all their villany.
They regard the stranger as if they saw reason
to distrust the wisdom of letting him approach so
near.
Ah! they are renowned calculators. I fear they
have detected the four supernumerary guns you
mentioned
;
for their vision seems supernatural in affairs
which touch their interests. But you see there is
brawn and sinew in the fellows; and, what is better,
there are heads which teach them to turn those
advantages
to account.
You think they fail in spirit?
Hum! It might be dangerous to try it on any
point they deemed material. They are no
quarrellers
about words, and seldom lose sight of certain
musty maxims, which they pretend come from a
volume that I fear you and I do not study too
intently
.
It is not often that they strike a blow for mere
chivalry; and, were they so inclined, the rogues are
too much disposed to logic, to mistake, like your
black, the `Dolphin' for a church. Still, if they see
reason, in their puissant judgments, to engage, mark
me, the two guns they command will do better
service
than all the rest of the battery. But, should
they think otherwise, it would occasion no surprise
were I to receive a proposition to spare the powder
for some more profitable adventure. Honour,
forsooth
!
the miscreants are too well grounded in
polemics to mistake the point of honour in a pursuit
like ours. But we chatter of trifles, when it is time
to think of serious things. Mr Wilder, we will now
show our canvas.
Vol. II. O
The manner of the Rover changed as suddenly as
his language. Losing the air of sarcastic levity in
which he had been indulging, in a mien better suited
to maintain the authority he wielded, he walked
aside, while his subordinate proceeded to issue the
orders necessary to enforce his commands.
Nightingale
sounded the usual summons, lifting his hoarse
voice in the cry of All hands make sail, ahoy!
Until now, the people of the Dolphin had made
their observations on the sail, that was growing so
rapidly above the waters, according to their several
humours. Some had exulted in the prospect of a
capture; others, more practised in the ways of their
Commander, had deemed the probability of their
coming in collision at all with the stranger a point
far from settled; while a few, more accustomed to
reflection, shook their heads as the stranger drew
nigher, as if they believed he was already within a
distance that might be attended with too much
hazard
.
Still, as they were ignorant alike of those
secret
sources of information which the chief had so
frequently proved he possessed, to an extent that
often seemed miraculous, the whole were content
patiently to await his decision. But, when the cry
above mentioned was heard, it was answered by an
activity so general and so cheerful, as to prove it was
entirely welcome. Order now followed order in
quick succession, from the mouth of Wilder, who,
in virtue of his station, was the proper executive
officer for the moment.
As both lieutenant and crew appeared animated
by the same spirit, it was not long before the naked
spars of the Dolphin were clothed in vast volumes
of spotless snow-white canvas. Sail had fallen after
sail, and yard after yard had been raised to the
summit
of its mast, until the vessel bowed before the
breeze, rolling to and fro, but still held stationary by
the position of her yards. When all was in readiness
to proceed, on whichever course might be deemed
necessary, Wilder ascended again to the poop, in
order to announce the fact to his superior. He found
the Rover attentively considering the stranger, whose
hull had by this time risen out of the sea, and
exhibited
a long, dotted, yellow line, which the eye of
every man in the ship well knew to contain the ports
whence the guns that marked her particular force
were made to issue. Mrs Wyllys, accompanied by
Gertrude, stood nigh, thoughtful, as usual, but
permitting
no occurrence of the slightest moment to
escape her vigilance.
We are ready to gather way on the ship, said
Wilder; we wait merely for the course.
The Rover started, and drew closer to his
subordinate
,
before he gave an answer. Then, looking
him full and intently in the eye, he demanded,
You are certain that you know you vessel, Mr
Wilder?
Certain, was the calm reply.
It is a royal cruiser, said the governess, with the
swiftness of thought.
It is. I have already pronounced her to be so.
Mr Wilder, resumed the Rover, we will try
her speed. Let the courses fall, and fill your
forward
sails.
The young mariner made an acknowledgment of
obedience, and proceeded to execute the wishes of his
Commander. There was an eagerness, and perhaps
a trepidation, in the voice of Wilder, as he issued the
necessary orders, that was in remarkable contrast to
the deep-toned calmness which characterized the
utterance
of the Rover. The unusual intonations did
not entirely escape the ears of some of the elder
seamen; and looks of peculiar meaning were
exchanged
among them, as they paused to catch his
words. But obedience followed these unwonted
sounds, as it had been accustomed to succeed the
more imposing utterance of their own long-dreaded
chief. The head-yards were swung, the sails were
distended with the breeze, and the mass, which had
so long been inert, began to divide the waters, as it
heavily overcame the state of rest in which it had
reposed. The ship soon attained its velocity; and
then the contest between the two rival vessels
became
one of deep and engrossing interest.
By this time the stranger was within a half league,
directly under the lee of the Dolphin. Closer
and more accurate observation had satisfied every
understanding eye in the latter ship of the force and
character of their neighbour. The rays of a bright
sun fell clear upon her broadside, while the shadow
of her sails was thrown far across the waters, in a
direction opposite to their own. There were
moments
when the eye, aided by the glass, could
penetrate
through the open ports into the interior of the
hull, catching fleeting and delusory glimpses of the
movements within. A few human forms were
distinctly
visible in different parts of her rigging; but,
in all other respects, the repose of high order and
perfect discipline was discernible on all about her.
When the Rover heard the sounds of the parted
waters, and saw the little jets of spray that the bows
of his own gallant ship cast before her, he signed to
his lieutenant to ascend to the place which he still
occupied on the poop. For many minutes, his eye
was on the strange sail, in close and intelligent
contemplation
of her powers.
Mr Wilder, he at length said, speaking like one
whose doubts on some perplexing point were finally
removed, I have seen that cruiser before.
It is probable; she has roamed over most of the
waters of the Atlantic.
Ay, this is not the first of our meetings! a little
paint has changed her exterior, but I think I know
the manner in which they have stepped her masts.
They are thought to rake more than is usual.
They are thought to do it, with reason. Did you
serve long aboard her?
Years.
And you left her
To join you.
Tell me, Wilder, did they treat you, too, as one
of an inferior order? Ha! was your merit called
`provincial?' Did they read America in all you did?
I left her, Captain Heidegger.
Ay, they gave you reason. For once they have
done me an act of kindness. But you were in her
during the equinox of March?
Wilder made a slight bow of assent.
I thought as much. And you fought a stranger
in the gale? Winds, ocean, and man were all at
work together.
It is true. We knew you, and thought for a time
that your hour had come.
I like your frankness. We have sought each
other's lives like men, and we shall prove the truer
friends, now that amity is established between us.
I will not ask you further of that adventure, Wilder;
for favour, in my service, is not to be bought by
treachery to that you have quitted. It is sufficient
that you now sail under my flag.
What is that flag? demanded a mild but firm
voice, at his elbow.
The Rover turned suddenly, and again met the
riveted, calm, and searching eye of the governess.
The gleamings of some strangely contradictory
passions
crossed his features, and then his whole
countenance
changed to that look of bland courtesy
which he most affected when addressing his captives.
Here speaks a female, to remind two mariners of
their duty! he exclaimed. We have forgotten the
civility of showing the stranger our hunting. Let it
O 2
be set, Mr Wilder, that we may omit none of the
observances of nautical etiquette.
The ship in sight carries a naked gaft.
No matter; we shall be foremost in courtesy.
Let the colours be shown.
Wilder opened the little locker which contained
the flags most in use, but hesitated which to select,
out of a dozen that lay in large rolls within the
different
compartments.
I hardly know which of these ensigns it is your
pleasure to show, he said, in a manner that
appeared
sufficiently like putting a question.
Try him with the heavy-moulded Dutchman.
The Commander of so noble a ship should
understand
all Christian tongues.
The lieutenant made a sign to the quarter-master
on duty; and, in another minute, the flag of the
United Provinces was waving at the peak of the
Dolphin. The two officers narrowly watched its
effect on the stranger, who refused, however, to make
any answering sign to the false signal they had just
exhibited.
The stranger sees we have a hull that was never
made for the shoals of Holland. Perhaps he knows
us? said the Rover, glancing at the same time a
look of inquiry at his companion.
I think not. Paint is too freely used in the `
Dolphin
,'
for even her friends to be certain of her
countenance
.
She is a coquettish ship, we will allow,
returned
the Rover, smiling. Try him with the
Portuguese
:
Let us see if Brazil diamonds have favour in
his eyes.
The colours already set were lowered, and, in
their place, the emblem of the house of Braganza
was loosened to the breeze. Still the stranger
pursued
his course in sullen inattention, eating closer
and closer to the wind, as it is termed in nautical
language, in order to lessen the distance between
him and his chase as much as possible.
An ally cannot move him, said the Rover.
Now let him see the taunting drapeau blanc.
Wilder complied in silence. The flag of Portugal
was hauled to the deck, and the white field of France
was given to the air. The ensign had hardly
fluttered
in its elevated position, before a broad glossy
blazonry
,
rose, like some enormous bird taking wing,
from the deck of the stranger, and opened its folds in
graceful waves at his gaft. The same instant, a
column of smoke issued from his bows, and had
sailed
backward through his rigging, ere the report of
the gun of defiance found its way, against the fresh
breeze of the trades, to the ears of the Dolphin's
crew.
So much for national amity! dryly observed the
Rover. He is mute to the Dutchman, and to the
crown of Braganza; but the very bile is stirred
within him at the sight of a table-cloth! Let him
contemplate the colours he loves so little, Mr Wilder;
when we are tired of showing them, our lockers may
furnish another.
It would seem, however, that the sight of the flag,
which the Rover now chose to bear, produced some
such effect on his neighbour as the moleta of the
nimble banderillo is known to exite in the enraged
bull. Sundry smaller sails, which could do but little
good, but which answered the purpose of appearing
to wish to quicken his speed, were instantly set aboard
the stranger; and not a brace, or a bow-line, was
suffered
to escape without an additional pull. In short,
he wore the air of the courser who receives the
useless
blows of the jockey, when already at the top of
his speed, and when any further excitement is as
fruitless
as his own additional exertions. Still there
seemed but little need of such supererogatory efforts.
By this time, the two vessels were fairly trying their
powers of sailing, and with no visible advantage in
favour of either. Although the Dolphin was
renowned
for her speed, the stranger manifested no
inferiority
that the keenest scrutiny might detect. The
ship of the freebooter was already bending to the
breeze, and the jets of spray before her were cast
still higher and further in advance; but each impulse
of the wind was equally felt by the stranger, and
her movement over the heaving waters seemed to be
as rapid and as graceful as that of her rival.
Yon ship parts the water as a swallow cuts the
air, observed the chief of the freebooters to the
youth, who still kept at his elbow, endeavouring to
conceal an uneasiness which was increasing at each
instant. Has she a name for speed?
The curlew is scarcely faster. Are we not
already
nigh enough, for men who cruise with
commissions
no better than our own pleasure?
The Rover glanced a look of impatient suspicion
at the countenance of his companion; but its
expression
changed to a smile of haughty audacity, as he
answered,
Let him equal the eagle in his highest and swiftest
flight, he shall find us no laggards on the wing! Why
this reluctance to be within a mile of a vessel of the
Crown?
Because I know her force, and the hopeless
character of a contest with an enemy so superior,
returned Wilder, firmly. Captain Heidegger, you
cannot fight you ship with success; and, unless
instant
use be made of the distance which still exists
between us, you cannot escape her. Indeed, I know
not but it is already too late to attempt the latter.
Such, sir, is the opinion of one who overrates
the powers of his enemy, because use, and much
talking, have taught him to reverence it as something
more than human. Mr Wilder, none are so daring,
or so modest, as those who have long been
accustomed
to place their dependance on their own
exertions
.
I have been nigher to a flag even, and yet
you see I continue to keep on this mortal coil.
Hark! 'Tis a drum. The stranger is going to
his guns.
The Rover listened a moment, and was able to
catch the well-known beat which calls the people of
a vessel of war to quarters. First casting a glance
upward at his sails, and then throwing a general and
critical look on all and every thing which came
within
the influence of his command, he calmly
answered
,
We will imitate his example, Mr Wilder. Let
the order be given.
Until now, the crew of the Dolphin had either
been occupied in such necessary duties as had been
assigned them, or were engaged in gazing with
curious
eyes at the ship which so eagerly sought to draw
as near as possible to their own dangerous vessel.
The low but continued hum of voices, sounds such
alone as discipline permitted, had afforded the only
evidence of the interest they took in the scene; but,
the instant the first tap on the drum was heard, each
groupe severed, and every man repaired, with
bustling
activity, to his well-known station. The stir
among the crew was but of a moment's continuance,
and it was succeeded by the breathing stillness which
has already been noticed in our pages on a similar
occasion. The officers, however, were seen making
hasty, but strict, inquiries into the conditions of their
several commands; while the munitions of war, that
were quickly drawn from their places of deposit,
announced a preparation more serious than ordinary.
The Rover himself had disappeared; but it was not
long before he was again seen at his elevated look-out,
accoutred for the conflict that appeared to approach,
and employed, as ever, in studying the properties,
the force, and the evolutions of his advancing
antagonist
.
Those who knew him best, however, said
that the question of combat was not yet decided in
his mind; and hundreds of eager glances were thrown
in the direction of his contracting eye, as if to
penetrate
the mystery in which he still chose to conceal
his purpose. He had thrown aside the sea-cap, and
stood with the fair hair blowing about a brow that
seemed formed to give birth to thoughts far nobler
than those which apparently had occupied his life;
while a species of leathern helmet lay at his feet, the
garniture of which was of a nature to lend an
unnatural
fierceness to the countenance of its wearer.
Whenever this boarding-cap was worn, all in the
ship were given to understand that the moment of
serious strife was at hand; but, as yet, that
never-failing
evidence of the hostile intention of their
leader
was unnoticed.
In the mean time, each officer had examined into,
and reported, the state of his division; and then, by
a sort of implied permission on the part of their
superiors, the death-like calm, which had hitherto
reigned among the people, was allowed to be broken
by suppressed but earnest discourse; the calculating
chief permitting this departure from the usual rules
of more regular cruisers, in order to come at the
temper of the crew, on which so much of the
success
of his desperate enterprises so frequently
depended
.
CHAPTER XI.
For he made me mad,
To see him shine so brisk, and smell so sweet,
And talk so like a waiting gentlewoman.
King Henry IV
.
The
moment was now one of high and earnest
excitement. Each individual, who was charged with
a portion of the subordinate authority of the ship,
had examined into the state of his command, with
that engrossing care which always deepens as
responsibility
draws nigher to the proofs of its being
worthily bestowed. The voice of the harsh master
had ceased to inquire into the state of those several
ropes and chains that were deemed vital to the
safety
of the vessel; each chief of a battery had assured
and re-assured himself that his artillery was ready
for instant, and the most effective, service; extra
ammunition had already issued from its dark and
secret repository; and even the hum of dialogue had
ceased, in the more engrossing and all-absorbing
interest
of the scene. Still the quick and
ever-changing
glance of the Rover could detect no reason to
distrust the firmness of his people. They were
grave, as are ever the bravest and steadiest in the hour
of trial; but their gravity was mingled with no signs
of concern. It seemed rather like the effect of
desperate
and concentrated resolution, such as braces
the human mind to efforts which exceed the ordinary
daring of martial enterprise. To this cheering
exhibition
of the humour of his crew the wary and
sagacious leader saw but three exceptions; they
were found in the persons of his lieutenant and his
two remarkable associates.
It has been seen that the bearing of Wilder was
not altogether such as became one of his rank in a
moment of great trial. The keen, jealous glances of
the Rover had studied and re-studied his manner,
without arriving at any satisfactory conclusion as to
its real cause. The colour was as fresh on the cheeks
of the youth, and his limbs were as firm as in the
hours of entire security; but the unsettled
wandering
of his eye, and an air of doubt and indecision
which pervaded a mien that ought to display
qualities
so opposite, gave his Commander cause for deep
reflection. As if to find an explanation of the enigma
in the deportment of the associates of Wilder, his
look sought the persons of Fid and the negro. They
were both stationed at the piece nearest to the place
he himself occupied, the former filling the station of
captain of the gun.
The ribs of the ship itself were not firmer in their
places than was the attitude of the topman, as he
occasionally squinted along the massive iron tube
over which he was placed in command; nor was
that familiar and paternal care, which distinguishes
the seaman's interest in his particular trust, wanting
in his manner. Still, an air of broad and
inexplicable
surprise had possession of his rugged lineaments;
and ever, as his look wandered from the countenance
of Wilder to their adversary, it was not difficult to
discover that he marvelled to find the two in
opposition
.
He neither commented on, nor complained,
however, of an occurrence he evidently found so
extraordinary, but appeared perfectly disposed to
pursue the spirit of that well-known maxim of the
mariner which teaches the obedient tar to obey
orders, though he break owners. Every portion
of the athletic form of the negro was motionless,
except his eyes. These large, jet-black orbs,
however
,
rolled incessantly, like the more dogmatic
organs
of the topman, from Wilder to the strange sail,
seeming to drink in fresh draughts of astonishment
at each new look.
Struck by these evident manifestations of some
extraordinary and yet common sentiment between
the two, the Rover profited by his own position, and
the distance of the lieutenant, to address them.
Leaning over the slight rail that separated the break
of the poop from the quarter-deck, he said, in that
familiar manner which the Commander is most wont
to use to his inferiors when their services are
becoming
of the greatest importance,
I hope, master Fid, they have put you at a gun
that knows how to speak.
There is not a smoother bore, nor a wider
mouth, in the ship, your Honour, than these of
`Blazing Billy,'  returned the topman, giving the
subject of his commendations an affectionate slap.
All I ask is a clean spunge and a tight wad. Guinea,
score a foul anchor, in your own fashion, on a half
dozen of the shot; and, after the matter is all over,
they who live through it may go aboard the enemy,
and see in what manner Richard Fid has planted his
seed.
You are not new in action, master Fid?
Lord bless your Honour! gunpowder is no more
than dry tobacco in my nostrils! tho'f I will say
You were going to add
That sometimes I find myself shifted over, in
these here affairs, returned the topman, glancing his
eye first at the flag of France, and then at the
distant
emblem of England, like a jib-boom rigged,
abaft, for a jury to the spanker. I suppose master
Harry has it all in his pocket, in black and white;
but this much I will say, that, if I must throw stones,
I should rather see them break a neighbour's
crockery
,
than that of my own mother.I say, Guinea,
score a couple more of the shot; since, if the play
is to be acted, I've a mind the `Blazing Billy' should
do something creditable for the honour of her good
name.
Vol. IL P
The Rover drew back, thoughtful and silent. He
then caught a look from Wilder, whom he again
beckoned to approach.
Mr Wilder, he said, in a tone of kindness, I
comprehend your feelings. All have not offended
alike in yonder vessel, and you would rather your
service against that haughty flag should commence
with some other ship. There is little else but empty
honour to be gained in the conflictin tenderness to
your feelings, I will avoid it.
It is too late, said Wilder, with a melancholy
shake of the head.
You shall see your error. The experiment may
cost us a broadside, but it shall succeed. Go,
descend
with our guests to a place of safety; and, by
the time you return, the scene shall have undergone
a change.
Wilder eagerly disappeared in the cabin, whither
Mrs Wyllys had already withdrawn; and, after
communicating
the intentions of his Commander to avoid
an action, he conducted them into the depths of the
vessel, in order that no casualty might arrive to
imbitter
his recollections of the hour. This grateful
duty promptly and solicitously performed, our
adventurer
again sought the deck, with the velocity of
thought.
Notwithstanding his absence had seemed but of a
moment, the scene had indeed changed in all its
hostile
images. In place of the flag of France, he
found the ensign of England floating at the peak of
the Dolphin, and a quick and intelligible exchange
of lesser signals in active operation between the two
vessels. Of all that cloud of canvas which had so
lately borne down the vessel of the Rover, her
topsails
alone remained distended to the yards; the
remainder
was hanging in festoons, and fluttering
loosely
before a favourable breeze. The ship itself was
running directly for the stranger, who, in turn, was
sullenly securing his lofty sails, like one who was
disappointed
in a high-prized and expected object.
Now is yon fellow sorry to believe him a friend
whom he had lately supposed an enemy, said the
Rover, directing the attention of his lieutenant to the
confiding manner with which their neighbour suffered
himself to be deceived by his surreptitiously obtained
signals. It is a tempting offer; but I pass it, Wilder,
for your sake.
The gaze of the lieutenant seemed bewildered,
but he made no reply. Indeed, but little time was
given for deliberation or discourse. The Dolphin
rolled swiftly along her path, and each moment
dissipated
the mist in which distance had enveloped the
lesser objects on board the stranger. Guns, blocks,
ropes, bolts, men, and even features, became plainly
visible, in rapid succession, as the water that divided
them was parted by the bows of the lawless ship. In
a few short minutes, the stranger, having secured
most of his lighter canvas, came sweeping up to the
wind; and then, as his after-sails, squared for the
purpose, took the breeze on their outer surface, the
mass of his hull became stationary.
The people of the Dolphin had so far imitated
the confiding credulity of the deceived cruiser of the
Crown, as to furl all their loftiest duck, each man
employed in the service trusting implicitly to the
discretion
and daring of the singular being whose
pleasure
it was to bring their ship into so hazardous a
proximity to a powerful enemyqualities that had
been known to avail them in circumstances of even
greater delicacy than those in which they were now
placed. With this air of audacious confidence, the
dreaded Rover came gliding down upon her
unsuspecting
neighbour, until within a few hundred feet
of her weather-beam, when she too, with a graceful
curve in her course, bore up against the breeze, and
came to a state of rest. But Wilder, who regarded
all the movements of his superior in silent
amazement
,
was not slow in observing that the head of the
Dolphin was laid a different way from that of the
other, and that her progress had been arrested by the
counteracting position of her head-yards; a
circumstance
that afforded the advantage of a quicker
command
of the ship, should need require a sudden
recourse
to the guns.
The Dolphin was still drifting slowly under the
last influence of her recent motion, when the
customary
hoarse and nearly unintelligible summons
came over the water, demanding her appellation and
character. The Rover applied his trumpet to his
lips, with a meaning glance that was directed towards
his lieutenant, and returned the name of a ship, in
the service of the King, that was known to be of the
size and force of his own vessel.
Ay, ay, returned a voice from out of the other
ship, 'twas so I made out your signals.
The hail was then reciprocated, and the name of
the royal cruiser given in return, followed by an
invitation
from her Commander, to his brother in
authority
,
to visit his superior.
Thus far, no more had occurred than was usual
between seamen in the same service; but the affair
was rapidly arriving at a point that most men would
have found too embarrassing for further deception.
Still the observant eye of Wilder detected no
hesitation
or doubt in the manner of his chief. The beat
of the drum was heard from the cruiser, announcing
the retreat from quarters; and, with perfect
composure
,
he directed the same signal to be given for
his own people to retire from their guns. In short,
five minutes established every appearance of entire
confidence and amity between two vessels which
would have soon been at deadly strife, had the true
character of one been known to the other. In this
state of the doubtful game he played, and with the
invitation still ringing in the ears of Wilder, the
Rover motioned his lieutenant to his side.
You hear that I am desired to visit my senior in
the service of his Majesty, he said, with a smile of
irony playing about his scornful lip. Is it your
pleasure to be of the party?
The start with which Wilder received this hardy
proposal was far too natural to proceed from any
counterfeited emotion.
You are not so mad as to run the risk! he
exclaimed
,
when words were at command.
If you fear for yourself, I can go alone.
Fear! echoed the youth, a bright flush giving
an additional glow to the flashing of his kindling eye.
It is not fear, Captain Heidegger, but prudence,
that tells me to keep concealed. My presence would
betray the character of this ship. You forget that I
am known to all in yonder cruiser.
I had indeed forgotten that portion of the plot.
Then remain, while I go to play upon the credulity
of his Majesty's Captain.
Without waiting for an answer, the Rover led the
way below, signing for his companion to follow. A
few moments sufficed to arrange the fair golden locks
that imparted such a look of youth and vivacity to
the countenance of the former. The undress,
fanciful
frock he wore in common was exchanged for
the attire of one of his assumed rank and service,
which had been made to fit his person with the nicest
care, and with perhaps a coxcomical attention to the
proportions of his really fine person; and in all other
things was he speedily equipped for the disguise he
chose to affect. No sooner were these alterations in
his appearance completed, (and they were effected
with a brevity and readiness that manifested much
practice in similar artifices), than he disposed himself
to proceed on the intended experiment.
Truer and quicker eyes have been deceived.
P 2
he coolly observed, turning his glance from a mirror
to the countenance of his lieutenant, as he spoke,
than those which embellish the countenance of
Captain Bignall.
You know him, then?
Mr Wilder, my business imposes the necessity of
knowing much that other men overlook. Now is
this adventure, which, by your features, I perceive
you deem so forlorn in its hopes of success, one of
easy achievement. I am convinced that not an
officer
or man on board the `Dart' has ever seen the
ship whose name I have chosen to usurp. She is too
fresh from the stocks to incur that risk. Then is
there little probability that I, in my other self, shall
be compelled to acknowledge acquaintance with any
of her officers; for you well know that years have
passed since your late ship has been in Europe; and,
by running your eye over these books, you will
perceive
I am that favoured mortal, the son of a Lord,
and have not only grown into command, but into
manhood, since her departure from home.
These are certainly favouring circumstances, and
such as I had not the sagacity to detect.But why
incur the risk at all?
Why! Perhaps there is a deep-laid scheme to
learn if the prize would repay the loss of her
capture
;
perhapsit is my humour. There is fearful
excitement in the adventure.
And there is fearful danger.
I never count the price of these enjoyments.
Wilder, he added, turning to him with a look of
frank and courteous confidence, I place life and
honour in your keeping; for to me it would be
dishonour
to desert the interests of my crew.
The trust shall be respected, repeated our
adventurer
,
in a tone so deep and choaked as to be
nearly unintelligible.
Regarding the still ingenuous countenance of his
companion intently for an instant, the Rover smiled,
as if he approved of the pledge, waved his hand in
adieu, and, turning, was about to leave the cabin;
but a third form, at that moment, caught his
wandering
glance. Laying a hand lightly on the shoulder
of the boy, whose form was placed somewhat
obtrusively
in his way, he demanded, a little sternly,
Roderick, what means this preparation?
To follow my master to the boat.
Boy, thy service is not needed.
It is rarely wanted of late.
Why should I add unnecessarily to the risk of
lives, where no good can attend the hazard?
In risking your own, you risk all to me, was the
answer, given in a tone so resigned, and yet so
faltering
,
that the tremulous and nearly smothered sounds
caught no ears but those for whom they were
intended
.
The Rover for a time replied not. His hand still
kept its place on the shoulder of the boy, whose
working
features his riveted eye read, as the organ is
sometimes
wont to endeavour to penetrate the mystery of
the human heart.
Roderick, he at length said, in a milder and a
far kinder voice, your lot shall be mine; we go
together.
Then, dashing his hand hastily across his brow,
the wayward chief ascended the ladder, attended by
the lad, and followed by the individual in whose faith
he reposed so great a trust. The step with which
the Rover trod his deck was firm, and the bearing of
his form as steady as though he felt no hazard in his
undertaking. His look passed, with a seaman's care,
from sail to sail; and not a brace, yard, or bow-line
escaped the quick understanding glances he cast about
him, before he proceeded to the side, in order to
enter
a boat which he had already ordered to be in
waiting. A glimmering of distrust and hesitation
was now, for the first time, discoverable through the
haughty and bold decision of his features. For a
moment
,
his foot lingered on the ladder. Davis, he
said sternly to the individual whom, by his own
experience
,
he knew to be so long practised in
treachery
,
leave the boat. Send me the gruff captain
of the forecastle in his place. So bold a talker, in
common, should know how to be silent at need.
The exchange was instantly made; for no one,
there, was ever known to dispute a mandate that was
uttered with the air of authority he then wore. A
deeply intent attitude of thought succeeded, and then
every shadow of care vanished from that brow, on
which a look of high and generous confidence was
seated, as he added,
Wilder, adieu! I leave you Captain of my
people
,
and master of my fate: Certain I am that both
trusts are reposed in worthy hands.
Without waiting for reply, as if he scorned the vain
ceremony of idle assurances, he descended swiftly to
the boat, which at the next instant was pulling
boldly
towards the King's cruiser. The brief interval
which succeeded, between the departure of the
adventurers
and their arrival at the hostile ship, was
one of intense and absorbing suspense on the part of
all whom they had left behind. The individual most
interested in the event, however, betrayed neither in
eye nor movement any of the anxiety which so
intently
beset the minds of his followers. He
mounted
the side of his enemy amid the honours due to his
imaginary rank, with a self-possession and ease that
might readily have been mistaken, by those who
believe
these fancied qualities have a real existence, for
the grace and dignity of lofty recollections and high
birth. His reception, by the honest veteran whose
long and hard services had received but a meager
reward in the vessel he commanded, was frank,
manly
,
and seaman-like. No sooner had the usual
greetings
passed, than the latter conducted his guest into
his own apartments.
Find such a birth, Captain Howard, as suits your
inclination, said the unceremonious old seaman,
seating himself as frankly as he invited his
companion
to imitate his example. A gentleman of your
extraordinary merit must be reluctant to lose time in
useless words, though you are so youngyoung for
the pretty command it is your good fortune to enjoy!
On the contrary, I do assure you I begin to feel
myself quite an antediluvian, returned the Rover,
coolly placing himself at the opposite side of the
table, where he might, from time to time, look his
half-disgusted companion full in the eye; Would
you imagine it, sir? I shall have reached the age of
three-and-twenty, if I live through the day.
I had given you a few more years, young
gentleman
;
but London can ripen the human face as
speedily
as the Equator.
You never said truer words, sir. Of all cruising
grounds, Heaven defend me from that of St. James's!
I do assure you, Bignall, the service is quite sufficient
to wear out the strongest constitution. There were
moments when I really thought I should have died
that humble, disagreeable mortala lieutenant!
Your disease would then have been a galloping
consumption! muttered the indignant old seaman.
They have sent you out in a pretty boat at last,
Captain Howard.
She's bearable, Bignall, but frightfully small. I
told my father, that, if the First Lord didn't speedily
regenerate the service, by building more comfortable
vessels, the navy would get altogether into vulgar
hands. Don't you find the motion excessively
annoying
in these single-deck'd ships, Bignall?
When a man has been tossing up and down for
five-and-forty years, Captain Howard, returned his
host, stroking his gray locks, for want of some other
manner of suppressing his ire, he gets to be
indifferent
whether his ship pitches a foot more or a foot
less.
Ah! that, I dare say, is what one calls
philosophical
equanimity, though little to my humour. But,
after this cruise, I am to be posted; and then I shall
make interest for a guard-ship in the Thames; every
thing goes by interest now-a-days, you know,
Bignall
.
The honest old tar swallowed his displeasure as
well as he could; and, as the most effectual means of
keeping himself in a condition to do credit to his own
hospitality, he hastened to change the subject.
I hope, among other new fashions, Captain
Howard
,
he said, the flag of Old England continues to
fly over the Admiralty. You wore the colours of
Louis so long this morning, that another half hour
might have brought us to loggerheads.
Oh! that was an excellent military ruse! I shall
certainly write the particulars of that deception
home.
Do so; do so, sir; you may get knighthood for
the exploit.
Horrible, Bignall! my Lady mother would faint
at the suggestion. Nothing so low has been in the
family, I do assure you, since the time when chivalry
was genteel.
Well, well, Captain Howard, it was happy for us
both that you got rid of your Gallic humour so soon;
for a little more time would have drawn a broadside
from me. By heavens, sir, the guns of this ship
would have gone off of themselves, in another five
minutes!
It is quite happy as it is.What do you find to
amuse you (yawning) in this dull quarter of the world,
Bignall?
Why, sir, what between his Majesty's enemies,
the care of my ship, and the company of my officers,
I find few heavy moments.
Ah! your officers: True, you
must
have officers
on board; though, I suppose, they are a little oldish to
be agreeable to
you
. Will you favour me with a sight
of the list?
The Commander of the `Dart' did as he was
requested
,
putting the quarter-bill of his ship into the
hands of his unknown enemy, with an eye that was
far too honest to condescend to bestow even a look
on a being so much despised.
What a list of thorough 'mouthers! All
Yarmouth
,
and Plymouth, and Portsmouth, and Exmouth
names, I do affirm. Here are Smiths enough to do
the iron-work of the whole ship. Ha! here is a
fellow
that might do good service in a deluge. Who
may be this Henry Ark, that I find rated as your first
lieutenant?
A youth who wants but a few drops of your
blood, Captain Howard, to be one day at the head
of his Majesty's fleet.
If he be then so extraordinary for his merit,
Captain
Bignall, may I presume on your politeness to ask
him to favour us with his society. I always give my
lieutenant
half an hour of a morningif he be genteel.
Poor boy! God knows where he is to be found
at this moment. The noble fellow has embarked,
of his own accord, on a most dangerous service, and
I am as ignorant as yourself of his success.
Remonstrance
,
and even entreaties, were of no avail. The
Admiral had great need of a suitable agent, and the
good of the nation demanded the risk; then, you
know, men of humble birth must earn their
preferment
in cruising elsewhere than at St. James's; for
the brave lad is indebted to a wreck, in which he
was found an infant, for the very name you find so
singular.
He is, however, still borne upon your books as
first lieutenant?
And I hope ever will be, until he shall get the
ship he so well merits.Good Heaven! are you ill,
Captain Howard? Boy, a tumbler of grog here.
I thank you, sir, returned the Rover, smiling
calmly, and rejecting the offered beverage, as the
blood returned into his features, with a violence that
threatened to break through the ordinary boundaries
of its currents. It is no more than an ailing I
inherit
from my mother. We call it, in our family, the
`de Vere ivory;' for no other reason, that I could
ever learn, than that one of my female ancestors was
particularly startled, in a delicate situation, you know,
by an elephant's tooth. I am told it has rather an
amiable look, while it lasts.
It has the look of a man who is fitter for his
mother's nursery than a gale of wind. But I am glad
it is so soon over.
No one wears the same face long now-a-days,
Bignall.And so this Mr Ark is not any body, after
all!
I know not what you call `any body,' sir; but,
if sterling courage, great professional merit, and stern
loyalty, count for any thing on your late cruising
grounds, Captain Howard, Henry Ark will soon be
in command of a frigate.
Perhaps, if one only knew exactly on what to
found his claims, continued the Rover, with a smile
so kind, and a voice so insinuating, that they half
counteracted the effect of his assumed manner, a
word might be dropped, in a letter home, that should
do the youth no harm.
I would to Heaven I dare but reveal the nature
of the service he is on! eagerly returned the
warm-hearted
old seaman, who was as quick to forget, as
he was sudden to feel, disgust. You may,
however
,
safely say, from his general character, that it is
honourable, hazardous, and has the entire good of
his Majesty's subjects in view. Indeed, an hour has
scarcely gone by since I thought that it was
completely
successful.Do you often set your lofty sails,
Captain Howard, while the heavier canvas is rolled
upon the yards? To me, a ship clothed in that style
looks something like a man with his coat on, before
he has cased his legs in the lower garment.
You allude to the accident of my
maintop-gallant-sail
getting loose when you first made me?
I mean no other. We had caught a glimpse of
your spars with the glass; but had lost you altogether,
when the flying duck met the eye of a look-out. To
say the least, it was remarkable, and it might have
proved an awkward circumstance.
Ah! I often do things in that way, in order to be
odd. It is a sign of cleverness to be odd, you know.
But I, too, am sent into these seas on a special
errand.
Such as what? bluntly demanded his
companion
,
with an uneasiness about his frowning eye that
he was far too simple-minded to conceal.
To look for a ship that will certainly give me a
famous lift, should I have the good luck to fall in with
her. For some time, I took you for the very
gentleman
I was in search of; and I do assure you, if your
signals had not been so very unexceptionable,
something
serious might have happened between us.
And pray, sir, for whom did you take me?
For no other than that notorious knave the Red
Rover.
The devil you did! And do you suppose,
Captain
Howard, there is a pirate afloat who carries such
hamper above his head as is to be found aboard the
`Dart?' Such a set to her sailssuch a step to her
mastsand such a trim to her hull? I hope, for the
honour of your vessel, sir, that the mistake went no
further than the Captain?
Vol. II. Q
Until we got within reading distance of the
signals
,
at least a moiety of the better opinions in my
ship was dead against you, Bignall, I give you my
declaration. You've really been so long from home,
that the `Dart' is getting quite a roving look. You
may not be sensible of it, but I assure you of the
fact merely as a friend.
And, perhaps, since you did me the honour to
mistake my vessel for a freebooter, returned the old
tar, smothering his ire in a look of facetious irony,
which changed the expression of his mouth to a
grim grin, you might have conceited this honest
gentleman here to be no other than Beelzebub.
As he spoke, the Commander of the ship, which
had borne so odious an imputation, directed the eyes
of his companion to the form of a third individual,
who had entered the cabin with the freedom of a
privileged person, but with a tread so light as to be
inaudible. As this unexpected form met the quick,
impatient glance of the pretended officer of the
Crown, he arose involuntarily, and, for half a minute,
that admirable command of muscle and nerve, which
had served him so well in maintaining his
masquerade
,
appeared entirely to desert him. The loss of
self-possession, however, was but for a time so short
as to attract no notice; and he coolly returned the
salutations of an aged man, of a meek and subdued
look, with that air of blandness and courtesy which
he so well knew how to assume.
This gentleman is your chaplain, sir, I presume,
by his clerical attire, he said, after he had
exchanged
bows with the stranger.
He is, sira worthy and honest man, whom I
am not ashamed to call my friend. After a
separation
of thirty years, the Admiral has been good
enough to lend him to me for the cruise; and, though
my ship is none of the largest, I believe he finds
himself
as comfortable in her as he would aboard the
flag.This gentleman, Doctor, is the
honourable
Captain
Howard, of his Majesty's ship `Antelope.' I
need not expatiate on his remarkable merit, since the
command he bears, at his years, is a sufficient
testimony
on that important particular.
There was a look of bewildered surprise in the
gaze of the divine, when his glance first fell upon the
features of the pretended scion of nobility; but it
was far less striking than had been that of the subject
of his gaze, and of much shorter continuance. He
again bowed meekly, and with that deep reverence
which long use begets, even in the best-intentioned
minds, when brought in contact with the fancied
superiority of hereditary rank; but he did not appear
to consider the occasion one that required he should
say more than the customary words of salutation.
The Rover turned calmly to his veteran companion,
and continued the discourse.
Captain Bignall, he said, again wearing that
grace of manner which became him so well, it is
my duty to follow your motions in this interview. I
will now return to my ship; and if, as I begin to
suspect
,
we are in these seas on a similar errand, we
can concert at our leisure a system of co-operation,
which, properly matured by your experience, may
serve to bring about the common end we have in
view.
Greatly mollified by this concession to his years
and to his rank, the Commander of the Dart
pressed
his hospitalities warmly on his guest, winding up
his civilities by an invitation to join in a marine feast
at an hour somewhat later in the day. All the
former
offers were politely declined, while the latter
was accepted; the invited making the invitation
itself an excuse that he should return to his own
vessel
,
in order that he might select such of his officers
as he should deem most worthy of participating in
the dainties of the promised banquet. The veteran
and really meritorious Bignall, notwithstanding the
ordinary sturdy blustering of his character, had served
too long in indigence and comparative obscurity,
not to feel some of the longings of human nature for
his hard-earned and protracted preferment. He
consequently
kept, in the midst of all his native and
manly honesty, a saving-eye on the means of
accomplishing
this material object. It is to occasion no
surprise
,
therefore, that his parting from the supposed
son of a powerful champion at Court was more
amicable
than had been the meeting. The Rover was
bowed, from the cabin to the deck, with at least an
appearance of returning good-will. On reaching the
latter, a hurried, suspicious, and perhaps an uneasy
glance was thrown from his restless eyes on all those
faces that were grouped around the gangway, by
which he was about to leave the ship; but their
expression
instantly became calm again, and a little
supercilious
withal, in order to do no discredit to the
part in the comedy which it was his present humour
to enact. Then, shaking the worthy and
thoroughly-deceived
old seaman heartily by the hand, he
touched
his hat, with an air half-haughty,
half-condescending
,
to his inferiors. He was in the act of
descending
into the boat, when the chaplain was seen to
whisper something, with great earnestness, in the ear
of his Captain. The Commander hastened to recall
his departing guest, desiring him, with startling
gravity
,
to lend him his private attention for another
moment
.
Suffering himself to be led apart by the two,
the Rover stood a waiting their pleasure, with a
coolness
of demeanour that, under the peculiar
circumstances
of his case, did signal credit to his nerves.
Captain Howard, resumed the warm-hearted
Bignall, have you a gentleman of the cloth in your
vessel?
Two, sir, was the ready answer.
Two! It is rare to find a supernumerary priest
in a man of war! But, I suppose, Court influence
could give the fellow a bishop, muttered the other.
You are fortunate in this particular, young
gentleman
,
since I am indebted to inclination, rather than
to custom, for the society of my worthy friend here.
He has, however, made a point that I should include
the reverend gentlemanI should say gentle
men
in the invitation.
You shall have all the divinity of my ship,
Bignall
,
on my faith.
I believe I was particular in naming your first
lieutenant.
Oh! dead or alive, he shall surely be of your
party, returned the Rover, with a suddenness and
vehemence of utterance that occasioned both his
auditors
to start with surprise. You may not find him
an ark to rest your weary foot on; but, such as he
is, he is entirely at your service. And now, once
more, I salute you.
Bowing again, he proceeded, with his former
deliberate
air, over the gangway, keeping his eye
riveted
on the lofty gear of the Dart, as he descended
her side, with much that sort of expression with which
a petit-matre is apt to regard the fashion of the
garments
of one newly arrived from the provinces. His
superior repeated his invitation with warmth, and
waved his hand in a frank but temporary adieu; thus
unconsciously suffering the man to escape him whose
capture would have purchased the long postponed
and still distant advantages for whose possession he
secretly pined, with all the withering longings of a
hope cruelly deferred.
Q 2
CHAPTER XII.
Let them accuse me by invention; I will answer in mine
honour.
Coriolanus
.
Yes
! muttered the Rover, with bitter irony, as
his boat rowed under the stern of the cruiser of the
Crown; yes! I, and my officers, will taste of your
banquet! But the viands shall be such as these
hirelings
of the King shall little relish!Pull with a will,
my men, pull; in an hour, you shall rummage the
store-rooms of that fool, for your reward!
The greedy freebooters who manned the oars could
scarcely restrain their shouts, in order to maintain
that air of moderation which policy still imposed;
but they gave vent to their excitement, in redoubled
efforts in propelling the pinnace. In another
minute
,
the adventurers were all in safety again under
the sheltering guns of the Dolphin.
His people gathered, from the haughty gleamings
that were flashing from the eyes of the Rover, as his
foot once more touched the deck of his own ship,
that the period of some momentous action was at
hand. For an instant, he lingered on the
quarter-deck
,
surveying, with a sort of stern joy, the sturdy
materials of his lawless command; and then,
without
speaking, he abruptly entered his proper cabin,
either forgetful that he had conceded its use to others,
or, in the present excited state of his mind, utterly
indifferent to the change. A sudden and tremendous
blow on the gong announced to the alarmed females,
who had ventured from their secret place, under the
present amicable appearances between the two ships,
not only his presence, but his humour.
Let the first lieutenant be told I a wait him, was
the stern order that followed the appearance of the
attendant he had summoned.
During the short period which elapsed before his
mandate could be obeyed, the Rover seemed
struggling
with an emotion that choaked him. But when
the door of the cabin was opened, and Wilder stood
before him, the most suspicious and closest observer
might have sought in vain any evidence of the fierce
passion which in reality agitated the inward man.
With the recovery of his self-command, returned a
recollection of the manner of his intrusion into a
place which he had himself ordained should be
privileged
.
It was then that he first sought the shrinking
forms of the females, and hastened to relieve the
terror
that was too plainly to be seen in their
countenances
,
by words of apology and explanation.
In the hurry of an interview with a friend, he
said, I may have forgotten that I am host to even
such guests as it is my happiness to entertain, though
it be done so very indifferently.
Spare your civilities, sir, said Mrs Wyllys, with
dignity: In order to make us less sensible of any
intrusion, be pleased to act the master here.
The Rover first saw the ladies seated; and then,
like one who appeared to think the occasion might
excuse any little departure from customary forms, he
signed, with a smile of high courtesy, to his
lieutenant
to imitate their example.
His Majesty's artisans have sent worse ships than
the `Dart' upon the ocean, Wilder, he commenced,
with a significant look, as if he intended that the
other should supply all the meaning that his words
did not express; but his ministers might have
selected
a more observant individual for the command.
Captain Bignall has the reputation of a brave
and an honest man.
Ay! He should deserve it; for, strip him of these
qualities, and little would remain. He gives me to
understand that he is especially sent into this latitude
in quest of a ship that we have all heard of, either
in good or in evil report; I speak of the `Red
Rover!'
The involuntary start of Mrs Wyllys, and the
sudden
manner in which Gertrude grasped the arm of
her governess, were certainly seen by the last
speaker
,
but in no degree did his manner betray the
consciousness
of such an observation. His
self-possession
was admirably emulated by his male companion,
who answered, with a composure that no jealousy
could have seen was assumed,
His cruise will be hazardous, not to say without
success.
It may prove both. And yet he has lofty
expectations
of the results.
He probably labours under the common error as
to the character of the man he seeks.
In what does he mistake?
In supposing that he will encounter an ordinary
freebooterone coarse, rapacious, ignorant, and
inexorable
,
like others of
Of what, sir?
I would have said, of his class; but a mariner
like him we speak of forms the head of his own
order.
We will call him, then, by his popular name, Mr
Wildera rover. But, answer me, is it not
remarkable
that so aged and experienced a seaman should
come to this little frequented sea in quest of a ship
whose pursuits should call her into more bustling
scenes?
He may have traced her through the narrow
passages of the islands, and followed on the course
she has last been seen steering.
He may indeed, returned the Rover, musing
intently
.
Your thorough mariner knows how to
calculate
the chances of winds and currents, as the bird
finds its way in air. Still a description of the ship
should be needed for a clue.
The eyes of Wilder, notwithstanding every effort
to the contrary, sunk before the piercing gaze they
encountered, as he answered,
Perhaps he is not without that knowledge, too.
Perhaps not. Indeed, he gave me reason to
believe
he has an agent in the secrets of his enemy.
Nay, he expressly avowed the same, and
acknowledged
that his prospects of success depended on the
skill and information of that individual, who no
doubt has his private means of communicating what
he learns of the movements of those with whom he
serves.
Did he name him?
He did.
It was?
HenryArk,
alias
Wilder.
It is vain to attempt denial, said our
adventurer
,
rising, with an air of pride that he intended
should conceal the uneasy sensation that in truth
beset
him; I find you know me.
For a false traitor, sir.
Captain Heidegger, you are safe, here, in using
these reproachful terms.
The Rover struggled, and struggled successfully,
to keep down the risings of his temper; but the effort
lent to his countenance gleamings of fierce and bitter
scorn.
You will communicate that fact also to your
superiors
,
he said, with taunting irony. The
monster
of the seas, he who plunders defenceless
fishermen
,
ravages unprotected coasts, and eludes the flag
of King George, as other serpents steal into their
caves at the footstep of man, is safe in speaking his
mind, backed by a hundred and fifty freebooters, and
in the security of his own cabin. Perhaps he knows,
too, that he is breathing in the atmosphere of
peaceful
and peace-making woman.
But the first surprise of the subject of his scorn
had passed, and he was neither to be goaded into
retort
,
nor terrified into entreaties. Folding his arms
with calmness, Wilder simply replied,
I have incurred this risk, in order to drive a
scourge from the ocean, which had baffled all other
attempts at its extermination. I knew the hazard,
and shall not shrink from its penalty.
You shall not, sir! returned the Rover, striking
the gong again with a finger that appeared to carry
in its touch the weight of a giant. Let the negro,
and the topman his companion, be secured in irons,
and, on no account, permit them to communicate, by
word or signal, with the other ship.When the
agent of his punishments, who had entered at the
well-known summons, had retired, he again turned
to the firm and motionless form that stood before
him, and continued: Mr Wilder, there is a law
which binds this community, into which you have so
treacherously stolen, together, that would consign
you, and your miserable confederates, to the
yard-arm
,
the instant your true character should be known
to my people. I have but to open that door, and to
pronounce the nature of your treason, in order to
give you up to the tender mercies of the crew.
You will not! no, you will not! cried a voice
at his elbow, which thrilled on even all his iron
nerves. You have forgotten the ties which bind
man to his fellows, but cruelty is not natural to your
heart. By all the recolections of your earliest and
happiest days; by the tenderness and pity which
watched your childhood; by that holy and omniscient
Being who suffers not a hair of the innocent to go
unrevenged, I conjure you to pause, before you
forget
your own awful responsibility. No! you will
notcannotdare not be so merciless!
What fate did he contemplate for me and my
followers, when he entered on this insidious design?
hoarsely demanded the Rover.
The laws of God and man are with him,
continued
the governess, quailing not, as her own
contracting
eye met the stern gaze which she confronted.
'Tis reason that speaks in my voice; 'tis mercy
which I know is pleading at your heart. The cause,
the motive, sanctify his acts; while your career can find
justification in the laws neither of heaven nor earth.
This is bold language to sound in the ears of a
blood-seeking, remorseless pirate! said the other,
looking about him with a smile so proud and
conscious
,
that it seemed to proclaim how plainly he
saw that the speaker relied on the very reverse of
the qualities he named.
It is the language of truth; and ears like yours
cannot be deaf to the sounds. If
Lady, cease, interrupted the Rover, stretching
his arm towards her with calmness and dignity. My
resolution was formed on the instant; and no
remonstrance
,
nor apprehension of the consequence, can
change it. Mr Wilder, you are free. If you have
not served me as faithfully as I once expected, you
have taught me a lesson in the art of physiognomy,
which shall leave me a wiser man for the rest of my
days.
The conscious Wilder stood self-condemned and
humbled. The strugglings which stirred his inmost
soul were easily to be read in the workings of a
countenance that was no longer masked in artifice,
but which was deeply charged with shame and
sorrow
.
The conflict lasted, however, but for a moment.
Perhaps you know not the extent of my object,
Captain Heidegger, he said; it embraced the
forfeit
of your life, and the destruction, or dispersion, of
your crew.
According to the established usages of that
portion
of the world which, having the power, oppresses
the remainder, it did. Go, sir; rejoin your proper
ship; I repeat, you are free.
I cannot leave you, Captain Heidegger, without
one word of justification.
What! can the hunted, denounced, and
condemned
freebooter command an explanation! Is
even his good opinion necessary to a virtuous servant
of the Crown!
Use such terms of triumph and reproach as suit
your pleasure, sir, returned the other, reddening to
the temples as he spoke; to me your language can
now convey no offence; still would I not leave you
without removing part of the odium which you think
I merit.
Speak freely. Sir, you are my guest.
Although the most cutting revilings could not have
wounded the repentant Wilder so deeply as this
generous
conduct, he so far subdued his feelings as to
continue,
You are not now to learn, he said, that
vulgar
rumour has given a colour to your conduct and
character which is not of a quality to command the
esteem of men.
You may find leisure to deepen the tints,
hastily
interrupted his listener, though the emotion
which trembled in his voice plainly denoted how
deeply he felt the wound which was given by a world
he affected to despise.
If called upon to speak at all, my words shall be
those of truth, Captain Heidegger. But is it
surprising
,
that, filled with the ardour of a service that
you once thought honourable yourself, I should be
found willing to risk life, and even to play the
hypocrite
,
in order to achieve an object that would not
only have been rewarded, but approved, had it been
successful? With such sentiments I embarked on
the enterprise; but, as Heaven is my judge, your
manly confidence had half disarmed me before my
foot had hardly crossed your threshold.
And yet you turned not back?
There might have been powerful reasons to the
contrary, resumed the defendant, unconsciously
glancing his eyes at the females as he spoke. I
kept my faith at Newport; and, had my two
followers
then been released from your ship, foot of mine
should never have entered her again.
Young man, I am willing to believe you. I think
I penetrate your motives. You have played a
delicate
game; and, instead of repining, you will one
day rejoice that it has been fruitless. Go, sir; a boat
shall attend you to the `Dart'.
Deceive not yourelf, Captain Heidegger, in
believing
that any generosity of yours can shut my eyes
to my proper duty. The instant I am seen by the
Commander of the ship you name, you: character
will be betrayed.
I expect it.
Nor will my hand be idle in the struggle that
must follow. I may die, here, a victim to my
mistake
,
if you please; but, the moment I am released,
I become your enemy.
Wilder! exclaimed the Rover, grasping his
hand, with a smile that partook of the wild
peculiarity
of the action, we should have been acquainted
earlier! But regret is idle. Go; should my people
learn the truth, any remonstrances of mine would be
like whispers in a whirlwind.
When last I joined the `Dolphin,' I did not
come alone.
Is it not enough, rejoined the Rover, coldly
recoiling
for a step, that I offer liberty and life?
Of what service can a being, fair, helpless, and
unfortunate as this, be in a ship devoted to pursuits
like those of the `Dolphin?'
Am I to be cut off for ever from communion
with the best of my kind! Go, sir; leave me the
image
of virtue, at least, though I may be wanting in
its substance.
Vol. II. R
Captain Heidegger, once, in the warmth of your
better feelings, you pronounced a pledge in favour
of these females, which I hope came deep from the
heart.
I understand you, sir. What I then said is not,
and shall not, be forgotten. But whither would you
lead your companions? Is not one vessel on the high
seas as safe as another? Am I to be deprived of
every
means of making friends unto myself? Leave me,
sirgoyou may linger until my permission to
depart
cannot avail you.
I shall never desert my charge, said Wilder,
firmly.
Mr. Wilderor I should rather call you
Lieutenant
Ark, I believereturned the Rover, you may
trifle with my good nature till the moment of your
own security shall be past.
Act your will on me: I die at my post, or go
accompanied
by those with whom I came.
Sir, the acquaintance of which you boast is not
older than my own. How know you that they
prefer
you for their protector? I have deceived myself,
and done poor justice to my own intentions, if they
have found cause for complaints, since their
happiness
or comfort has been in my keeping. Speak, fair
one; which will you for a protector?
Leave me, leave me! exclaimed Gertrude,
veiling
her eyes, in terror, from the insidious smile with
which he approached her, as she would have avoided
the attractive glance of a basilisk. Oh! if you have
pity in your heart, let us quit your ship!
Notwithstanding the vast self-command which the
being she so ungovernably and spontaneously repelled
had in common over his feelings, no effort could
repress
the look of deep and humiliating mortification
with which he heard her. A cold and haggard smile
gleamed over his features, as he murmured, in a voice
which he in vain endeavoured to smother,
I have purchased this disgust from all my species,
and dearly must the penalty be paid!Lady, you
and your lovely ward are the mistresses of your own
acts. This ship, and this cabin, are at your
command
;
or, if you elect to quit both, others will
receive
you.
Safety for our sex is only to be found beneath
the fostering protection of the laws, said Mrs
Wyllys
.
Would to God!
Enough! he interrupted, you shall accompany
your friend. The ship will not be emptier than my
heart, when all have left me.
Did you call? asked a low voice at his elbow,
in tones so plaintive and mild, that they could not
fail to catch his ear.
Roderick, he hurriedly replied, you will find
occupation below. Leave us, good Roderick. For
a while, leave me.
Then, as if anxious to close the scene as speedily
as possible, he gave another of his signals on the
gong. An order was given to convey Fid and the
black into a boat, whither he also sent the scanty
baggage of his female guests. So soon as these brief
arrangements were completed, he handed the
governess
,
with studied courtesy, through his
wondering
people, to the side, and saw her safely seated,
with her ward and Wilder, in the pinnace. The oars
were manned by the two seamen, and a silent adieu
was given by a wave of his hand; after which he
disappeared from those to whom their present release
seemed as imaginary and unreal as had appeared
their late captivity.
The threat of the interference of the crew of the
Dolphin was, however, still ringing in the ears of
Wilder. He made an impatient gesture to his
attendants
to ply their oars, cautiously steering the boat
on such a course as should soonest lead her from
beneath
the guns of the freebooters. While passing
under the stern of the Dolphin, a hoarse hail was
sent across the waters, and the voice of the Rover
was heard speaking to the Commander of the Dart.
I send you a party of your guests, he said; and,
among them, all the divinity of my ship.
The passage was short; nor was time given for
any of the liberated to arrange their thoughts, before
it became necessary to ascend the side of the cruiser
of the Crown.
Heaven help us! exclaimed Bignall, catching a
glimpse of the sex of his visiters through a port;
Heaven help us both, Parson! That young
hair-brained
fellow has sent us a brace of petticoats
aboard; and these the profane reprobate calls his
divinities
!
One may easily guess where he has picked
up such quality; but cheer up, Doctor; one may
honestly
forget the cloth in five fathom water, you
know.
The facetious laugh of the old Commander of the
Dart betrayed that he was more than half disposed
to overlook the fancied presumption of his audacious
inferior; furnishing a sort of pledge, to all who heard
it, that no undue scruples should defeat the hilarity
of the moment. But when Gertrude, flushed with
the excitement of the scene through which she had
just passed, and beaming with a loveliness that
derived
so much of its character from its innocence,
appeared
on his deck, the veteran rubbed his eyes in
an amazement which could not have been greatly
surpassed, had one of that species of beings the
Rover
had named actually fallen at his feet from the
skies.
The heartless scoundrel! cried the worthy tar,
to lead astray one so young and so lovely! Ha! as
I live, my own lieutenant! How's this, Mr Ark! have
we fallen on the days of miracles?
An exclamation, which came deep from the heart
of the governess, and a low and mournful echo from
the lips of the divine, interrupted the further
expression
of his indignation and his wonder.
Captain Bignall, observed the former, pointing
to the tottering form which was leaning on Wilder
for support, on my life, you are mistaken in the
character of this lady. It is more than twenty years
since we last met, but I pledge my own character for
the purity and truth of hers.
Lead me to the cabin, murmured Mrs Wyllys.
Gertrude, my love, where are we? Lead me to
some secret place.
Her request was complied with; the whole groupe
retiring in a body from before the sight of the
spectators
who thronged the deck. Here the deeply
agitated
governess regained a portion of her
self-command
,
and then her wandering gaze sought the
meek-concerned
countenance of the chaplain.
This is a tardy and heart-rending meeting, she
said, pressing the hand he gave her to her lips.
Gertrude, in this gentleman you see the divine that
united me to the man who once formed the pride
and happiness of my existence.
Mourn not his loss, whispered the reverend
priest, bending over her chair, with the interest of a
parent. He was taken from you at an early hour;
but he died as all who loved him might have wished.
And none was left to bear, in remembrance of
his qualities, his proud name to posterity! Tell me,
good Merton, is not the hand of Providence visible
in this dispensation? Ought I not to humble myself
before it, as a just punishment of my disobedience
to an affectionate, though too obdurate, parent?
None may presume to pry into the mysteries of
the righteous government that orders all things.
Enough for us, that we learn to submit to the will of
Him who rules, without questioning his justice.
But, continued the governess, in tones so husky
as to betray how powerfully she felt the temptation
R 2
to forget his admonition, would not one life have
sufficed? was I to be deprived of all?
Madam, reflect! What has been done was done
in wisdom, as I trust it was in mercy.
You say truly. I will forget all of the sad events,
but their application to myself. And you, worthy
and benevolent Merton, where and how have been
passed your days, since the time of which we speak?
I am but a low and humble shepherd of a truant
flock, returned the meek chaplain, with a sigh.
Many distant seas have I visited, and many strange
faces, and stranger natures, has it been my lot to
encounter
in my pilgrimage. I am but lately returned,
from the east, into the hemisphere where I first drew
breath; and, by permission of our superiors, I came
to pass a month in the vessel of a companion, whose
friendship bears even an older date than our own.
Ay, ay, Madam, returned the worthy Bignall,
whose feelings had been not a little disturbed by the
previous scene; it is near half a century since the
Parson and I were boys together, and we have been
rubbing up old recollections on the cruise. Happy
am I that a lady of so commendable qualities has
come to make one of our party.
In this lady you see the daughter of the late
Captain , and the relict of the son of our
ancient
Commander, Rear-Admiral de Lacey, hastily
resumed the divine, as though he knew the
well-meaning
honesty of his friend was more to be trusted
than his discretion.
I knew them both; and brave men and thorough
seamen were the pair! The lady was welcome as
your friend, Merton; but she is doubly so, as the
widow and child of the gentlemen you name.
De Lacey! murmured an agitated voice in the
ear of the governess.
The law gives me a title to bear that name,
returned she whom we shall still continue to call by
her assumed appellation, folding her weeping pupil
long and affectionately to her bosom. The veil is
unexpectedly withdrawn, my love, nor shall
concealment
be longer affected. My father was the Captain
of the flag-ship. Necessity compelled him to leave
me more in the society of your young relative than
he would have done, could he have foreseen the
consequences. But I knew both his pride and his
poverty too well, to dare to make him arbiter of my
fate, after the alternative became, to my
inexperienced
imagination worse than even his anger. We
were privately united by this gentleman, and neither
of our parents knew of the connexion. Death
The voice of the widow became choaked, and
she made a sign to the chaplain, as if she would have
him continue the tale.
Mr de Lacey and his father-in-law fell in the same
battle, within a short month of the ceremony,
added
the subdued voice of Merton. Even you,
dearest
Madam, never knew the melancholy particulars
of their end. I was a solitary witness of their deaths;
for to me were they both consigned, amid the
confusion
of the battle. Their blood was mingled; and
your parent, in blessing the young hero,
unconsciously
blessed his son.
Oh! I deceived his noble nature, and dearly
have I paid the penalty! exclaimed the self-abased
widow. Tell me, Merton, did he ever know of
my marriage?
He did not. Mr de Lacey died first, and upon
his bosom, for he loved him ever as a child; but
other thoughts than useless explanations were then
uppermost in their minds.
Gertrude, said the governess, in hollow,
repentant
tones, there is no peace for our feeble sex but
in submission; no happiness but in obedience.
It is over now, whispered the weeping girl;
all over, and forgotten. I am your childyour
own Gertrudethe creature of your formation.
Harry Ark! exclaimed Bignall, clearing his
throat with a hem so vigorous as to carry the sound
to the outer deck, seizing the arm of his entranced
lieutenant, and dragging him from the scene while he
spoke. What the devil besets the boy! You
forget
that, all this time, I am as ignorant of your own
adventures as is his Majesty's prime minister of
navigation
.
Why do I see you, here, a visiter from a
royal cruiser, when I thought you were playing the
mock pirate? and how came that harum-scarum twig
of nobility in possession of so goodly a company, as
well as of so brave a ship?
Wilder drew a long and deep breath, like one that
awakes from a pleasing dream, reluctantly suffering
himself to be forced from a spot where he fondly
felt that he could have continued, without weariness,
for ever.
CHAPTER XIII.
Let them achieve me, and then sell my bones.
Henry V
.
The
Commander of the Dart, and his
bewildered
lieutenant, had gained the quarter-deck before
either spoke again. The direction first taken by the
eyes of the latter was in quest of the neighbouring
ship; nor was the look entirely without that
unsettled
and vague expression which seems to announce
a momentary aberration of the faculties. But the
vessel of the Rover was in view, in all the palpable
and beautiful proportions of her admirable
construction
.
Instead of lying in a state of rest, as when he
left her, her head-yards had been swung, and, as the
sails filled with the breeze, the stately fabric had
begun
to move gracefully, though with no great
velocity
,
along the water. There was not the slightest
appearance
,
however, of any attempt at escape in the
evolution. On the contrary, the loftier and lighter sails
had all been furled, and men were at the moment
actively employed in sending to the deck those
smaller
spars which were absolutely requisite in spreading
the canvas that would be needed in facilitating her
flight. Wilder turned from the sight with a sickening
apprehension; for he well knew that these were the
preparations that skilful mariners are wont to make,
when bent on desperate combat.
Ay, yonder goes your St. James's seaman, with
his three topsails full, and his mizzen out, as if he
had already forgotten he is to dine with me, and that
his name is to be found at one end of the list of
Commanders
,
and mine at the other, grumbled the
displeased
Bignall. But we shall have him coming
round all in good time, I suppose, when his appetite
tells him the dinner hour. He might wear his colours
in presence of a senior, too, and no disgrace to his
nobility. By the Lord, Harry Ark, he handles those
yards beautifully! I warrant you, now, some honest
man's son is sent aboard his ship for a dry nurse, in
the shape of a first lieutenant, and we shall have him
vapouring, all dinner time, about `how my ship does
this,' and `I never suffer that.' Ha! is it not so, sir?
He has a thorough seaman for his First?
Few men understand the profession better than
does the Captain of yonder vessel himself, returned
Wilder.
The devil he does! You have been talking with
him, Mr Ark, about these matters, and he has got
some of the fashions of the `Dart.' I see into a
mystery
as quick as another!
I do assure you, Captain Bignall, there is no
safety in confiding in the ignorance of yonder
extraordinary
man.
Ay, ay, I begin to overhaul his character. The
young dog is a quiz, and has been amusing himself
with a sailor of what he calls the old school. Am I
right, sir? He has seen salt water before this cruise?
He is almost a native of the seas; for more than
thirty years has he passed his time on them.
There, Harry Ark, he has done you handsomely.
Now, I have his own assertion for it, that he will not
be three-and-twenty until to-morrow.
On my word, he has deceived you, sir.
I don't know, Mr Ark; that is a task much easier
attempted than performed. Threescore and four
years add as much weight to a man's head as to his
heels! I may have undervalued the skill of the
younker
,
but, as to his years, there can be no great
mistake
.
But where the devil is the fellow steering to?
Has he need of a pinafore from his lady mother to
come on board of a man-of-war for his dinner?
See! he is indeed standing from us! exclaimed
Wilder, with a rapidity and delight that would have
excited the suspicions of one more observant than his
Commander.
If I know the stern from the bows of a ship,
what you say is truth, returned the other, with some
austerity. Hark ye, Mr Ark, I've a mind to
furnish
the coxcomb a lesson in respect for his
superiors
,
and give him a row to whet his appetite. By
the Lord, I will; and he may write home an account
of this manuvre, too, in his next despatches. Fill
away the after-yards, sir; fill away. Since this
honourable
youth is disposed to amuse himself with a
sailing-match, he can take no offence that others are
in the same humour.
The lieutenant of the watch, to whom the order
was addressed, complied; and, in another minute,
the Dart was also beginning to move a-head, though
in a direction directly opposite to that taken by the
Dolphin. The old man highly enjoyed his own
decision, manifesting his self-satisfaction by the
infinite
glee and deep chuckling of his manner. He
was too much occupied with the step he had just
taken
,
to revert immediately to the subject that had so
recently been uppermost in his mind; nor did the
thought of pursuing the discourse occur to him, until
the two ships had left a broad field of water between
them, as each moved, with ease and steadiness, on its
proper course.
Let him note that in his log-book, Mr Ark, the
irritable old seaman then resumed, returning to the
spot which Wilder had not left during the
intervening
time. Though my cook has no great relish for
a frog, they who would taste of his skill must seek
him. By the Lord, boy, he will have a pull of it, if
he undertake to come-to on that tack.But how
happens it that you got into his ship? All that part
of the cruise remains untold.
I have been wrecked, sir, since you received my
last letter.
What! has Davy Jones got possession of the red
gentleman at last?
The misfortune occurred in a ship from Bristol,
aboard which I was placed as a sort of prize-master.
He certainly continues to stand slowly to the
northward
!
Let the young coxcomb go! he will have all the
better appetite for his supper. And so you were
picked up by his Majesty's ship the `Antelope.'
Ay, I see into the whole affair. You have only to
give an old sea-dog his course and compass, and he
will find his way to port in the darkest night. But
how happened it that this Mr Howard affected to be
ignorant of your name, sir, when he saw it on the
list of my officers?
Ignorant! Did he seem ignorant? perhaps
Say no more, my brave fellow, say no more,
interrupted
Wilder's considerate but choleric
Commander
.
I have met with such rebuffs myself; but
we are above them, sir, far above them and their
impertinences
together. No man need be ashamed of
having earned his commission, as you and I have
done, in fair weather and in foul. Zounds, boy, I
have fed one of the upstarts for a week, and then had
him stare at a church across the way, when I have
fallen in with him in the streets of London, in a
fashion
that might make a simple man believe the puppy
knew for what it had been built. Think no more
of it, Harry; worse things have happened to myself,
I do assure you.
I went by my assumed name while in yonder
ship, Wilder forced himself to add. Even the
ladies
,
who were the companions of my wreck, know
me by no other.
Ah! that was prudent; and, after all, the young
sprig was not pretending genteel ignorance. How
now, master Fid; you are welcome back to the
`Dart.'
I've taken the liberty to say as much already to
myself, your Honour, resumed the topman, who
was busying himself, near his two officers, in a
manner
that seemed to invite their attention. A
wholesome
craft is yonder, and boldly is she commanded,
and stoutly is she manned; but, for my part, having
a character to lose, it is more to my taste to sail in a
ship that can shew her commission, when properly
called on for the same.
The colour on Wilder's cheeks went and came,
like the flushings of the evening sky, and his
eyes were turned in every direction but that which
would have encountered the astonished gaze of his
veteran friend.
I am not quite sure that I understand the
meaning
of the lad, Mr Ark. Every officer, from the
Captain
to the boatswain, in the King's fleet, that is,
every
man of common discretion, carries his authority
to act as such with him to sea, or he might find
himself
in a situation as awkward as that of a pirate.
That is just what I said, sir; but schooling and
long use have given your Honour a better outfit in
words. Guinea and I have often talked the matter
over together, and serious thoughts has it given to us
both, more than once, Captain Bignall. `Suppose,'
says I to the black, `suppose one of his Majesty's
boats should happen to fall in with this here craft,
and we should come to loggerheads and matches,'
says I, `what would the like of us two do in such a
god-send?'`Why,' says the black, `we would stand
to our guns on the side of master Harry,' says he;
nor did I gainsay the same; but, saving his presence
and your Honour's, I just took the liberty to add,
that, in my poor opinion, it would be much more
comfortable to be killed in an honest ship than on the
deck of a buccaneer.
A buccaneer! exclaimed his Commander, with
eyes distended, and an open mouth.
Captain Bignall, said Wilder, I may have
offended past forgiveness, in remaining so long silent;
but, when you hear my tale, there may be found some
passages that shall plead my apology. The vessel
in sight is the ship of the renowned Red Rovernay
listen, I conjure you by all that kindness you have so
long shewn me, and then censure as you will.
The words of Wilder, aided as they were by an
earnest and manly manner, laid a restraint on the
mounting indignation of the choleric old seaman. He
listened gravely and intently to the rapid but clear
tale which his lieutenant hastened to recount; and,
ere the latter had done, he had more than half
entered
into those grateful, and certainly generous,
feelings
which had made the youth so reluctant to
betray
the obnoxious character of a man who had dealt
so liberally by himself. A few strong, and what
might be termed professional, exclamations of
surprise
Vol. II. S
and admiration, occasionally interrupted the
narrative; but, on the whole, he curbed his
impatience
and his feelings, in a manner that was
sufficiently
remarkable, when the temperament of the
individual
is duly considered.
This is wonderful indeed! he exclaimed, as the
other ended; and a thousand pities is it that so
honest a fellow should be so arrant a knave. But,
Harry, we can never let him go at large after all;
our loyalty and our religion forbid it. We must tack
ship, and stand after him; if fair words won't bring
him to reason, I see no other remedy than blows.
I fear it is no more than our duty, sir, returned
the young man, with a deep sigh.
It is a matter of religion.And then the prating
puppy, that he sent on board me, is no Captain, after
all! Still it was impossible to deceive me as to the
air and manner of a gentleman. I warrant me, some
young reprobate of a good family, or he would never
have acted the sprig so well. We must try to keep
his name a secret, Mr Ark, in order that no discredit
should fall upon his friends. Our aristocratic columns,
though they get a little cracked and defaced, are,
after
all, the pillars of the throne, and it does not
become
us to let vulgar eyes look too closely into their
unsoundness.
The individual who visited the `Dart' was the
Rover himself.
Ha! the Red Rover in my ship, nay, in my very
presence! exclaimed the old tar, in a species of
honest horror. You are now pleased, sir, to trifle
with my good nature.
I should forget a thousand obligations, ere I could
be so bold. On my solemn asseveration, sir, it was
no other.
This is unaccountable! extraordinary to a
miracle
!
His disguise was very complete, I will confess,
to deceive one so well skilled in the human
countenance
.
I saw nothing, sir, of his shaggy whiskers,
heard nothing of his brutal voice, nor perceived any
of those monstrous deformities which are universally
acknowledged to distinguish the man.
All of which are no more than the
embellishments
of vulgar rumour. I fear me, sir, that the
boldest and most dangerous of all our vices are often
found under the most pleasing exteriors.
But this is not even a man of inches, sir.
His body is not large, but it contains the spirit
of a giant.
And do you believe yonder ship, Mr Ark, to be
the vessel that fought us in the equinox of March?
I know it to be no other.
Hark ye, Harry, for your sake, I will deal
generously
by the rogue. He once escaped me, by the
loss of a topmast, and stress of weather; but we
have here a good working breeze, that a man may
safely count on, and a fine regular sea. He is
therefore
mine, so soon as I choose to make him so;for
I do not think he has any serious intention to run.
I fear not, returned Wilder, unconsciously
betraying
his wishes in the words.
Fight he cannot, with any hopes of success;
and, as he seems to be altogether a different sort of
personage from what I had supposed, we will try the
merits of negotiation. Will you undertake to be the
bearer of my propositions?or, perhaps, he might
repent of his moderation.
I pledge myself for his faith, eagerly exclaimed
Wilder Let a gun be fired to leeward. Mind, sir,
all the tokens must be amicablea flag of truce set
out at our main, and I will risk every hazard to lead
him back into the bosom of society.
By George, it would at least be acting a
Christian
part, returned the Commander, after a
moment's
thought; and, though we miss knighthood
below, lad, for our success, there will be better births
cleared for us aloft.
No sooner had the warm-hearted, and perhaps a
little visionary, Captain of the Dart, and his
lieutenant
,
determined on this measure, than they both
set eagerly about the means of insuring its success.
The helm of the ship was put a-lee; and, as her head
came sweeping up into the wind, a sheet of flame
flashed from her leeward bow-port, sending the
customary
amicable intimation across the water, that
those who governed her movements would
communicate
with the possessors of the vessel in sight. At
the same instant, a small flag, with a spotless field,
was seen floating at the topmost elevation of all her
spars, whilst the flag of England was lowered from
the gaff. A half minute of deep inquietude
succeeded
these signals, in the bosoms of those who had
ordered
them to be made. Their suspense was
however
speedily terminated. A cloud of smoke drove
before the wind from the vessel of the Rover, and
then the smothered explosion of the answering gun
came dull upon their ears. A flag, similar to their
own, was seen floating, as it might be, like a dove
fanning its wings, far above her tops; but no emblem
of any sort was borne at the spar, where the colours
which distinguish the national character of a cruiser
are usually seen.
The fellow has the modesty to carry a naked
gaff in our presence, said Bignall, pointing out the
circumstance to his companion, as an augury
favourable
to their success. We will stand for him until
within a reasonable distance, and then you shall take
to the boat.
In conformity with this determination, the Dart
was brought on the other tack, and several sails were
set, in order to quicken her speed. When at the
distance of half cannon shot, Wilder suggested to his
superior the propriety of arresting their further
progress
,
in order to avoid the appearance of hostilities.
The boat was immediately lowered into the sea, and
manned; a flag of truce set in her bows; and the
whole was reported ready to receive the bearer of
the message.
You may hand him this statement of our force,
Mr Ark; for, as he is a reasonable man, he will see
the advantage it gives us, said the Captain, after
having exhausted his manifold and often repeated
instructions
.
I think you may promise him
indemnity
for the past, provided he comply with all my
conditions; at all events, you will say that no
influence
shall be spared to get a complete whitewashing
for himself at least. God bless you, boy! Take care
to say nothing of the damages we received in the
affair of March last; for  ay  for the equinox
was blowing heavy at the time, you know. Adieu!
and success attend you!
The boat shoved off from the side of the vessel as
he ended, and in a few moments the listening Wilder
was borne far beyond the sound of any further words
of advisement. Our adventurer had sufficient time
to reflect on the extraordinary situation in which he
now found himself, during the row to the still distant
ship. Once or twice, slight and uneasy glimmerings
of distrust, concerning the prudence of the step he
was taking, beset his mind; though a recollection of
the lofty feeling of the man in whom he confided
ever presented itself in sufficient season to prevent
the apprehension from gaining any undue ascendency.
Notwithstanding the delicacy of his situation, that
characteristic interest in his profession, which is
rarely
dormant in the bosom of a thorough-bred seaman,
was strongly stimulated as he approached the vessel
of the Rover. The perfect symmetry of her spars,
the graceful heavings and settings of the whole fabric,
as it rode, like a marine bird, on the long, regular
S 2
swells of the trades, and the graceful inclinations of
the tapering masts, as they waved across the blue
canopy, which was interlaced by all the tracery of
her complicated tackle, was not lost on an eye that
knew no less how to prize the order of the whole
than to admire the beauty of the object itself. There
is a high and exquisite taste, which the seaman
attains
in the study of a machine that all have united
to commend, which may be likened to the
sensibilities
that the artist acquires by close and long
contemplation
of the noblest monuments of antiquity.
It teaches him to detect those imperfections which
would escape any less instructed eye; and it
heightens
the pleasure with which a ship at sea is gazed
at, by enabling the mind to keep even pace with the
enjoyment of the senses. It is this powerful (and
to a landsman incomprehensible) charm that forms
the secret tie which binds the mariner so closely to
his vessel, and which often leads him to prize her
qualities as one would esteem the virtues of a friend,
and almost to be equally enamoured of the fair
proportions
of his ship and of those of his mistress.
Other men may have their different inanimate
subjects
of admiration; but none of their feelings so
thoroughly enter into the composition of the being
as the affection which the mariner comes, in time, to
feel for his vessel. It is his home, his theme of
constant
and frequently of painful interest, his
tabernacle
,
and often his source of pride and exultation. As
she gratifies or disappoints his high-wrought
expectations
,
in her speed or in the fight, mid shoals and
hurricanes, a character for good or luckless qualities
is earned, which are as often in reality due to the
skill or ignorance of those who guide her, as to any
inherent properties of the fabric. Still does the ship
itself, in the eyes of the seaman, bear away the
laurel
of success, or suffer the ignominy of defeat and
misfortune; and, when the reverse arrives the result
is merely regarded as some extraordinary departure
from the ordinary character of the vessel, as if the
construction possessed the powers of entire
self-command
and perfect volition.
Though not so deeply imbued with that species of
superstitious credulity, on this subject, as the
inferiors
of his profession, Wilder was keenly awake to
most of the sensibilities of a mariner. So strongly,
indeed, was he alive to this feeling, on the present
occasion, that for a moment he forgot the critical
nature
of his errand, as he drew within plainer view
of a vessel that, with justice, might lay claim to be
a jewel of the ocean.
Lay on your oars, lads, he said, signing to his
people to arrest the progress of the boat; lay on your
oars! Did you ever see masts more beautifully in line
than those, master Fid, or sails that had a fairer fit?
The topman, who rowed the stroke-oar of the
pinnace
,
cast a look over his shoulder, and, stowing into
one of his cheeks a lump that resembled a wad laid
by the side of its gun, he was not slow to answer,
on an occasion where his opinion was so directly
demanded
.
I care not who knows it, he said, for, done
by honest men or done by knaves, I told the people
on the forecastle of the `Dart,' in the first five
minutes
after I got among them again, that they might
be at Spithead a month, and not see hamper so
light, and yet so handy, as is seen aboard that flyer.
Her lower rigging is harpened-in, like the waist of Nell
Dale after she has had a fresh pull upon her
stay-lanyards
,
and there isn't a block, among them all, that
seems bigger in its place than do the eyes of the girl
in her own good-looking countenance. That bit of a
set that you see to her fore-brace-block, was given by
the hand of one Richard Fid; and the heart on her
main-stay was turned-in by Guinea, here; and,
considering
he is a nigger, I call it ship-shape.
She is beautiful in every part! said Wilder,
drawing a long breath. Give way, my men, give
way! Do you think I have come here to take the
soundings of the ocean?
The crew started at the hurried tones of their
lieutenant
,
and in another minute the boat was at the
side of the vessel. The stern and threatening
glances
that Wilder encountered, as his foot touched the
planks, caused him to pause an instant, ere he
advanced
further amid the crew. But the presence of
the Rover himself, who stood, with his peculiar air
of high and imposing authority, on the quarter-deck,
encouraged him to proceed, after permitting a delay
that was too slight to attract attention. His lips were
in the act of parting, when a sign from the other
induced
him to remain silent, until they were both in
the privacy of the cabin.
Suspicion is awake among my people, Mr Ark,
commenced the Rover, when they were thus retired,
laying a marked and significant emphasis on the name
he used. Suspicion is stirring, though, as yet, they
hardly know what to credit. The manuvres of
the two ships have not been such as they are wont to
see, and voices are not wanting to whisper in their ears
matter that is somewhat injurious to your interests.
You have not done well, sir, in returning among us.
I came by the order of my superior, and under
the sanction of a flag.
We are small reasoners in the legal distinctions
of the world, and may mistake your rights in so
novel
a character. But, he immediately added, with
dignity, if you bear a message, I may presume it is
intended for my ears.
And for no other. We are not alone, Captain
Heidegger.
Heed not the boy; he is deaf at my will.
I could wish to communicate to you only the
offers that I bear.
That mast is not more senseless than Roderick.
said the other calmly, but with decision.
Then must I speak at every hazard.The
Commander
of yon ship, who bears the commission of
our royal master George the Second, has ordered me
to say thus much for your consideration: On
condition
that you will surrender this vessel, with all her
stores, armament, and warlike munitions, uninjured,
he will content himself with taking ten hostages from
your crew, to be decided by lot, yourself, and one
other of your officers, and either to receive the
remainder
into the service of the King, or to suffer
them to disperse in pursuit of a calling more
creditable
,
and, as it would now appear, more safe.
This is the liberality of a prince! I should kneel
and kiss the deck before one whose lips utter such
sounds of mercy!
I repeat but the words of my superior, Wilder
resumed. For yourself, he further promises, that
his interest shall be exerted to procure a pardon, on
condition that you quit the seas, and renounce the
name of Englishman for ever.
The latter is done to his hands: But may I know
the reason that such lenity is shewn to one whose
name has been so long proscribed of men?
Captain Bignall has heard of your generous
treatment
of his officer, and the delicacy that the
daughter
and widow of two ancient brethren in arms have
received at your hands. He confesses that rumour
has not done entire justice to your character.
A mighty effort kept down the gleam of exultation
that flashed across the features of the listener, who,
however, succeeded in continuing utterly calm and
immovable.
He has been deceived, sirhe coldly resumed,
as though he would encourage the other to proceed.
That much is he free to acknowledge. A
representation
of this common error, to the proper
authorities
,
will have weight in procuring the promised
amnesty for the past, and, as he hopes, brighter
prospects
for the future.
And does he urge no other motive than his
pleasure
,
why I should make this violent change in all
my habits, why I should renounce an element that
has become as necessary to me as the one I breathe,
and why, in particular, I am to disclaim the vaunted
privilege of calling myself a Briton?
He does. This statement of a force, which you
may freely examine with your own eyes, if so
disposed
,
must convince you of the hopelessness of
resistance
,
and will, he thinks, induce you to accept
his offers.
And what is
your
opinion? the other demanded,
with a meaning smile and peculiar emphasis, as he
extended a hand to receive the written statement.
But I beg pardon, he hastily added, taking the
look of gravity from the countenance of his
companion
.
I trifle, when the moment requires all our
seriousness.
The eye of the Rover ran rapidly over the paper,
resting itself, once or twice, with a slight exhibition
of interest, on particular points, that seemed most to
merit his attention.
You find the superiority such as I had already
given you reason to believe? demanded Wilder,
when the look of the other wandered from the paper.
I do.
And may I now ask your decision on the offer?
First, tell me what does your own heart advise?
This is but the language of another.
Captain Heidegger, said Wilder, colouring, I
will not attempt to conceal, that, had this message
depended solely on myself, it might have been
couched
in different terms; but as one, who still deeply
retains the recollection of your generosity, as a man
who would not willingly induce even an enemy to an
act of dishonour, do I urge their acceptance. You
will excuse me, if I say, that, in my recent
intercourse
,
I have had reason to believe you already
perceive
that neither the character you could wish to
earn, nor the content that all men crave, is to be
found in your present career.
I had not thought I entertained so close a casuist
in Mr Henry Wilder. Have you more to urge, sir?
Nothing, returned the disappointed and grieved
messenger of the Dart.
Yes, yes, he has, said a low but eager voice at
the elbow of the Rover, which rather seemed to
breathe out the syllables than dare to utter them
aloud; he has not yet delivered the half of his
commission, or sadly has he forgotten the sacred
trust!
The boy is often a dreamer, interrupted the
Rover, smiling, with a wild and haggard look. He
sometimes gives form to his unmeaning thoughts, by
clothing them in words.
My thoughts are not unmeaning, continued
Roderick, in a louder and far bolder strain. If his
peace or happiness be dear to you, do not yet leave
him. Tell him of his high and honourable name;
of his youth; of that gentle and virtuous being that
he once so fondly loved, and whose memory, even
now, he worships. Speak to him of these, as you
know how to speak; and, on my life, his ear will
not be deaf, his heart cannot be callous to your
words.
The urchin is mad!
I am not mad; or, if maddened, it is by the
crimes, the dangers, of those I love. Oh! Mr
Wilder
,
do not leave him. Since you have been among
us, he is nearer to what I know he once was, than
formerly. Take away that mistaken statement of
your force; threats do but harden him: As a friend,
admonish; but hope for nothing as a minister of
vengeance
.
You know not the fearful nature of the
man, or you would not attempt to stop a torrent.
Nownow speak to him; for, see, his eye is already
growing kinder.
It is in pity, boy, to witness how thy reason
wavers.
Had it never swerved more than at this moment,
Walter, another need not be called upon to speak
between thee and me! My words would then have
been regarded, my voice would then have been loud
enough to be heard. Why are you dumb? a single
happy syllable might now save him.
Wilder, the child is frightened by this counting
of guns and numbering of people. He fears the
anger
of your anointed master. Go; give him place
in your boat, and recommend him to the mercy of
your superior.
Away, away! cried Roderick. I shall not,
will not, cannot leave you. Who is there left for me
in this world but you?
Yes, continued the Rover, whose forced
calmness
of expression had changed to one of deep and
melancholy musing; it will indeed be better thus.
See, here is much gold; you will commend him to
the care of that admirable woman who already
watches
one scarcely less helpless, though possibly less
Guilty! speak the word boldly, Walter. I have
earned the epithet, and shall not shrink to hear it
spoken. Look, he said, taking the ponderous bag,
which had been extended towards Wilder, and
holding
it high above his head, in scorn, this can I cast
from me; but the tie which binds me to you shall
never be broken.
As he spoke, the lad approached an open window
of the cabin; a plash upon the water was heard,
and then a treasure, that might have furnished a
competence
to moderate wishes, was lost for ever to the
uses of those who had created its value. The
lieutenant
of the Dart turned in haste to deprecate
the anger of the Rover; but his eye could trace, in
the features of the lawless chief, no other emotion
than a pity which was discoverable even through his
calm and unmoved smile.
Roderick would make but a faithless treasurer,
he said. Still it is not too late to restore him to his
friends. The loss of the gold can be repaired; but,
should any serious calamity befall the boy, I might
never regain a perfect peace of mind.
Then keep him near yourself, murmured the
lad, whose vehemence had seemingly expended itself.
Go, Mr Wilder, go; your boat is waiting; a longer
stay will be without an object.
I fear it will! returned our adventurer, who had
not ceased, during the previous dialogue, to keep his
look fastened, in manly commiseration, on the
countenance
of the boy; I greatly fear it will!Since
I have come the messenger of another, Captain
Heidegger
,
it is your province to supply a fitting answer
to my proposition.
The Rover took him by the arm, and led him to
a position whence they might look upon the outer
scene. Then, pointing upward at his spars, and
making his companion observe the small quantity of
sail he carried, he simply said, Sir, you are a
seaman
,
and may judge of my intentions by this sight.
I shall neither seek nor avoid your boasted cruiser
of King George.
Vol. II. T
CHAPTER XIV.
Front to front,
Bring thou this fiend
Within my sword's length set him; if he 'scape,
Heaven forgive him too!
Macbeth
.
You have brought the grateful submission of the
pirate to my offers! exclaimed the sanguine
Commander
of the Dart to his messenger, as the foot
of the latter once more touched his deck.
I bring nothing but defiance! was the unexpected
reply.
Did you exhibit my statement? Surely, Mr Ark,
so material a document was not forgotten!
Nothing was forgotten that the warmest interest
in his safety could suggest, Captain Bignall. Still the
chief of yonder lawless ship refuses to hearken to
your conditions.
Perhaps, sir, he imagines that the `Dart' is
defective
in some of her spars, returned the hasty old
seaman, compressing his lips, with a look of wounded
pride; he may hope to escape by pressing the
canvas
on his own light-heeled ship.
Does that look like flight? demanded Wilder,
extending an arm towards the nearly naked spars
and motionless hull of their neighbour. The utmost
I can obtain is an assurance that he will not be the
assailant.
'Fore George, he is a merciful youth! and one
that should be commended for his moderation! He
will not run his disorderly, picarooning company
under the guns of a British man-of-war, because he
owes a little reverence to the flag of his master!
Hark ye, Mr Ark, we will remember the
circumstance
when questioned at the Old Bailey. Send the
people to their guns, sir, and ware the ship round, to
put an end at once to this foolery, or we shall have
him sending a boat aboard to examine our
commissions
.
Captain Bignall, said Wilder, leading his
Commander
still further from the ears of their inferiors.
I may lay some little claim to merit for services
done under your own eyes, and in obedience to your
orders. If my former conduct may give me a title to
presume to counsel one of your great experience,
suffer me to urge a short delay.
Delay! Does Henry Ark hesitate, when the
enemies
of his King, nay more, the enemies of man, are
daring him to his duty!
Sir, you mistake me. I hesitate, in order that
the flag under which we sail may be free from stain,
and not with any intent of avoiding the combat. Our
enemy,
my
enemy knows that he has nothing now to
expect, for his past generosity, but kindness, should
he become our captive. Still, Captain Bignall, I ask
for time, to prepare the `Dart' for a conflict that will
try all her boasted powers, and to insure a victory
that will not be bought without a price.
But should he escape
On my life he will not attempt it. I not only
know the man, but how formidable are his means of
resistance. A short half hour will put us in the
necessary
condition, and do no discredit either to our
spirit or to our prudence.
The veteran yielded a reluctant consent, which
was not, however, accorded without much muttering
concerning the disgrace a British man-of-war
incurred
in not running alongside the boldest pirate that
floated, and blowing him out of water, with a single
match. Wilder, who was accustomed to the honest
professional bravados that often formed a peculiar
embellishment to the really firm and manly resolution
of the seamen of that age, permitted him to make
his plaints at will, while he busied himself in a
manner
that he knew was now of the last importance,
and in a duty that properly came under his more
immediate
inspection, in consequence of the station he
occupied.
The order for all hands to clear ship for action
was again given, and received in the cheerful temper
with which mariners are wont to welcome any of
the more important changes of their exciting
profession
.
Little remained, however, to be done; for
most of the previous preparations had still been left,
as at the original meeting of the two vessels. Then
came the beat to quarters, and the more serious and
fearful-looking preparations for certain combat. After
these several arrangements had been completed, the
crew at their guns, the sail-trimmers at the braces,
and the officers in their several batteries, the
after-yards
were swung, and the ship once more put in
motion.
During this brief interval, the vessel of the Rover
lay, at the distance of half a mile, in a state of entire
rest, without betraying the smallest interest in the
obvious movements of her hostile neighbour. When,
however, the Dart was seen yielding to the breeze,
and gradually increasing her velocity, until the water
was gathering under her fore-foot in a little rolling
wave of foam, the bows of the other fell off from the
direction of the wind, the topsail was filled, and, in
her turn, the hull was held in command, by giving to
it the impetus of motion. The Dart now set
again at her gaff that broad field which had been
lowered during the conference, and which had
floated
in triumph through the hazards and struggles of a
thousand combats. No answering emblem, however,
was exhibited from the peak of her adversary.
In this manner the two ships gathered way, as
it is expressed in nautical language, watching each
other with eyes as jealous as though they had been
two rival monsters of the great deep, each
endeavouring
to conceal from his antagonist the evolution
contemplated next. The earnest, serious manner of
Wilder had not failed to produce its influence on the
straight-minded seaman who commanded the Dart;
and, by this time, he was as much disposed as his
lieutenant to approach the conflict leisurely, and
with proper caution.
The day had hitherto been cloudless, and a vault
of purer blue never canopied a waste of water, than
the arch which had swept for hours above the heads
of our marine adventurers. But, as if nature
frowned
on their present bloody designs, a dark,
threatening
mass of vapour was blending the ocean with the
sky, in a direction opposed to the steady currents of
the air. These well-known and ominous signs did
not escape the vigilance of those who manned the
hostile vessels, but the danger was still deemed too
remote to interrupt the higher interests of the
approaching
combat.
We have a squall brewing in the west, said the
experienced and wary Bignall, pointing to the
frowning
symptoms as he spoke; but we can handle the
pirate, and get all snug again, before it works its way
up against this breeze.
Wilder assented; for, by this time, high
professional
pride was swelling in his bosom also, and a
generous rivalry was getting the mastery of feelings
that were possibly foreign to his duty, however
natural
they might have been in one as open to kindness
as himself.
The Rover is sending down even his lighter
masts! exclaimed the youth; it would seem that
he greatly distrusts the weather.
We will not follow his example; for he will wish
they were aloft again, the moment we get him fairly
under the play of our batteries. By George our
King, but he has a pretty moving boat under him!
T 2
Let fall the main-course, sir; down with it, or we
shall have it night before we get the rogue a-beam.
The order was obeyed; and then the Dart,
feeling the powerful impulse, quickened her speed,
like an animated being, that is freshly urged by its
apprehensions or its wishes. By this time, she had
gained a position on the weather-quarter of her
adversary
,
who had not manifested the smallest desire
to prevent her attaining so material an advantage.
On the contrary, while the Dolphin kept the same
canvas spread, she continued to lighten her
top-hamper
,
bringing as much of the weight as possible, from
the towering height of her tall masts, to the greater
security of the hull. Still, the distance between them
was too great, in the opinion of Bignall, to commence
the contest, while the facility with which his
adversary
moved a-head threatened to protract the
important
moment to an unreasonable extent, or to reduce
him to a crowd of sail that might prove
embarrassing
,
while enveloped in the smoke, and pressed by
the urgencies of the combat.
We will touch his pride, sir, since you think him
a man of spirit, said the veteran, to his faithful
coadjutor
:
Give him a weather-gun, and show him
another of his Master's ensigns.
The roar of the piece, and the display of three
more of the fields of England, in quick succession,
from different parts of the Dart, failed to produce
the slightest evidence, even of observation, aboard
their seemingly insensible neighbour. The
Dolphin
still kept on her way, occasionally swooping
up gracefully to touch the wind, and then deviating
from her course again to leeward, as the porpoise is
seen to turn aside from his direction to snuff the
breeze, while he lazily sports along his briny path.
He will not be moved by any of the devices of
lawful and ordinary warfare, said Wilder, when he
witnessed the indifference with which their challenge
had been received.
Then try him with a shot.
A gun was now discharged from the side next the
still receding Dolphin. The iron messenger was
seen bounding along the surface of the sea, skipping
lightly from wave to wave, until it cast a little cloud
of spray upon the very deck of their enemy, as it
boomed harmlessly past her hull. Another, and yet
another, followed, without in any manner extracting
signal or notice from the Rover.
How's this! exclaimed the disappointed
Bignall
.
Has he a charm for his ship, that all our shot
sweep by him in rain! Master Fid, can you do
nothing
for the credit of honest people, and the honour
of a pennant? Let us hear from your old favourite;
in times past she used to speak to better purpose.
Ay, ay, sir, returned the accommodating
Richard
,
who, in the sudden turns of his fortune, found
himself in authority over a much-loved and
long-cherished
piece. I christened the gun after
Mistress
Whiffle, your Honour, for the same reason, that
they both can do their own talking. Now, stand
aside, my lads, and let clattering Kate have a
whisper
in the discourse.
Richard, who had coolly taken his sight, while
speaking, now deliberately applied the match with
his own hand, and, with a philosophy that was
sufficiently
to be commended in a mercenary, sent what
he boldly pronounced to be a thorough
straight-goer
across the water, in the direction of his recent
associates. The usual moments of suspense
succeeded
,
and then the torn fragments, which were seen
scattered in the air, announced that the shot had
passed through the nettings of the Dolphin. The
effect on the vessel of the Rover was instantaneous,
and nearly magical. A long stripe of cream-coloured
canvas, which had been artfully extended, from her
stem to her stern, in a line with her guns, disappeared
as suddenly as a bird would shut its wings, leaving in
its place a broad blood-red belt, which was bristled
with the armament of the ship. At the same time,
an ensign of a similar ominous colour, rose from her
poop, and, fluttering darkly and fiercely for a
moment
,
it became fixed at the end of the gaff.
Now I know him for the knave that he is! cried
the excited Bignall; and, see! he has thrown away
his false paint, and shows the well-known bloody side,
from which he gets his name. Stand to your guns,
my men! the pirate is getting earnest.
He was still speaking, when a sheet of bright flame
glanced from out that streak of red which was so
well adapted to work upon the superstitious awe of
the common mariners, and was followed by the
simultaneous
explosion of nearly a dozen wide-mouthed
pieces of artillery. The startling change, from
inattention
and indifference, to this act of bold and
decided
hostility, produced a strong effect on the
boldest
heart on board the King's cruiser. The
momentary
interval of suspense was passed in unchanged
attitudes and looks of deep attention; and then the
rushing of the iron storm was heard hurtling through
the air, as it came fearfully on. The crash that
followed
,
mingled, as it was, with human groans, and
succeeded by the tearing of riven plank, and the
scattering
high of splinters, ropes, blocks, and the
implements
of war, proclaimed the fatal accuracy of the
broadside. But the surprise, and, with it, the brief
confusion, endured but for an instant. The English
shouted, and sent back a return to the deadly assault
they had just received, recovering manfully and
promptly from the shock which it had assuredly given.
The ordinary and more regular cannonading of a
naval combat succeeded. Anxious to precipitate the
issue, both ships pressed nigher to each other the
while, until, in a few moments, the two white canopies
of smoke, that were wreathing about their respective
masts, were blended in one, marking a solitary spot
of strife, in the midst of a scene of broad and bright
tranquillity. The discharges of the cannon were hot,
close, and incessant. While the hostile parties,
however
,
closely imitated each other in their zeal in
dealing out destruction, a peculiar difference marked
the distinction in character of the two crews. Loud,
cheering shouts accompanied each discharge from
the lawful cruiser, while the people of the rover did
their murderous work amid the deep silence of
desperation
.
The spirit and uproar of the scene soon quickened
that blood, in the veins of the veteran Bignall, which
had begun to circulate a little slowly by time.
The fellow has not forgotten his art! he
exclaimed
,
as the effects of his enemy's skill were
getting
but too manifest, in the rent sails, shivered spars,
and tottering masts of his own ship. Had he but
the commission of the King in his pocket, one might
call him a hero!
The emergency was too urgent to throw away the
time in words. Wilder answered only by cheering
his own people to their fierce and laborious task.
The ships had now fallen off before the wind, and
were running parallel to each other, emitting sheets
of flame, that were incessantly glancing through
immense
volumes of smoke. The spars of the
respective
vessels were alone visible, at brief and uncertain
intervals. Many minutes had thus passed, seeming
to those engaged but a moment of time, when the
mariners of the Dart found that they no longer
held their vessel in the quick command, so necessary
to their situation. The important circumstance was
instantly conveyed from the master to Wilder, and
from Wilder to his superior. A hasty consultation
on the cause and consequences of this unexpected
event was the immediate and natural result.
See! cried Wilder, the sails are already
hanging
against the masts like rags; the explosions of the
artillery have stilled the wind.
Hark! answered the more experienced Bignall:
There goes the artillery of heaven among our own
guns.The squall is already upon usport the helm,
sir, and sheer the ship out of the smoke! Hard
a-port
with the helm, sir, at once!hard with it a-port,
I say.
But the lazy motion of the vessel did not answer
to the impatience of those who directed her
movements
,
nor did it meet the pressing exigencies of the
moment. In the mean time, while Bignall, and the
officers whose duties kept them near his person,
assisted
by the sail-trimmers, were thus occupied, the
people in the batteries continued their murderous
employment. The roar of cannon was still constant,
and nearly overwhelming, though there were instants
when the deep ominous mutterings of the atmosphere
were too distinctly audible to be mistaken. Still the
eye could lend no assistance to the hearing, in
determining
the judgment of the mariners. Hulls, spars,
and sails were alike enveloped in the curling wreaths
which wrapped heaven, air, vessels, and ocean, alike,
in one white, obscure, foggy mantle. Even the
persons
of the crew were merely seen at instants,
labouring
at the guns, through brief and varying
openings
.
I never knew the smoke pack so heavy on the
deck of a ship before, said Bignall, with a concern
that even his caution could not entirely repress.
Keep the helm a-portjam it hard, sir! By
Heaven
,
Mr Wilder, those knaves well know they are
struggling for their lives!
The fight is all our own! shouted the second
lieutenant, from among the guns, stanching, as he
spoke, the blood of a severe splinter-wound in the face,
and far too intent on his own immediate occupation,
to have noticed the signs of the weather. He has
not answered with a single gun, for near a minute.
'Fore George, the rogues have enough!
exclaimed
the delighted Bignall. Three cheers for vic
Hold, sir! interrupted Wilder, with sufficient
decision to check his Commander's premature
exultation
;
on my life, our work is not so soon ended.
I think, indeed, his guns are silent;but, see! the
smoke is beginning to lift. In a few more minutes, if
our own fire should cease, the view will be clear.
A shout from the men in the batteries interrupted
his words; and then came a general cry that the
pirates
were sheering off. The exultation at this
fancied
evidence of their superiority was, however, soon
and fearfully interrupted. A bright, vivid flash
penetrated
through the dense vapour which still hung
about them in a most extraordinary manner, and was
followed by a crash from the heavens, to which the
simultaneous explosion of fifty pieces of artillery
would have sounded feeble.
Call the people from their guns! said Bignall,
in those suppressed tones that are only more
portentous
from their forced and unnatural calmness: Call
them away at once, sir, and get the canvas in!
Wilder, startled more at the proximity and
apparent
weight of the squall than at words to which he
had been long accustomed, delayed not to give an
order that was seemingly so urgent. The men left
their batteries, like athlet retiring from the arena,
some bleeding and faint, some still fierce and angry,
and all more or less excited by the furious scene
in which they had just been actors. Many sprung
to the well-known ropes, while others, as they
ascended
into the cloud which still hung on the vessel,
became lost to the eye in her rigging.
Shall I reef, or furl? demanded Wilder,
standing
with the trumpet at his lips, ready to issue the
necessary order.
Hold, sir; another minute will give us an
opening
.
The lieutenant paused; for he was not slow to see
that now, indeed, the veil was about to be drawn
from their real situation. The smoke, which had
lain upon their very decks, as though pressed down
by the superincumbent weight of the atmosphere,
first began to stir; was then seen eddying among the
masts; and, finally, whirled wildly away before a
powerful current of air. The view was, indeed, now
all before them.
In place of the glorious sun, and that bright, blue
canopy which had lain above them a short half-hour
before, the heavens were clothed in one immense
black veil. The sea reflected the portentous colour,
looking dark and angrily. The waves had already
lost their regular rise and fall, and were tossing to
and fro, as if awaiting the power that was to give
them direction and greater force. The flashes from
the heavens were not in quick succession; but the
few that did break upon the gloominess of the scene
came in majesty, and with dazzling brightness. They
were accompanied by the terrific thunder of the
tropics
,
in which it is scarcely profanation to fancy that
the voice of One who made the universe is actually
speaking to the creatures of his hand. On every side,
was the appearance of a fierce and dangerous
struggle
in the elements. The vessel of the Rover was
running lightly before a breeze, which had already
come fresh and fitful from the cloud, with her sails
reduced, and her people coolly, but actively,
employed
in repairing the damages of the fight.
Not a moment was to be lost in imitating the
example
of the wary freebooters. The head of the
Dart was hastily, and happily, got in a direction
contrary to the breeze; and, as she began to follow
the course taken by the Dolphin, an attempt was
made to gather her torn and nearly useless canvas
to the yards. But precious minutes had been lost in
the smoky canopy, that might never be regained.
The sea changed its colour from a dark green to a
glittering white; and then the fury of the gust was
heard rushing along the water with fearful rapidity,
and with a violence that could not be resisted.
Be lively, men! shouted Bignall himself, in the
exigency in which his vessel was placed; Roll up
the cloth; in with it allleave not a rag to the squall!
'Fore George, Mr Wilder, but this wind is not
playing
with us; cheer up the men to their work; speak
to them cheerily, sir!
Furl away! shouted Wilder. Cut, if too late;
work away with knives and teethdown, every man
of you, downdown for your lives, all!
There was that in the voice of the lieutenant which
sounded in the ears of his people like a supernatural
cry. He had so recently witnessed a calamity
similar
to that which again threatened him, that perhaps
his feelings lent a secret horror to the tones. A score
of forms was seen descending swiftly, through an
atmosphere that appeared sensible to the touch. Nor
was their escape, which might be likened to the
stooping of birds that dart into their nest, too
earnestly
pressed. Stripped of all its rigging, and
already
tottering under numerous wounds, the lofty
and overloaded spars yielded to the mighty force of
the squall, tumbling in succession towards the hull,
until nothing stood but the three firmer, but shorn
and nearly useless, lower masts. By far the greater
number of those aloft reached the deck in time to
insure
their safety, though some there were too
stubborn
,
and still too much under the sullen influence
of the combat, to hearken to the words of warning.
These victims of their own obstinacy were seen
clinging
to the broken fragments of the spars, as the
Vol. II. U
Dart, in a cloud of foam, drove away from the
spot where they floated, until their persons and their
misery were alike swallowed in the distance.
It is the hand of God! hoarsely exclaimed the
veteran Bignall, while his contracting eye drunk in
the destruction of the wreck. Mark me, Henry
Ark; I will for ever testify that the guns of the pirate
have not brought us to this condition.
Little disposed to seek the same miserable
consolation
as his Commander, Wilder exerted himself in
counteracting, so far as circumstances would allow,
an injury that he felt, however, at that moment to be
irreparable. Amid the howling of the gust, and the
fearful crashing of the thunder, with an atmosphere
now lurid with the glare of lightning, and now nearly
obscured by the dark canopy of vapour, and with all
the frightful evidences of the fight still reeking and
ghastly before their eyes, did the crew of the British
cruiser prove true to themselves and to their ancient
reputation. The voices of Bignall and his
subordinates
were heard in the tempest, uttering those
mandates
which long experience had rendered familiar,
or encouraging the people to their duty. But the
strife of the elements was happily of short
continuance
.
The squall soon swept over the spot, leaving
the currents of the trade rushing into their former
channels, and a sea that was rather stilled, than
agitated
,
by the counteracting influence of the winds.
But, as one danger passed away from before the
eyes of the mariners of the Dart, another,
scarcely
less to be apprehended, forced itself upon their
attention. All recollection of the favours of the past,
and every feeling of gratitude, was banished from
the mind of Wilder, by the mountings of powerful
professional pride, and that love of glory which
becomes
inherent in the warrior, as he gazed on the
untouched and beautiful symmetry of the
Dolphin's
spars, and all the perfect, and still
underanged
,
order of her tackle. It seemed as if she bore a
charmed fate, or that some supernatural agency had
been instrumental in preserving her unharmed, amid
the violence of a second hurricane. But cooler
thought, and more impartial reflection, compelled the
internal acknowledgment, that the vigilance and
wise precautions of the remarkable individual who
appeared not only to govern her movements, but to
control her fortunes, had their proper influence in
producing the result.
Little leisure, however, was allowed to ruminate
on these changes, or to deprecate the advantage of
their enemy. The vessel of the Rover had already
opened many broad sheets of canvas; and, as the
return of the regular breeze gave her the wind, her
approach was rapid and unavoidable.
'Fore George, Mr Ark, luck is all on the
dishonest
side to-day, said the veteran, so soon as he
perceived
,
by the direction which the Dolphin took,
that the encounter was likely to be renewed. Send
the people to quarters again, and clear away the
guns; for we are likely to have another bout with
the rogues.
I would advise a moment's delay, Wilder
earnestly
observed, when he heard his Commander
issuing
an order to his people to prepare to deliver their
fire, the instant their enemy should come within a
favourable position. Let me entreat you to delay;
we know not what may be his present intentions.
None shall put foot on the deck of the `Dart,'
without submitting to the authority of her royal
master
,
returned the stern old tar. Give it to him,
my men! Scatter the rogues from their guns! and
let them know the danger of approaching a lion,
though he should be crippled!
Wilder saw that remonstrance was now too late;
for a fresh broadside was hurled from the Dart, to
defeat any generous intentions that the Rover might
entertain. The ship of the latter received the iron
storm, while advancing, and immediately deviated
gracefully from her course, in such a way as to
prevent
its repetition. Then she was seen sweeping
towards the bows of the nearly helpless cruiser of
the King, and a hoarse summons was heard ordering
her ensign to be lowered.
Come on, ye villains! shouted the excited
Bignall
.
Come, and perform the office with your own
hands!
The graceful ship, as if sensible herself to the
taunts of her enemy, sprung nigher to the wind, and
shot across the fore-foot of the Dart, delivering
her fire, gun after gun, with deliberate and deadly
accuracy, full into that defenceless portion of her
antagonist. A crush like that of meeting bodies
followed
,
and then fifty grim visages were seen entering
the scene of carnage, armed with the deadly
weapons
of personal conflict. The shock of so close
and so fatal a discharge had, for the moment,
paralyzed
the efforts of the assailed; but no sooner did
Bignall, and his lieutenant, see the dark forms that
issued from the smoke on their own decks, than,
with voices that had not even then lost their
authority
,
each summoned a band of followers, backed by
whom, they bravely dashed into the opposite
gangways
of their ship, to stay the torrent. The first
encounter
was fierce and fatal, both parties receding a
little, to wait for succour and recover breath.
Come on, ye murderous thieves! cried the
dauntless veteran, who stood foremost in his own
band, conspicuous by the locks of gray that floated
around his naked head, well do ye know that
heaven
is with the right!
The grim freebooters in his front recoiled and
opened; then came a sheet of flame, from the side
of the Dolphin, through an empty port of her
adversary
,
bearing in its centre a hundred deadly
missiles
.
The sword of Bignall was flourished furiously
and wildly above his head, and his voice was still
heard crying, till the sounds rattled in his throat,
Come on, ye knaves! come on!HarryHarry
Ark! O God!Hurrah!
He fell like a log, and died the unwitting possessor
of that very commission for which he had toiled
throughout a life of hardship and danger. Until now,
Wilder had made good his quarter of the deck,
though pressed by a band as fierce and daring as his
own; but, at this fearful crisis in the combat, a voice
was heard in the mele, that thrilled on all his
nerves, and seemed even to carry its fearful influence
over the minds of his men.
Make way there, make way! it said, in tones
clear, deep, and breathing with authority, make
way, and follow; no hand but mine shall lower that
vaunting flag!
Stand to your faith, my men! shouted Wilder in
reply. Shouts, oaths, imprecations, and groans formed
a fearful accompaniment of the rude encounter,
which was, however, far too violent to continue long.
Wilder saw, with agony, that numbers and
impetuosity
were sweeping his supporters from around
him-Again
and again he called them to the succour with
his voice, or stimulated them to daring by his
example
.
Friend after friend fell at his feet, until he was
driven to the utmost extremity of the deck. Here
he again rallied a little band, against which several
furious charges were made, in vain.
Ha! exclaimed a voice he well knew; death
to all traitors! Spit the spy, as you would a dog!
Charge through them, my bullies; a halbert to the
hero who shall reach his heart!
Avast, ye lubber! returned the stern tones of the
staunch Richard. Here are a white man and a
nigger at your service, if you've need of a spit.
U 2
Two more of the gang! continued the General,
aiming a blow that threatened to immolate the
topman
,
as he spoke.
A dark half-naked form was interposed to receive
the descending blade, which fell on the staff of a
half-pike
,
and severed it as though it had been a reed.
Nothing daunted by the defenceless state in which he
found himself, Scipio made his way to the front of
Wilder, where, with a body divested to the waist of
every garment, and empty handed, he fought with his
brawny arms, like one who despised the cuts, thrusts
and assaults, of which his athletic frame immediately
became the helpless subject.
Give it to 'em, right and left, Guinea, cried Fid:
here is one who will come in as a backer, so soon
as he has stopped the grog of the marine.
The parries and science of the unfortunate
General
were at this moment set at nought, by a blow
from Richard, which broke down all his defences,
descending through cap and skull to the jaw.
Hold, murderers! cried Wilder, who saw the
numberless blows that were falling on the defenceless
body of the still undaunted black. Strike here!
and spare an unarmed man!
The sight of our adventurer became confused, for
he saw the negro fall, dragging with him to the deck
two of his assailants; and then a voice, deep as the
emotion which such a scene might create, appeared
to utter in the very portals of his ear,
Our work is done! He that strikes another blow
makes an enemy of me.
CHAPTER XV.
Take him hence;
The whole world shall not save him.
Cymbeline
.
The
recent gust had not passed more fearfully and
suddenly over the ship, than the scene just related.
But the smiling aspect of the tranquil sky, and bright
sun of the Caribbean sea, found no parallel in the
horrors that succeeded the combat. The
momentary
confusion which accompanied the fall of Scipio
soon disappeared, and Wilder was left to gaze on the
wreck of all the boasted powers of his cruiser, and
on that waste of human life, which had been the
attendants
of the struggle. The former has already
been sufficiently described; but a short account of
the present state of the actors may serve to elucidate
the events that are to follow.
Within a few yards of the place he was permitted
to occupy himself, stood the motionless form of the
Rover. A second glance was necessary, however,
to recognise, in the grim visage to which the
boarding-cap
already mentioned lent a look of artificial
ferocity
,
the usually bland countenance of the
individual
.
As the eye of Wilder roamed over the
swelling
,
erect, and still triumphant figure, it was difficult
not to fancy that even the stature had been suddenly
and unaccountably increased. One hand rested on
the hilt of a yataghan, which, by the crimson drops
that flowed along its curved blade, had evidently
done fatal service in the fray; and one foot was
placed, seemingly with supernatural weight, on that
national emblem which it had been his pride to lower.
His eye was wandering sternly, but understandingly,
over the scene, though he spoke not, nor in any other
manner betrayed the deep interest he felt in the past.
At his side, and nearly within the circle of his arm,
stood the cowering form of the boy Roderick,
unprovided
with weapon, his garments sprinkled with
blood, his eye contracted, wild, and fearful, and his
face pallid as those in whom the tide of life had just
ceased to circulate.
Here and there, were to be seen the wounded
captives
,
still sullen and unconquered in spirit, while
many of their scarcely less fortunate enemies lay in
their blood, around the deck, with such gleamings of
ferocity on their countenances as plainly denoted
that the current of their mediations was still
running
on vengeance. The uninjured and the slightly
wounded, of both bands, were already pursuing
their different objects of plunder or of secretion.
But, so thorough was the discipline established by
the leader of the freebooters, so absolute his power,
that blow had not been struck, nor blood drawn,
since the moment when his prohibitory mandate was
heard. There had been enough of destruction,
however
,
to have satisfied their most gluttonous longings,
had human life been the sole object of the assault.
Wilder felt many a pang, as the marble-like features
of humble friend or faithful servitor came, one after
another, under his recognition; but the shock was
greatest when his eye fell upon the rigid, and still
frowning, countenance of his veteran Commander.
Captain Heidegger, he said, struggling to
maintain
the fortitude which became the moment; the
fortune of the day is yours: I ask mercy and
kindness
,
in behalf of the survivors.
They shall be granted to those who, of right,
may claim them: I hope it may be found that all are
included in this promise.
The voice of the Rover was solemn, and full of
meaning; and it appeared to convey more than the
simple import of the words. Wilder might have
mused long and vainly, however, on the equivocal
manner in which he had been answered, had not the
approach of a body of the hostile crew, among whom
he instantly recognised the most prominent of the
late mutineers of the Dolphin, speedily supplied a
clue to the hidden meaning of their leader.
We claim the execution of our ancient laws!
sternly commenced the foremost of the gang,
addressing
his chief with a brevity and an air of fierceness
which the late combat might well have generated, if
not excused.
What would you have?
The lives of traitors! was the sullen answer.
You know the conditions of our service. If any
such are in our power, let them meet their fate.
Had any doubt remained in the mind of Wilder,
as to the meaning of these terrible claimants of
justice
,
it would have vanished at the sullen, ominous
manner with which he and his two companions
were immediately dragged before the lawless chief.
Though the love of life was strong and active in his
breast, it was not, even in that fearful moment,
exhibited
in any deprecating or unmanly form. Not
for an instant did his mind waver, or his thoughts
wander to any subterfuge, that might prove
unworthy
of his profession or his former character. One
anxious, inquiring look was fastened on the eye of
him whose power alone might save him. He
witnessed
the short, severe struggle of regret that
softened
the rigid muscles of the Rover's countenance;
and then he saw the instant, cold, and calm
composure
which settled on every one of its disciplined
lineaments. He knew, at once, that the feelings of
the man were smothered in the duty of the chief,
and more was unnecessary to teach him the utter
hopelessness of his condition. Scorning to render
his state degrading by useless remonstrances, the
youth remained where his accusers had seen fit to
place himfirm, motionless, and silent.
What would ye have? the Rover was at length
heard to say, in a voice that even his iron nerves
scarce rendered deep and full-toned as common.
What ask ye?
Their lives!
I understand you; go; they are at your mercy.
Notwithstanding the horrors of the scene through
which he had just passed, and that high and lofty
excitement which had sustained him through the
fight, the deliberate, solemn tones with which his
judge delivered a sentence that he knew consigned
him to a hasty and ignominious death, shook the
frame of our adventurer nearly to insensibility. The
blood recoiled backward to his heart, and the
sickening
sensation that beset his brain threatened to
upset
his reason. But the shock passed, on the instant,
leaving him erect, and seemingly proud and firm as
ever, and certainly with no evidence of mortal
weakness
,
that human eye could discover.
For myself nothing is demanded, he said, with
admirable steadiness. I know your self-enacted
laws condemn me to a miserable fate; but for these
ignorant, confiding, faithful followers, I claim, nay
beg, entreat, implore your mercy; they knew not
what they did, and
Speak to these! said the Rover, pointing, with
an averted eye, to the fierce knot by which he was
surrounded: These are your judges, and the sole
ministers of mercy.
Strong and nearly unconquerable disgust was
apparent
in the manner of the youth; but, with a mighty
effort, he subdued it, and, turning to the crew,
continued
,
Then even to these will I humble myself in
petitions
.
Ye are men, and ye are mariners
Away with him! exclaimed the croaking
Nightingale
;
he preaches! away with him to the
yard-arm
!
away!
The shrill, long-drawn winding of the call which
the callous boatswain sounded in bitter mockery,
was answered by an echo from twenty voices, in
which the accents of nearly as many different people
mingled in hoarse discordancy, as they shouted,
To the yard-arm! away with the three! away!
Wilder cast a last glance of appeal at the Rover;
but he met no look, in return, from a face that was
intentionally averted. Then, with a burning brain,
he felt himself rudely transferred from the
quarter-deck
into the centre and less privileged portion of
the ship. The violence of the passage, the hurried
reeving of cords, and all the fearful preparations of a
nautical execution, appeared but the business of a
moment, to him who stood so near the verge of time.
A yellow flag for punishment! bawled the
revengeful
captain of the forecastle; let the
gentleman
sail on his last cruise, under the rogue's ensign!
A yellow flag! a yellow flag! echoed twenty
taunting throats. Down with the Rover's ensign,
and up with the colours of the prevot-marshal! A
yellow flag! a yellow flag!
The hoarse laughter, and mocking merriment, with
which this coarse device was received, stirred the ire
of Fid, who had submitted in silence, so far, to the
rude treatment he received, for no other reason than
that he thought his superior was the best qualified to
utter the little which it might be necessary to say.
Avast, ye villains! he hotly exclaimed, prudence
and moderation losing their influence, under the
excitement
of scornful anger; ye cut-throat, lubberly
villains! That ye are villains, is to be proved, in your
teeth, by your getting your sailing orders from the
devil; and that ye are lubbers, any man may see by
the fashion in which ye have rove this cord about
my throat. A fine jam will ye make with a turn in
your whip! But ye'll all come to know how a man
is to be decently hanged, ye rogues, ye will. Ye'll
all come honestly by the knowledge, in your day, ye
will!
Clear the turn, and run him up! shouted one,
two, three voices, in rapid succession; a clear whip,
and a swift run to heaven!
Happily a fresh burst of riotous clamour, from one
of the hatchways, interrupted the intention; and then
was heard the cry of,
A priest! a priest! Pipe the rogues to prayers,
before they take their dance on nothing!
The ferocious laughter with which the freebooters
received this sneering proposal, was hushed as
suddenly
as though One answered to their mockery, from
that mercy-seat whose power they so sacrilegiously
braved, when a deep, menacing voice was heard in
their midst, saying,
By heaven, if touch, or look, be laid too boldly
on a prisoner in this ship, he who offends had better
beg the fate ye give these miserable men, than meet
my anger. Stand off, I bid you, and let the chaplain
approach!
Every bold hand was instantly withdrawn, and
each profane lip was closed in trembling silence,
giving
the terrified and horror-stricken subject of their
liberties room and opportunity to advance to the
scene of punishment.
See, said the Rover, in calmer but still deeply
authoritative tones; you are a minister of God,
and your office is sacred charity: If you have aught
to smooth the dying moment to fellow mortal, haste
to impart it!
In what have these offended? demanded the
divine, when power was given to speak.
No matter; it is enough that their hour is near!
If you would lift your voice in prayer, fear nothing.
The unusual sounds shall be welcome even here.
Ay, and these miscreants, who so boldly surround
you, shall kneel, and be mute, as beings whose souls
are touched by the holy rite. Scoffers shall be dumb,
and unbelievers respectful, at my beck.Speak
freely!
Scourge of the seas! commenced the chaplain,
across whose pallid features a flash of holy
excitement
had cast its glow, remorseless violator of the
laws of man! audacious contemner of the mandates
of your God! a fearful retribution shall avenge this
crime. Is it not enough that you have this day
consigned
so many to a sudden end, but your vengeance
must be glutted with more blood? Beware the hour
when these things shall be visited, in almighty power,
on your own devoted head!
Look! said the Rover, smiling, but with an
expression
that was haggard, in spite of the unnatural
exultation that struggled about his quivering lip;
here are the evidences of the manner in which
Heaven protects the right!
Though its awful justice be hidden in
inscrutable
wisdom for a time, deceive not thyself; the hour
is at hand when it shall be seen and felt in majesty!
The voice of the chaplain became suddenly choaked;
for his wandering eye had fallen on the frowning
countenance of Bignall, which, set in death, lay but
half concealed beneath that flag which the Rover
himself had cast upon the body. Then, summoning
his energies, he continued, in the clear and
admonitory
strain that befitted his sacred calling: They
tell me you are but half lost to feeling for your kind;
and, though the seeds of better principles, of better
days, are smothered in your heart, that they still
exist
,
and might be quickened into goodly
Peace! You speak in vain. To your duty with
these men, or be silent.
Is their doom sealed?
It is.
Who says it? demanded a low voice at the
elbow
of the Rover, which, coming upon his ear at that
Vol. II. X
moment, thrilled upon his most latent nerve, chasing
the blood from his cheek to the secret recesses of his
frame. But the weakness had already passed away
with the surprise, as he calmly, and almost instantly,
answered,
The law.
The law! repeated the governess. Can they
who set all order at defiance, who despise each
human
regulation, talk of law! Say, it is heartless,
vindictive
vengeance, if you will; but call it not by the
sacred name of law.I wander from my object!
They have told me of this frightful scene, and I am
come to offer ransom for the offenders. Name your
price, and let it be worthy of the subject we
redeem
;
a grateful parent shall freely give it all for
thpreserver
of his child.
If gold will purchase the lives you wish, the
other interrupted, with the swiftness of thought, it
is here in hoards, and ready on the moment. What
say my people! Will they take ransom?
A short, brooding pause succeeded; and then a low,
ominous murmur was raised in the throng,
announcing
their reluctance to dispense with throng, vengeance. A
scornful glance shot from the glowing eye of the
Rover, across the fierce countenances by which he
was environed; his lips moved with vehemence;
but, as if he disdained further intercession, nothing
was uttered for the ear. Turning to the divine, he
added, with all the former composure of his
wonderful
manner,
Forget not your sacred officetime is leaving
us. He was then moving slowly aside, in imitation
of the governess, who had already veiled her
features
from the revolting scene, when Wilder
addressed
him.
For the service you would have done me, from
my soul I thank you, he said. If you would know
that I leave you in peace, give yet one solemn
assurance
before I die.
To what?
Promise, that they who came with me into your
ship shall leave it unharmed, and speedily.
Promise, Walter, said a solemn, smothered
voice, in the throng.
I do.
I ask no more.Now, Reverend Minister of God,
perform thy holy office, near my companions. Their
ignorance may profit by your service. If I quit this
bright and glorious scene, without thought and
gratitude
to that Being who, I humbly trust, has made me
an heritor of still greater things, I offend wittingly
and without hope. But these may find consolation
in your prayers.
Amid an awful and breathing silence, the chaplain
approached the devoted companions of Wilder.
Their comparative insignificance had left them
unobserved
during most of the foregoing scene; and
material
changes had occurred, unbeeded, in their
situation
.
Fid was seated on the deck, his collar
unbuttoned
,
his neck encircled with the fatal cord,
sustaining
the head of the helpless black, which he
had placed, with singular tenderness and care, in
his lap.
This man, at least, will disappoint the malice of
his enemies, said the divine, taking the hard hand
of the negro into his own; the termination of his
wrongs and his degradation approaches; he will soon
be far beyond the reach of human injustice.Friend,
by what name is your companion known?
It is little matter how you hail a dying man,
returned
Richard, with a melancholy shake of the
head. He has commonly been entered on the ship's
books as Scipio Africa, coming, as he did, from the
coast of Guinea; but, if you call him S'ip, he will
not be slow to understand.
Has he known baptism? Is he a Christian?
If he be not, I don't know who the devil is!
responded Richard, with an asperity that might be
deemed a little unseasonable. A man who serves
his country, is true to his messmate, and has no skulk
about him, I call a saint, so far as mere religion goes.
I say, Guinea, my hearty, give the chaplain a gripe
of the fist, if you call yourself a Christian. A
Spanish
windlass wouldn't give a stronger screw than the
knuckles of that nigger an hour ago; and, now, you
see to what a giant may be brought.
His latter moment is indeed near. Shall I offer
a prayer for the health of the departing spirit?
I don't know, I don't know! answered Fid,
gulping his words, and uttering a hem, that was still
deep and powerful, as in the brightest and happiest
of his days. When there is so little time given to
a poor fellow to speak his mind in, it may be well to
let him have a chance to do most of the talking.
Something may come uppermost which he would
like to send to his friends in Africa; in which case,
we may as well be looking out for a proper
messenger
.
Hah! what is it, boy? You see he is already
trying to rowse something up out of his ideas.
Misser Fidhe'm take a collar, said the black,
struggling for utterance.
Ay, ay, returned Richard, again clearing his
throat, and looking to the right and left fiercely, as
if he were seeking some object on which to wreak
his vengeance. Ay, ay, Guinea; put your mind at
ease on that point, and for that matter on all others.
You shall have a grave as deep as the sea, and
Christian
burial, boy, if this here parson will stand by his
work. Any small message you may have for your
friends shall be logg'd, and put in the way of coming
to their ears. You have had much foul weather in
your time, Guinea, and some squalls have whistled
about your head, that might have been spared,
mayhap
,
had your colour been a shade or two lighter,
For that matter, it may be that I have rode you
down a little too close myself, boy, when over-heated
with the conceit of skin; for all which may the Lord
forgive me as freely as I hope you will do the same
thing!
The negro made a fruitless effort to rise,
endeavouring
to grasp the hand of the other, saying, as he
did so,
Misser Fid beg a pardon of a black man!
Masser
aloft forget he'm all, misser Richard; he t'ink 'em
no more.
It will be what I call a d'd generous thing,
if he does, returned Richard, whose sorrow and
whose conscience had stirred up his uncouth feelings
to an extraordinary degree. There's the affair of
slipping off the wreck of the smuggler has never been
properly settled atween us, neither; and many other
small services of like nature, for which, d'ye see, I'll
just thank you, while there is opportunity; for no
one can say whether we shall ever be borne again
on the same ship's books.
A feeble sign from his companion caused the
topman
to pause, while he endeavoured to construe its
meaning as well as he was able. With a facility, that
was in some degree owing to the character of the
individual
,
his construction of the other's meaning was
favourable to himself, as was quite evident by the
manner in which he resumed,
Well, well, mayhap we may. I suppose they
birth the people there in some such order as is done
here below, in which case we may be put within
hailing distance, after all. Our sailing orders are
both signed; thought, as you seem likely to slip your
cable before these thieves are ready to run me up,
you will be getting the best of the wind. I shall not
say much concerning any signals it may be necessary
to make, in order to make one another out aloft,
X 2
taking it for granted that you will not overlook
master
Harry, on account of the small advantage you
may have in being the first to shove off, intending
myself to keep as close as possible in his wake, which
will give me the twofold advantage of knowing I am
on the right tack, and of falling in with you
These are evil words, and fatal alike to your
own future peace, and to that of your unfortunate
friend, interrupted the divine. His reliance must
be placed on One, different in all his attributes from
your officer, to follow whom, or to consult whose
fraii conduct, would be the height of madness. Place
your faith on another
If I do, may I be
Peace, said Wilder. The black would speak
to me.
Scipio had turned his looks in the direction of his
officer, and was making another feeble effort towards
extending his hand. As Wilder placed the member
within the grasp of the dying negro, the latter
succeeded
in laying it on his lips, and then, flourishing
with a convulsive movement that herculean arm
which he had so lately and so successfully brandished
in defence of his master, the limb stiffened and fell,
though the eyes still continued their affectionate and
glaring gaze on that countenance he had so long
loved, and which, in the midst of all his long-endured
wrongs, had never refused to meet his look of love
in kindness. A low murmur followed this scene, and
then complaints succeeded, in a louder strain, till
more than one voice was heard openly muttering its
discontent that vengeance should be so long delayed.
Away with them! shouted an ill-omened voice
from the throng. Into the sea with the carcass, and
up with the living.
Avast! burst out of the chest of Fid, with an
awfulness and depth that stayed even the daring
movements of that lawless moment. Who dare to
cast a seaman into the brine, with the dying look
standing in his lights, and his last words still in his
messmate's ears? Ha! would ye stopper the fins of
a man as ye would pin a lobster's claw! That for
your fastenings and your lubberly knots together!
The excited topman snapped the lines by which his
elbows had been imperfectly secured, while
speaking
,
and immediately lashed the body of the black to
his own, though his words received no interruption
from a process that was executed with all a seaman's
dexterity. Where was the man in your lubberly
crew that could lay upon a yard with this here black,
or haul upon a lee-earing, while he held the
weatherline
?
Could any one of ye all give up his rations, in
order that a sick messmate might fare the better? or
work a double tide, to spare the weak arm of a friend?
Show me one who had as little dodge under fire, as
a sound mainmast, and I will show you all that is left
of his better. And now sway upon your whip, and
thank God that the honest end goes up, while the
rogues are suffered to keep their footing for a time.
Sway away! echoed Nightingale, seconding the
hoarse sounds of his voice by the winding of his call;
away with them to heaven.
Hold! exclaimed the chaplain, happily
arresting
the cord before it had yet done its fatal office.
For His sake, whose mercy may one day be needed
by the most hardened of ye all, give but another
moment
of time! What mean these words! read I aright?
`Ark, of Lynnhaven!'
Ay, ay, said Richard, loosening the rope a
little
,
in order to speak with greater freedom, and
transferring
the last morsel of the weed from his box to
his mouth, as he answered; seeing you are an apt
scholar, no wonder you make it out so easily, though
written by a hand that was always better with a
marling-spike than a quill.
But whence came the words? and why do you
bear those names, thus written indelibly in the skin?
Patience, men! monsters! demons! Would ye
deprive
the dying man of even a minute of that
precious
time which becomes so dear to all, as life is
leaving us?
Give yet another minute! said a deep voice
from behind.
Whence come the words, I ask? again the
chaplain
demanded.
They are neither more nor less than the manner
in which a circumstance was logged, which is now of
no consequence, seeing that the cruise is nearly up
with all who are chiefly concerned. The black spoke
of the collar; but, then, he thought I might be
staying
in port, while he was drifting between heaven
and earth, in search of his last moorings.
Is there aught, here, that I should know?
interrupted
the eager, tremulous voice of Mrs Wyllys.
O Merton! why these questions? Has my
yearning
been prophetic? Does nature give so mysterious
a warning of its claim!
Hush, dearest Madam! your thoughts wander
from probabilities, and my faculties become confused.
`Ark, of Lynnhaven,' was the name of an estate
in the islands, belonging to a near and dear friend,
and it was the place where I received, and whence I
sent to the main, the precious trust you confided to
my care. But
Say on! exclaimed the lady, rushing madly in
front of Wilder, and seizing the cord which, a
moment
before, had been tightened nearly to his
destruction
,
stripping it from his throat, with a sort of
supernatural dexterity: It was not, then, the name
of a ship?
A ship! surely not. But what mean these hopes?
these fears?
The collar? the collar? speak; what of that
collar?
It means no great things, now, my Lady,
returned
Fid, very coolly placing himself in the same
condition as Wilder, by profiting by the liberty of his
arms, and loosening his own neck from the halter,
notwithstanding a movement made by some of the
people to prevent it, which was, however, staid by a
look from their leader's eyes. I will first cast loose
this here rope; seeing that it is neither decent, nor
safe, for an ignorant man, like me, to enter into such
unknown navigation, a-head of his officer. The
collar
was just the necklace of the dog, which is here
to be seen on the arm of poor Guinea, who was, in
most respects, a man for whose equal one might long
look in vain.
Read it, said the governess, a film passing
before
her own eyes; read it, she added, motioning,
with a quivering hand, to the divine to peruse the
inscription, that was distinctly legible on the plate
of brass.
Holy Dispenser of good! what is this I see?
`Neptune, the property of Paul de Lacey?'
A loud cry burst from the lips of the governess;
her hands were clasped one single instant upward,
in that thanksgiving which oppressed her soul, and
then, as recollection returned, Wilder was pressed
fondly, frantickly to her bosom, while her voice was
heard to say, in the piercing tones of all-powerful
nature,
My child! my child!You will notcannot
dare not, rob a long-stricken and bereaved mother
of her offspring. Give me back my son, my noble
son! and I will weary Heaven with prayers in your
behalf. Ye are brave, and cannot be deaf to mercy.
Ye are men, who have lived in constant view of
God's majesty, and will not refuse to listen to this
evidence of his pleasure. Give me my child, and I
yield all else. He is of a race long honoured upon
the seas, and no mariner will be deaf to his claims.
The widow of de Lacey, the daughter of,
cries for mercy. Their united blood is in his veins,
and it will not be spilt by you! A mother bows
herself
to the dust before you, to ask mercy for her
off-spring
.
Oh! give me my child! my child!
As the words of the petitioner died upon the ear,
a stillness settled on the place, that might have been
likened to the holy calm which the entrance of
better
feelings leaves upon the soul of the sinner. The
grim freebooters regarded each other in doubt; the
workings of nature manifesting themselves in the
gleamings of even their stern and hardened visages.
Still, the desire for vengeance had got too firm a hold
of their minds to be dispossessed at a word. The
result would yet have been doubtful, had not one
suddenly re-appeared in their midst who never
ordered
in vain; and who knew how to guide, to quell,
or to mount and trample on their humours, as his
own pleasure dictated. For half a minute, he looked
around him, his eye still following the circle, which
receded as he gazed, until even those longest
accustomed
to yield to his will began to wonder at the
extraordinary
aspect in which it was now exhibited.
The gaze was wild and bewildered; and the face
pallid as that of the petitioning mother. Three times
did the lips sever, before sound issued from the
caverns
of his chest; then arose, on the attentive ears
of the breathless and listening crowd, a voice that
seemed equally charged with inward emotion and
high authority. With a haughty gesture of the hand,
and a manner that was too well understood to be
mistaken, he said,
Disperse! Ye know my justice; but ye know
I will be obeyed. My pleasure shall be known
to-morrow
.
CHAPTER XVI.
This is he;
Who hath upon him still that natural stamp:
It was wise Nature's end in the donation,
To be his evidence now.
Shakspeare
.
That
morrow came; and, with it, an entire change
in the scene and character of our tale. The
Dolphin
and the Dart were sailing in amity, side by
side; the latter again bearing the ensign of England,
and the former carrying a naked gaff. The injuries
of the gust, and the combat, had so far been repaired,
that, to a common eye, each gallant vessel was again
prepared, equally to encounter the hazards of the
ocean or of warfare. A long, blue, hazy streak, to
the north, proclaimed the proximity of the land; and
some three or four light coasters of that region, which
were sailing nigh, announced how little of hostility
existed in the present purposes of the freebooters.
What those designs were, however, still remained
a secret, buried in the bosom of the Rover alone.
Doubt, wonder, and distrust were, each in its turn,
to be traced, not only in the features of his captives,
but in those of his own crew. Throughout the
whole of the long night, which had succeeded the
events of the important day just past, he had been
seen to pace the poop in brooding silence. The
little
he had uttered was merely to direct the
movements
of the vessel; and when any ventured, with
other design, to approach his person, a sign, that none
there dared to disregard, secured him the solitude he
wished. Once or twice, indeed, the boy Roderick
was seen hovering at his elbow, but it was as a
guardian
spirit would be fancied to linger near the object
of its care, unobtrusively, and, it might almost be
added, invisible. When, however, the sun came,
burnished and glorious, out of the waters of the east,
a gun was fired, to bring a coaster to the side of the
Dolphin; and then it seemed that the curtain was
to be raised on the closing scene of the drama. With
his crew assembled on the deck beneath, and the
principal personages among his captives beside him
on the poop, the Rover addressed the former.
Years have united us by a common fortune, he
said: We have long been submissive to the same
laws. If I have been prompt to punish, I have been
ready to obey. You cannot charge me with
injustice
.
But the covenant is now ended. I take back
my pledge, and I return you your faiths. Nay, frown
nothesitate notmurmur not! The compact
ceases
,
and our laws are ended. Such were the
conditions
of the service. I give you your liberty, and
little do I claim in return. That you need have no
grounds of reproach, I bestow my treasure. See,
he added, raising that bloody ensign with which he
had so often braved the power of the nations, and
exhibiting beneath it sacks of that metal which has
so long governed the world; see! This was mine;
it is now yours. It shall be put in yonder coaster;
there I leave you, to bestow it, yourselves, on those
you may deem most worthy. Go; the land is near.
Disperse, for your own sakes: Nor hesitate; for,
without me, well do ye know that vessel of the King
would be your master. The ship is already mine;
of all the rest, I claim these prisoners alone for my
portion. Farewell!
Silent amazement succeeded this unlooked-for
address
.
There was, indeed, for a moment, some
disposition
to rebel; but the measures of the Rover had
been too well taken for resistance. The Dart lay
on their beam, with her people at their guns,
matches
lighted, and a heavy battery. Unprepared,
without
a leader, and surprised, opposition would have
been madness. The first astonishment had scarce
abated, before each freebooter rushed to secure his
individual effects, and to transfer them to the deck
of the coaster. When all but the crew of a single
boat had left the Dolphin, the promised gold was
sent, and then the loaded craft was seen hastily
seeking
the shelter of some secret creek. During this
scene, the Rover had again been silent as death. He
next turned to Wilder; and, making a mighty but
successful effort to still his feelings, he added,
Now must we, too, part. I commend my
wounded
to your care. They are necessarily with your
surgeons. I know the trust I give you will not be
abused.
My word is the pledge of their safety, returned
the young de Lacey.
I believe you.Lady, he added, approaching
the elder of the females, with an air in which
earnestness
and hesitation strongly contended, if a
proscribed
and guilty man may still address you, grant
yet a favour.
Name it; a mother's ear can never be deaf to
him who has spared her child.
When you petition Heaven for that child, then,
forget not there is another being who may still profit
by your prayers!No more.And now, he
continued
,
looking about him like one who was
determined
to be equal to the pang of the moment, however
difficult it might prove, and surveying, with an eye
of painful regret, those naked decks which were so
lately teeming with scenes of life and revelry; and
nowaynow we part! The boat awaits you.
Wilder had soon seen his mother and Gertrude
into the pinnace; but he still lingered on the deck
himself.
And you! he said, what will become of you?
I shall shortly beforgotten.Adieu!
Vol. II. Y
The manner in which the Rover spoke forbade
delay. The young man hesitated, squeezed his hand,
and left him.
When Wilder found himself restored to his proper
vessel, of which the death of Bignall had left him in
command, he immediately issued the order to fill her
sails, and to steer for the nearest haven of his
country
.
So long as sight could read the movements of
the man who remained on the decks of the
Dolphin
,
not a look was averted from the still
motionless
object. She lay, with her maintop-sail to the
mast, stationary as some beautiful fabric placed there
by fairy power, still lovely in her proportions, and
perfect in all her parts. A human form was seen
swiftly pacing her poop, and, by its side, glided one
who looked like a lessened shadow of that restless
figure. At length distance swallowed these
indistinct
images; and then the eye was wearied, in vain,
to trace the internal movements of the distant ship.
But doubt was soon ended. Suddenly a streak of
flame flashed from her decks, springing fiercely from
sail to sail. A vast cloud of smoke broke out of the
hull, and then came the deadened roar of artillery.
To this succeeded, for a time, the awful, and yet
attractive
,
spectacle of a burning ship. The whole
was terminated by an immense canopy of smoke,
and an explosion that caused the sails of the distant
Dart to waver, as though the winds of the trades
were deserting their eternal direction. When the
cloud had lifted from the ocean, an empty waste of
water was seen beneath; and none might mark the
spot where so lately had floated that beautiful
specimen
of human ingenuity. Some of those who
ascended
to the upper masts of the cruiser, and were
aided by glasses, believed, indeed, they could discern
a solitary speck upon the sea; but whether it was
a boat, or some fragment of the wreck, was never
known.
From that time, the history of the dreaded Red
Rover became gradually lost, in the fresher incidents
of those eventful seas. But the mariner, long after,
was known to shorten the watches of the night, by
recounting scenes of mad enterprise that were thought
to have occurred under his auspices. Rumour did
not fail to embellish and pervert them, until the real
character, and even name, of the individual were
confounded with the actors of other atrocities.
Scenes of higher and more ennobling interest, too,
were occurring on the Western Continent, to efface
the circumstances of a legend that many deemed wild
and improbable. The British colonies of North
America had revolted against the government of the
Crown, and a weary war was bringing the contest to
a successful issue. Newport, the opening scene of
this tale, had been successively occupied by the arms
of the King, and by those of that monarch who had
sent the chivalry of his nation to aid in stripping his
rival of her vast possessions.
The beautiful haven had sheltered hostile fleets,
and the peaceful villas had often rung with the
merriment
of youthful soldiers. More than twenty years,
after the events just related, had been added to the
long record of time, when the island town witnessed
the rejoicings of another festival. The allied forces
had compelled the most enterprising leader of the
British troops to yield himself and army captives to
their numbers and skill. The struggle was believed
to be over, and the worthy townsmen had, as usual,
been loud in the manifestations of their pleasure.
The rejoicings, however, ceased with the day; and,
as night gathered over the place, the little city was
resuming its customary provincial tranquillity. A
gallant frigate, which lay in the very spot where the
vessel of the Rover has first been seen, had already
lowered the gay assemblage of friendly ensigns,
which had been spread in the usual order of a gala
day. A flag of intermingled colours, and bearing a
constellation of bright and rising stars, alone was
floating at her gaff. Just at this moment, another
cruiser, but one of far less magnitude, was seen
entering
the roadstead, bearing also the friendly ensign
of the new States. Headed by the tide, and deserted
by the breeze, she soon dropped an anchor, in the
pass between Connanicut and Rhodes, when a boat
was seen making for the inner harbour, impelled by
the arms of six powerful rowers. As the barge
approached
a retired and lonely wharf, a solitary
observer
of its movements was enabled to see that it
contained a curtained litter, and a single female form.
Before the curiosity which such a sight would be apt
to create, in the breast of one like the spectator
mentioned, had time to exercise itself in conjectures,
the oars were tossed, the boat had touched the piles,
and, borne by the seamen, the litter, attended by the
woman, stood before him.
Tell me, I pray you, said a voice, in whose
tones grief and resignation were singularly combined,
if Captain Henry de Lacey, of the continental
marine, has a residence in this town of Newport?
That has he, answered the aged man addressed
by the female; that has he; or, as one might say,
two; since yonder frigate is no less his than the
dwelling on the hill, just by.
Thou art too old to point us out the way; but,
if grandchild, or idler of any sort, be near, here is
silver to reward him.
Lord help you, Lady! returned the other,
casting
an oblique glance at her appearance, as a sort of
salvo for the term, and pocketing the trifling piece
she offered, with singular care; Lord help you,
Madam! old though I am, and something worn down
by hardships and marvellous adventures, both by sea
and land, yet will I gladly do so small an office for
one of your condition. Follow, and you shall see
that your pilot is not altogether unused to the path.
The old man turned, and was leading the way off
the wharf, even before he had completed the
assurance
of his boasted ability. The seamen and the
female followed; the latter walking sorrowfully and
in silence by the side of the litter.
If you have need of refreshment, said their
guide, pointing over his shoulder, yonder is a
well-known
inn, and one much frequented in its time by
mariners. Neighbour Joram and the `Foul Anchor'
have had a reputation in their day, as well as the
greatest warrior in the land; and, though honest Joe
is gathered-in for the general harvest, the house stands
as firm as the day he first entered it. A goodly end
he made, and profitable is it to the weak-minded
sinner
to keep such an example before his eyes!
A low, smothered sound issued from the litter;
but, though the guide stopped to listen, it was
succeeded
by no other evidence of the character of its
tenant.
The sick man is in suffering, he resumed; but
bodily pain, and all afflictions which we suffer in the
flesh, must have their allotted time. I have lived to
see seven bloody and cruel wars, of which this,
which now rages, is, I humbly trust, to be the last.
Of the wonders which I witnessed, and the bodily
dangers which I compassed, in the sixth, eye hath
never beheld, nor can tongue utter, their equal!
Time hath dealt hardly by you, friend, meekly
interrupted the female. This gold may add a few
more comfortable days to those that are already
past.
The cripple, for their conductor was lame as well
as aged, received the offering with gratitude,
apparently
too much occupied in estimating its amount,
to give any more of his immediate attention to the
Y 2
discourse. In the deep silence that succeeded, the
party reached the door of the villa they sought.
It was now night; the short twilight of the season
having disappeared, while the bearers of the litter
had been ascending the hill. A loud rap was given
on the door by the guide; and then he was told that
his services were no longer needed.
I have seen much and hard service, he replied,
and well do I know that the prudent mariner does
not dismiss the pilot, until the ship is safely moored.
Perhaps old Madam de Lacey is abroad, or the
Captain
himself may not
Enough; here is one who will answer all our
questions.
The portal was now, in truth, opened; and a man
appeared on its threshold, holding a light. The
appearance
of the porter was not, however, of the
most encouraging aspect. A certain air, which can
neither be assumed nor gotten rid of, proclaimed him
a son of the ocean, while a wooden limb, which
served to prop a portion of his still square and
athletic
body, sufficiently proved he was one who had
not attained the experience of his hardy calling
without
some bodily risk. His countenance, as he held
the light above his head, in order to scan the persons
of the groupe without, was dogmatic, scowling, and
a little fierce. He was not long, however, in
recognizing
the cripple, of whom he unceremoniously
demanded
the object of what he was pleased to term
such a night squall.
Here is a wounded mariner, returned the
female
,
with tones so tremulous that they instantly
softened the heart of the nautical Cerberus, who is
come to claim hospitality of a brother in the service,
and shelter for the night. We would speak with
Captain Henry de Lacey.
Then you have struck soundings on the right
coast, Madam, returned the tar, as master Paul,
here, will say in the name of his father, no less than
in that of the sweet lady his mother; not forgetting
old madam his grandam, who is no fresh-water fish
herself, for that matter.
That he will, said a fine, manly youth of some
seventeen years, who wore the attire of one who
was already in training for the seas, and who was
looking curiously over the shoulder of the elderly
seaman. I will acquaint my father of the visit,
and, Richarddo you seek out a proper birth for
our guests, without delay.
This order, which was given with the air of one
who had been accustomed to act for himself, and to
speak with authority, was instantly obeyed. The
apartment, selected by Richard, was the ordinary
parlour of the dwelling. Here, in a few moments,
the litter was deposited; the bearers were then
dismissed
,
and the female only was left, with its tenant
and the rude attendant, who had not hesitated to give
them so frank a reception. The latter busied
himself
in trimming the lights, and in replenishing a bright
wood fire; taking care, at the same time, that no
unnecessary
vacuum should occur in the discourse, to
render the brief interval, necessary for the
appearance
of his superiors, tedious. During this state of
things an inner door was opened, the youth already
named leading the way for the three principal
personages
of the mansion.
First came a middle-aged, athletic man, in the
naval
undress of a Captain of the new States. His look
was calm, and his step was still firm, though time
and exposure were beginning to sprinkle his head
with gray. He wore one arm in a sling, a proof that
his service was still recent; on the other leaned a
lady, in whose matronly mien, but still blooming
cheek and bright eyes, were to be traced most of the
ripened beauties of her sex. Behind them followed
a third, a female also, whose step was less elastic,
but whose person continued to exhibit the evidences
of a peaceful evening to the troubled day of life.
The three courteously saluted the stranger, delicately
refraining from making any precipitate allusion to
the motive of her visit. Their reserve seemed
necessary
;
for, by the agitation which shook the
shattered
frame of one who appeared as much sinking
with grief as infirmity, it was too apparent that the
unknown lady needed a little time to collect her
energies
,
and to arrange her thoughts.
She wept long and bitterly, as though alone; nor
did she essay to speak until further silence would
have become suspicious. Then, drying her eyes, and
with cheeks on which a bright, hectic spot was seated,
her voice was heard for the first time by her
wondering
hosts.
You may deem this visit an intrusion, she said;
but one, whose will is my law, would be brought
hither.
Wherefore? asked the officer, with mildness,
observing that her voice was already choaked.
To die! was the whispered, husky answer.
A common start manifested the surprise of her
auditors
;
and then the gentleman arose, and
approaching
the litter, he gently drew aside a curtain, exposing
its hitherto unseen tenant to the examination of all
in the room. There was understanding in the look
that met his gaze, though death was but too plainly
stamped on the pallid lineaments of the wounded
man. His eye alone seemed still to belong to earth;
for, while all around it appeared already to be sunk
into the helplessness of the last stage of human
debility
,
that was still bright, intelligent, and glowing
it might almost have been described as glaring.
Is there aught in which we can contribute to
your comfort, or to your wishes? asked Captain de
Lacey, after a long and solemn pause, during which
all around the litter had mournfully contemplated the
sad spectacle of sinking mortality.
The smile of the dying man was ghastly, though
tenderness and sorrow were singularly and fearfully
combined in its expression. He answered not; but
his eyes had wandered from face to face, until they
became riveted, by a species of charm, on the
countenance
of the oldest of the two females. His gaze
was met by a look as settled as his own; and so
evident
was the powerful sympathy which existed
between
the two, that it could not escape the
observation
of the spectators.
Mother! said the officer, with affectionate
concern
;
my mother! what troubles you?
HenryGertrude, answered the venerable
parent
,
extending her arms to her offspring, as if she
asked support; my children, your doors have been
opened to one who has a claim to enter them. Oh!
it is in these terrible moments, when passion is asleep
and our weakness is most apparent, in these
moments
of debility and disease, that nature so strongly
manifests its impression! I see it all in that fading
countenance, in those sunken features, where so little
is left but the last lingering look of family and
kindred
!
Kindred! exclaimed Captain de Lacey: Of
what affinity is our guest?
A brother! answered the lady, dropping her
head on her bosom, as though she had proclaimed a
degree of consanguinity which gave pain no less than
pleasure.
The stranger, too much overcome himself to speak,
made a joyful gesture of assent, but never averted a
gaze that seemed destined to maintain its direction
so long as life should lend it intelligence.
A brother! repeated her son, in unfeigned
astonishment
.
I knew you had a brother; but I had
thought him dead a boy.
'Twas so I long believed, myself; though
frightful
glimpses of the contrary have often beset me; but
now the truth is too plain, in that fading visage and
those fallen features, to be misunderstood. Poverty
and misfortune divided us. I suppose we thought
each other dead.
Another feeble gesture proclaimed the assent of
the wounded man.
There is no further mystery. Henry, the
stranger
is thy unclemy brotheronce my pupil!
I could wish to see him under happier
circumstances
,
returned the officer, with a seaman's
frankness
;
but, as a kinsman, he is welcome. Poverty,
at least, shall no longer divide you.
Look, HenryGertrude! added the mother,
veiling her own eyes as she spoke, that face is no
stranger to you. See ye not the sad ruins of one ye
both fear and love?
Wonder kept her children mute, though both looked
until sight became confused, so long and intense was
their examination. Then a hollow sound, which
came from the chest of the stranger, caused them
both to start; and, as his low, but distinct
enunciation
rose on their ears, doubt and perplexity vanished.
Wilder, he said, with an effort in which his
utmost strength appeared exerted, I have come to
ask the last office at your hands.
Captain Heidegger! exclaimed the officer.
The Red Rover! murmured the younger Mrs
de Lacey, involuntarily recoiling a pace from the
litter
,
in alarm.
The Red Rover! repeated her son, pressing
nigher with ungovernable curiosity.
Laid by the heels at last! bluntly observed Fid,
stumping up towards the groupe, without
relinquishing
the tongs, which he had kept in constant use, as
an apology for remaining in the presence.
I had long hid my repentance, and my shame,
together, continued the dying man, when the
momentary
surprise had a little abated; but this war
drew me from my concealment. Our country needed
us both, and both has she had! You have served as
one who never offended might serve; but a cause so
holy was not to be tarnished by a name like mine.
May the little I have done for good be remembered
when the world speaks of the evil of my hands!
Sister
motherpardon!
May that God, who forms his creatures with such
fearful natures, look mercifully on all our
weaknesses
!
exclaimed the weeping Mrs de Lacey, bowing
to her knees, and lifting her hands and eyes to
heaven
.
O brother, brother! you have been trained
in the holy mystery of your redemption, and need
not now be told on what Rock to place your hopes
of pardon!
Had I never forgotten those precepts, my name
would still be known with honour. But, Wilder!
he added with startling energy, Wilder!
All eyes were bent eagerly on the speaker. His
hand was holding a roll on which he had been
reposing
,
as on a pillow. With a supernatural effort,
his form arose on the litter; and, with both hands
elevated above his head, he let fall before him that
blazonry of intermingled stripes, with its blue field
of rising stars, a glow of high exultation illumining
each feature of his face, as in his former day of pride.
Wilder! he repeated, laughing hysterically, we
have triumphed!Then he fell backward, without
motion, the exulting lineaments settling in the gloom
of death, as shadows obscure the smiling brightness
of the sun.
THE END.